A*
MARDI.
CHAPTER I.
MARAMMA.
We
were now voyaging straight for Maramma; where
lived and reigned, in mystery, the High Pontiff of the
adjoining
isles: prince, priest, and god, in his own proper
person: great lord paramount over many kings in Mardi;
his hands full of scepters and crosiers.
Soon, rounding a lofty and insulated shore, the great
central
peak of the island came in sight; domineering over the
neighboring hills; the same aspiring pinnacle, descried in
drawing near the archipelago in the Chamois.
Tall Peak of Ofo! cried Babbalanja, how comes it
that thy shadow so broods over Mardi; flinging new shades
upon spots already shaded by the hill-sides; shade upon
shade!
Yet so it is, said Yoomy, sadly, that where that
shadow falls, gay flowers refuse to spring; and men long
dwelling therein become shady of face and of soul. `Hast
thou come from out the shadows of Ofo?' inquires the
stranger, of one with a clouded brow.
It was by this same peak, said Mohi, that the
nimble
god Roo, a great sinner above, came down from the skies,
a very long time ago. Three skips and a jump, and he landed
on the plain. But alas, poor Roo! though easy the descent,
there was no climbing back.
No wonder, then, said Babbalanja, that the peak is
inaccessible to man. Though, with a strange infatuation,
many still make pilgrimages thereto; and wearily climb and
climb, till slipping from the rocks, they fall headlong
backward
,
and oftentimes perish at its base.
Ay, said Mohi, in vain, on all sides of the Peak,
various paths are tried; in vain new ones are cut through
the cliffs and the brambles:Ofo yet remains inaccessible.
Nevertheless, said Babbalanja, by some it is believed,
that those, who by dint of hard struggling climb so high as
to become invisible from the plain; that these have attained
the summit; though others much doubt, whether their
becoming
invisible is not because of their having fallen, and
perished by the way.
And wherefore, said Media, do you mortals undertake
the ascent at all? why not be content on the plain? and
even if attainable, what would you do upon that lofty,
clouded summit? Or how can you hope to breathe that
rarefied air, unfitted for your human lungs?
True, my lord, said Babbalanja; and Bardianna
asserts that the plain alone was intended for man; who
should be content to dwell under the shade of its groves,
though the roots thereof descend into the darkness of the
earth. But, my lord, you well know, that there are those
in Mardi, who secretly regard all stories connected with this
peak, as inventions of the people of Maramma. They
deny
that any thing is to be gained by making a pilgrimage
thereto. And for warranty, they appeal to the sayings of
the great prophet Alma.
Cried Mohi, But Alma is also quoted by others, in
vindication
of the pilgrimages to Ofo. They declare that the
prophet himself was the first pilgrim that thitherward
journeyed
:
that from thence he departed to the skies.
Now, excepting this same peak, Maramma is all rolling
hill and dale, like the sea after a storm; which then seems
not to roll, but to stand still, poising its mountains. Yet
the landscape of Maramma has not the merriness of
meadows
;
partly because of the shadow of Ofo, and partly
because of the solemn groves in which the Morais and
temples are buried.
According to Mohi, not one solitary tree bearing fruit, not
one esculent root, grows in all the isle; the population
wholly depending upon the large tribute remitted from the
neighboring shores.
It is not that the soil is unproductive, said Mohi, that
these things are so. It is extremely fertile; but the
inhabitants
say that it would be wrong to make a Bread-fruit
orchard of the holy island.
And hence, my lord, said Babbalanja, while others
are charged with the business of their temporal welfare,
these Islanders take no thought of the morrow; and broad
Maramma lies one fertile waste in the lagoon.
CHAPTER II.
THEY LAND.
Coming
close to the island, the pennons and trappings of
our canoes were removed; and Vee-Vee was commanded to
descend from the shark's mouth; and for a time to lay aside
his conch. In token of reverence, our paddlers also stripped
to the waist; an example which even Media followed;
though, as a king, the same homage he rendered, was at
times rendered himself.
At every place, hitherto visited, joyous crowds stood ready
to hail our arrival; but the shores of Maramma were silent,
and forlorn.
Said Babbalanja, It looks not as if the lost one were
here.
At length we landed in a little cove nigh a valley, which
Mohi called Uma; and here in silence we beached our
canoes.
But presently, there came to us an old man, with a beard
white as the mane of the pale horse. He was clad in a
midnight robe. He fanned himself with a fan of faded
leaves. A child led him by the hand, for he was blind,
wearing a green plantain leaf over his plaited brow.
Him, Media accosted, making mention who we were, and
on what errand we came: to seek out Yillah, and behold
the isle.
Whereupon Pani, for such was his name, gave us a
courteous
reception; and lavishly promised to discover sweet
Yillah; declaring that in Maramma, if any where, the
long-lost maiden must be found. He assured us, that
throughout the whole land he would lead us; leaving no
place, desirable to be searched, unexplored.
And so saying, he conducted us to his dwelling, for
refreshment
and repose.
It was large and lofty. Near by, however, were many
miserable hovels, with squalid inmates. But the old man's
retreat was exceedingly comfortable; especially abounding
in mats for lounging; his rafters were bowed down by
calabashes
of good cheer.
During the repast which ensued, blind Pani, freely
partaking
,
enlarged upon the merit of abstinence; declaring
that a thatch overhead, and a cocoanut tree, comprised all
that was necessary for the temporal welfare of a Mardian.
More than this, he assured us was sinful.
He now made known, that he officiated as guide in this
quarter of the country; and that as he had renounced all
other pursuits to devote himself to showing strangers the
island; and more particularly the best way to ascend lofty
Ofo; he was necessitated to seek remuneration for his toil.
My lord, then whispered Mohi to Media the great
prophet Alma always declared, that, without charge, this
island was free to all.
What recompense do you desire, old man? said Media
to Pani.
What I seek is but little:twenty rolls of fine tappa;
two score mats of best upland grass; one canoe-load of
bread-fruit and yams; ten gourds of wine; and forty strings
of teeth;you are a large company, but my requisitions are
small.
Very small, said Mohi.
You are extortionate, good Pani, said Media. And
what wants an aged mortal like you with all these things?
I thought superfluities were worthless; nay, sinful, said
Babbalanja.
Is not this your habitation already more than
abundantly
supplied with all desirable furnishings? asked Yoomy.
I am but a lowly laborer, said the old man, meekly
crossing his arms, but does not the lowliest laborer ask and
receive his reward? and shall I miss mine?But I beg
charity of none. What I ask, I demand; and in the dread
name of great Alma, who appointed me a guide. And to
and fro he strode, groping as he went.
Marking his blindness, whispered Babbalanja to Media,
My lord, methinks this Pani must be a poor guide. In
his journeys inland, his little child leads him; why not,
then, take the guide's guide?
But Pani would not part with the child.
Then said Mohi in a low voice, My lord Media, though I
am no appointed guide; yet, will I undertake to lead you
aright over all this island; for I am an old man, and have
been here oft by myself; though I can not undertake to
conduct
you up the peak of Ofo, and to the more secret temples.
Then Pani said: and what mortal may this be, who
pretends to thread the labyrinthine wilds of Maramma?
Beware!
He is one with eyes that see, made answer
Babbalanja
.
Follow him not, said Pani, for he will lead thee
astray; no Yillah will he find; and having no warrant as
a guide, the curses of Alma will accompany him.
Now, this was not altogether without effect; for Pani
and his fathers before him had always filled the office of
guide.
Nevertheless, Media at last decided, that, this time, Mohi
should conduct us; which being communicated to Pani, he
desired us to remove from his roof. So withdrawing to the
skirt of a neighboring grove, we lingered awhile, to refresh
ourselves for the journey in prospect.
As we here reclined, there came up from the sea-side a
party of pilgrims, but newly arrived.
Apprized of their coming, Pani and his child went out to
meet them; and standing in the path he cried, I am the
appointed guide; in the name of Alma I conduct all
pilgrims
to the temples.
This must be the worthy Pani, said one of the
strangers
,
turning upon the rest.
Let us take him, then, for our guide, cried they; and
all drew near.
But upon accosting him; they were told, that he guided
none without recompense.
And now, being informed, that the foremost of the pilgrims
was one Divino, a wealthy chief of a distant island, Pani
demanded of him his requital.
But the other demurred; and by many soft speeches at
length abated the recompense to three promissory cocoanuts,
which he covenanted to send Pani at some future day.
The next pilgrim accosted, was a sad-eyed maiden, in
decent but scanty raiment; who without seeking to diminish
Pani's demands promptly placed in his hands a small hoard
of the money of Mardi.
Take it, holy guide, she said, it is all I have.
But the third pilgrim, one Fanna, a hale matron, in
handsome apparel, needed no asking to bestow her goods.
Calling upon her attendants to advance with their burdens,
she quickly unrolled them; and wound round and round
Pani, fold after fold of the costliest tappas; and filled both
his hands with teeth; and his mouth with some savory
marmalade; and poured oil upon his head; and knelt and
besought of him a blessing.
From the bottom of my heart I bless thee, said Pani;
and still holding her hands exclaimed, Take example from
this woman, oh Divino; and do ye likewise, ye pilgrims
all.
Not to-day, said Divino.
We are not rich, like unto Fanna, said the rest.
Now, the next pilgrim was a very old and miserable man;
stone-blind, covered with rags; and supporting his steps with
a staff.
My recompense, said Pani.
Alas! I have naught to give. Behold my poverty.
I can not see, replied Pani; but feeling of his
garments
,
he said, Thou wouldst deceive me; hast thou not
this robe, and this staff?
Oh! Merciful Pani, take not my all! wailed the
pilgrim
.
But his worthless gaberdine was thrust into the
dwelling of the guide.
Meanwhile, the matron was still enveloping Pani in her
interminable tappas.
But the sad-eyed maiden, removing her upper mantle,
threw it over the naked form of the beggar.
The fifth pilgrim was a youth of an open, ingenuous
aspect; and with an eye, full of eyes; his step was light.
Who art thou? cried Pani, as the stripling touched
him in passing.
I go to ascend the Peak, said the boy.
Then take me for guide.
No, I am strong and lithesome. Alone must I go.
But how knowest thou the way?
There are many ways: the right one I must seek for
myself.
Ah, poor deluded one, sighed Pani; but thus is it
ever with youth; and rejecting the monitions of wisdom,
suffer they must. Go on, and perish!
Turning, the boy exclaimedThough I act counter to
thy counsels, oh Pani, I but follow the divine instinct in
me.
Poor youth! murmured Babbalanja. How earnestly
he struggles in his bonds. But though rejecting a guide,
still he clings to that legend of the Peak.
The rest of the pilgrims now tarried with the guide,
preparing
for their journey inland.
CHAPTER III.
THEY PASS THROUGH THE WOODS.
Refreshed
by our stay in the grove, we rose, and
placed ourselves under the guidance of Mohi; who went on
in advance.
Winding our way among jungles, we came to a deep
hollow, planted with one gigantic palm-shaft, belted round
by saplings, springing from its roots. But, Laocoon-like,
sire and sons stood locked in the serpent folds of gnarled,
distorted banians; and the banian-bark, eating into their
vital wood, corrupted their veins of sap, till all those
palmnuts
were poisoned chalices.
Near by stood clean-limbed, comely manchineels, with
lustrous leaves and golden fruit. You would have deemed
them Trees of Life; but underneath their branches grew
no blade of grass, no herb, nor moss; the bare earth was
scorched by heaven's own dews, filtrated through that fatal
foliage.
Farther on, there frowned a grove of blended banian
boughs, thick-ranked manchineels, and many a upas; their
summits gilded by the sun; but below, deep shadows,
darkening night-shade ferns, and mandrakes. Buried in
their midst, and dimly seen among large leaves, all
halberd-shaped
,
were piles of stone, supporting falling temples of
bamboo. Thereon frogs leaped in dampness, trailing round
their slime. Thick hung the rafters with lines of pendant
sloths; the upas trees dropped darkness round; so dense the
shade, nocturnal birds found there perpetual night; and,
throve on poisoned air. Owls hooted from dead boughs;
or, one by one, sailed by on silent pinions; cranes stalked
abroad, or brooded in the marshes; adders hissed; bats
smote the darkness; ravens croaked; and vampires, fixed on
slumbering lizards, fanned the sultry air.
CHAPTER IV.
HIVOHITEE MDCCCXLVIII.
Now
, those doleful woodlands passed, straightway
converse
was renewed, and much discourse took place,
concerning
Hivohitee, Pontiff of the isle.
For, during our first friendly conversation with Pani,
Media had inquired for Hivohitee, and sought to know in
what part of the island he abode.
Whereto Pani had replied, that the Pontiff would be
invisible for several days to come; being engaged with
particular
company.
And upon further inquiry, as to who were the personages
monopolizing his hospitalities, Media was dumb when
informed
,
that they were no other than certain incorporeal
deities from above, passing the Capricorn Solstice at
Maramma
.
As on we journeyed, much curiosity being expressed to
know more of the Pontiff and his guests, old Mohi, familiar
with these things, was commanded to enlighten the company.
He complied; and his recital was not a little significant, of
the occasional credulity of chroniclers.
According to his statement, the deities entertained by
Hivohitee belonged to the third class of immortals. These,
however, were far elevated above the corporeal demi-gods
of Mardi. Indeed, in Hivohitee's eyes, the greatest
demi-gods
were as gourds. Little wonder, then, that their
superiors
were accounted the most genteel characters on his
visiting list.
These immortals were wonderfully fastidious and dainty
as to the atmosphere they breathed; inhaling no sublunary
air, but that of the elevated interior; where the Pontiff
had a rural lodge for the special accommodation of
impalpable
guests; who were entertained at very small cost;
dinners
being unnecessary, and dormitories superfluous.
But Hivohitee permitted not the presence of these
celestial
grandees, to interfere with his own solid comfort.
Passing
his mornings in highly intensified chat, he thrice reclined
at his ease; partaking of a fine plantain-pudding, and
pouring
out from a calabash of celestial old wine; meanwhile,
carrying on the flow of soul with his guests. And truly,
the sight of their entertainer thus enjoying himself in
the flesh, while they themselves starved on the ether,
must have been exceedingly provoking to these aristocratic
and aerial strangers.
It was reported, furthermore, that Hivohitee, one of the
haughtiest of Pontiffs, purposely treated his angelical guests
thus cavalierly; in order to convince them, that though a
denizen of earth; a sublunarian; and in respect of heaven,
a mere provincial; he (Hivohitee) accounted himself full as
good as seraphim from the capital; and that too at the
Capricorn
Solstice, or any other time of the year. Strongly
bent was Hivohitee upon humbling their supercilious
pretensions
.
Besides, was he not accounted a great god in the land?
supreme? having power of life and death? essaying the
deposition of kings? and dwelling in moody state, all by
himself, in the goodliest island of Mardi? Though here,
be it said, that his assumptions of temporal supremacy were
but seldom made good by express interference with the
secular
concerns of the neighboring monarchs; who, by force of
arms, were too apt to argue against his claims to authority;
however, in theory, they bowed to it. And now, for the
genealogy of Hivohitee; for eighteen hundred and
forty-seven
Hivohitees were alleged to have gone before him. He
came in a right line from the divine Hivohitee I.: the original
grantee of the empire of men's souls and the first swayer of
a crosier. The present Pontiff's descent was
unquestionable
;
his dignity having been transmitted through none but
heirs male; the whole procession of High Priests being the
fruit of successive marriages between uterine brother and
sister. A conjunction deemed incestuous in some lands;
but, here, held the only fit channel for the pure transmission
of elevated rank.
Added to the hereditary appellation, Hivohitee, which
simply denoted the sacerdotal station of the Pontiffs, and
was but seldom employed in current discourse, they were
individualized by a distinctive name, bestowed upon them at
birth. And the degree of consideration in which they were
held, may be inferred from the fact, that during the lifetime
of a Pontiff, the leading sound in his name was banned to
ordinary uses. Whence, at every new accession to the
archiepiscopal throne, it came to pass, that multitudes of
words and phrases were either essentially modified, or
wholly
dropped. Wherefore, the language of Maramma was
incessantly fluctuating; and had become so full of
jargonings
,
that the birds in the groves were greatly puzzled; not
knowing where lay the virtue of sounds, so incoherent.
And, in a good measure, this held true of all tongues
spoken throughout the Archipelago; the birds marveling at
mankind, and mankind at the birds; wondering how they
could continually sing; when, for all man knew to the
contrary
,
it was impossible they could be holding intelligent
discourse. And thus, though for thousands of years, men
and birds had been dwelling together in Mardi, they
remained
wholly ignorant of each other's secrets; the
Islander
regarding the fowl as a senseless songster, forever in the
clouds; and the fowl him, as a screeching crane, destitute
of pinions and lofty aspirations.
Over and above numerous other miraculous powers
imputed to the Pontiffs as spiritual potentates, there was
ascribed to them one special privilege of a secular nature:
that of healing with a touch the bites of the ravenous
sharks, swarming throughout the lagoon. With these they
were supposed to be upon the most friendly terms; according
to popular accounts, sociably bathing with them in the sea;
permitting them to rub their noses against their priestly
thighs; playfully mouthing their hands, with all their tiers
of teeth.
At the ordination of a Pontiff, the ceremony was not
deemed complete, until embarking in his barge, he was
saluted
High Priest by three sharks drawing near; with teeth
turned up, swimming beside his canoe.
These monsters were deified in Maramma; had altars
there; it was deemed worse than homicide to kill one.
And what if they destroy human life? say the Islanders,
are they not sacred?
Now many more wonderful things were related touching
Hivohitee; and though one could not but doubt the validity of
many prerogatives ascribed to him, it was nevertheless hard
to do otherwise, than entertain for the Pontiff that sort of
profound consideration, which all render to those who
indisputably
possess the power of quenching human life with a
wish.
CHAPTER V.
THEY VISIT THE GREAT MORAI.
As
garrulous guide to the party, Braid-Beard soon brought
us nigh the great Morai of Maramma, the burial-place of
the Pontiffs, and a rural promenade, for certain idols there
inhabiting.
Our way now led through the bed of a shallow
water-course
;
Mohi observing, as we went, that our feet were
being washed at every step; whereas, to tread the dusty
earth would be to desecrate the holy Morai, by transferring
thereto, the base soil of less sacred ground.
Here and there, thatched arbors were thrown over the
stream, for the accommodation of devotees; who, in these
consecrated waters, issuing from a spring in the Morai, bathed
their garments, that long life might ensue. Yet, as
Braid-Beard
assured us, sometimes it happened, that divers feeble
old men zealously donning their raiment immediately after
immersion became afflicted with rheumatics; and instances
were related of their falling down dead, in this their pursuit
of longevity.
Coming to the Morai, we found it inclosed by a wall;
and while the rest were surmounting it, Mohi was busily
engaged in the apparently childish occupation of collecting
pebbles. Of these, however, to our no small surprise, he
presently made use, by irreverently throwing them at all
objects to which he was desirous of directing attention. In
this manner, was pointed out a black boar's head, suspended
from a bough. Full twenty of these sentries were on post
in the neighboring trees.
Proceeding, we came to a hillock of bone-dry sand,
resting
upon the otherwise loamy soil. Possessing a secret,
preservative virtue, this sand had, ages ago, been brought
from a distant land, to furnish a sepulcher for the Pontiffs;
who here, side by side, and sire by son, slumbered all
peacefully
in the fellowship of the grave. Mohi declared, that
were the sepulcher to be opened, it would be the resurrection
of the whole line of High Priests. But a resurrection of
bones, after all, said Babbalanja, ever osseous in his allusions
to the departed.
Passing on, we came to a number of Runic-looking stones,
all over hieroglyphical inscriptions, and placed round an
elliptical
aperture; where welled up the sacred spring of the
Morai, clear as crystal, and showing through its waters,
two tiers of sharp, tusk-like stones; the mouth of Oro, so
called; and it was held, that if any secular hand should be
immersed in the spring, straight upon it those stony jaws
would close.
We next came to a large image of a dark-hued stone,
representing a burly man, with an overgrown head, and
abdomen
hollowed out, and open for inspection; therein, were
relics of bones. Before this image we paused. And
whether or no it was Mohi's purpose to make us tourists
quake with his recitals, his revelations were far from
agreeable
.
At certain seasons, human beings were offered to the
idol, which being an epicure in the matter of sacrifices,
would accept of no ordinary fare. To insure his digestion,
all indirect routes to the interior were avoided; the sacrifices
being packed in the ventricle itself.
Near to this image of Doleema, so called, a solitary
forest-tree
was pointed out; leafless and dead to the core. But
from its boughs hung numerous baskets, brimming over with
melons, grapes, and guavas. And daily these baskets were
replenished.
As we here stood, there passed a hungry figure, in ragged
raiment: hollow cheeks, and hollow eyes. Wistfully he
vol. ii.B
eyed the offerings; but retreated; knowing it was sacrilege
to touch them. There, they must decay, in honor of the
god Ananna; for so this dead tree was denominated by
Mohi.
Now, as we were thus strolling about the Morai, the old
chronicler elucidating its mysteries, we suddenly spied Pani
and the pilgrims approaching the image of Doleema; his
child leading the guide.
This, began Pani, pointing to the idol of stone, is the
holy god Ananna who lives in the sap of this green and
flourishing tree.
Thou meanest not, surely, this stone image we behold?
said Divino.
I mean the tree, said the guide. It is no stone
image.
Strange, muttered the chief; were it not a guide
that spoke, I would deny it. As it is, I hold my peace.
Mystery of mysteries! cried the blind old pilgrim;
is it, then, a stone image that Pani calls a tree? Oh,
Oro, that I had eyes to see, that I might verily behold it,
and then believe it to be what it is not; that so I might
prove the largeness of my faith; and so merit the blessing
of Alma.
Thrice sacred Ananna, murmured the sad-eyed maiden,
falling upon her knees before Doleema, receive my
adoration
.
Of thee, I know nothing, but what the guide has
spoken. I am but a poor, weak-minded maiden, judging
not for myself, but leaning upon others that are wiser.
These things are above me. I am afraid to think. In
Alma's
name, receive my homage.
And she flung flowers before the god.
But Fanna, the hale matron, turning upon Pani, exclaimed,
Receive more gifts, oh guide. And again she showered
them upon him.
Upon this, the willful boy who would not have Pani for
his guide, entered the Morai; and perceiving the group
before
the image, walked rapidly to where they were. And
beholding the idol, he regarded it attentively, and said:
This must be the image of Doleema; but I am not
sure.
Nay, cried the blind pilgrim, it is the holy tree
Ananna, thou wayward boy.
A tree? whatever it may be, it is not that; thou art
blind, old man.
But though blind, I have that which thou lackest.
Then said Pani, turning upon the boy, Depart from the
holy Morai, and corrupt not the hearts of these pilgrims.
Depart, I say; and, in the sacred name of Alma, perish in
thy endeavors to climb the Peak.
I may perish there in truth, said the boy, with sadness;
but it shall be in the path revealed to me in my dream. And
think not, oh guide, that I perfectly rely upon gaining that
lofty summit. I will climb high Ofo with hope, not faith;
Oh, mighty Oro, help me!
Be not impious, said Pani; pronounce not Oro's
sacred name too lightly.
Oro is but a sound, said the boy. They call the
supreme god, Ati, in my native isle, it is the soundless
thought of him, oh guide, that is in me.
Hark to his rhapsodies! Hark, how he prates of
mysteries
,
that not even Hivohitee can fathom.
Nor he, nor thou, nor I, nor any; Oro, to all, is Oro
the unknown.
Why claim to know Oro, then, better than others?
I am not so vain; and I have little to substitute for
what I can not receive. I but feel Oro in me, yet can not
declare the thought.
Proud boy! thy humility is a pretense; at heart, thou
deemest thyself wiser than Mardi.
Not near so wise. To believe is a haughtly thing; my
very doubts humiliate me. I weep and doubt; all Mardi
may be right; and I too simple to discern.
He is mad, said the chief Divino; never before heard
I such words.
They are thoughts, muttered the guide.
Poor fool! cried Fanna.
Lost youth! sighed the maiden.
He is but a child, said the beggar. These whims will
soon depart; once I was like him; but, praise be to Alma,
in the hour of sickness I repented, feeble old man that I am!
It is because I am young and in health, said the boy,
that I more nourish the thoughts, that are born of my
youth and my health. I am fresh from my Maker, soul and
body unwrinkled. On thy sick couch, old man, they took
thee at advantage.
Turn from the blasphemer, cried Pani. Hence!
thou evil one, to the perdition in store.
I will go my ways, said the boy, but Oro will shape
the end.
And he quitted the Morai.
After conducting the party round the sacred inclosure,
assisting his way with his staff, for his child had left him,
Pani seated himself on a low, mossy stone, grimly
surrounded
by idols; and directed the pilgrims to return to his
habitation
;
where, ere long he would rejoin them.
The pilgrims departed, he remained in profound
meditation
;
while, backward and forward, an invisible ploughshare
turned up the long furrows on his brow.
Long he was silent; then muttered to himself, That
boy, that wild, wise boy, has stabbed me to the heart. His
thoughts are my suspicions. But he is honest. Yet I harm
none. Multitudes must have unspoken meditations as well
as I. Do we then mutually deceive? Off masks,
mankind
,
that I may know what warranty of fellowship with
others, my own thoughts possess. Why, upon this one
theme, oh Oro! must all dissemble? Our thoughts are not
our own. Whate'er it be, an honest thought must have
some germ of truth. But we must set, as flows the general
stream; I blindly follow, where I seem to lead; the crowd
of pilgrims is so great, they see not there is none to guide.
It hinges upon this: Have we angelic spirits? But in
vain, in vain, oh Oro! I essay to live out of this poor, blind
body, fit dwelling for my sightless soul. Death, death:
blind, am I dead? for blindness seems a consciousness of
death. Will my grave be more dark, than all is now?
From dark to dark!What is this subtle something that is
in me, and eludes me? Will it have no end? When,
then, did it begin? All, all is chaos! What is this shining
light in heaven, this sun they tell me of? Or, do they lie?
Methinks, it might blaze convictions; but I brood and grope
in blackness; I am dumb with doubt; yet, 'tis not doubt,
but worse: I doubt my doubt. Oh, ye all-wise spirits in
the air, how can ye witness all this woe, and give no sign?
Would, would that mine were a settled doubt, like that wild
boy's, who without faith, seems full of it. The undoubting
doubter believes the most. Oh! that I were he. Methinks
that daring boy hath Alma in him, struggling to be free.
But those pilgrims: that trusting girl.What, if they saw
me as I am? Peace, peace, my soul; on, mask, again.
And he staggered from the Morai.
CHAPTER VI.
THEY DISCOURSE OF THE GODS OF MARDI, AND BRAID-BEARD
TELLS OF ONE FONI.
Walking
from the sacred inclosure, Mohi discoursed of
the plurality of gods in the land, a subject suggested by the
multitudinous idols we had just been beholding.
Said Mohi, These gods of wood and of stone are
nothing
in number to the gods in the air. You breathe not a
breath without inhaling, you touch not a leaf without
ruffling
a spirit. There are gods of heaven, and gods of earth;
gods of sea and of land; gods of peace and of war; gods of
rock and of fell; gods of ghosts and of thieves; of singers and
dancers; of lean men and of house-thatchers. Gods glance
in the eyes of birds, and sparkle in the crests of the waves;
gods merrily swing in the boughs of the trees, and merrily
sing in the brook. Gods are here, and there, and every
where; you are never alone for them.
If this be so, Braid-Beard, said Babbalanja, our
inmost
thoughts are overheard; but not by eaves-droppers.
However, my lord, these gods to whom he alludes, merely
belong to the semi-intelligibles, the divided unities in unity,
this side of the First Adyta.
Indeed? said Media.
Semi-intelligible, say you, philosopher? cried Mohi.
Then, prithee, make it appear so; for what you say, seems
gibberish to me.
Babbalanja, said Media, no more of your
abstrusities
;
what know you mortals of us gods and demi-gods?
But tell me, Mohi, how many of your deities of rock and
fell think you there are? Have you no statistical table?
My lord, at the lowest computation, there must be at
least three billion trillion of quintillions.
A mere unit! said Babbalanja. Old man, would
you express an infinite number? Then take the sum of
the follies of Mardi for your multiplicand; and for your
multiplier, the totality of sublunarians, that never have been
heard of since they became no more; and the product shall
exceed your quintillions, even though all their units were
nonillions.
Have done, Babbalanja! cried Media; you are
showing the sinister vein in your marble. Have done.
Take a warm bath, and make tepid your cold blood. But
come, Mohi, tell us of the ways of this Maramma;
something
of the Morai and its idols, if you please.
And straightway Braid-Beard proceeded with a narration,
in substance as follows:
It seems, there was a particular family upon the island,
whose members, for many generations, had been set apart
as sacrifices for the deity called Doleema. They were
marked by a sad and melancholy aspect, and a certain
involuntary
shrinking, when passing the Morai. And though,
when it came to the last, some of these unfortunates went
joyfully to their doom, declaring that they gloried to die in
the service of holy Doleema; still, were there others, who
audaciously endeavored to shun their fate; upon the
approach
of a festival, fleeing to the innermost wilderness of
the island. But little availed their flight. For swift on
their track sped the hereditary butler of the insulted god,
one Xiki, whose duty it was to provide the sacrifices. And
when crouching in some covert, the fugitive spied Xiki's
approach
,
so fearful did he become of the vengeance of the
deity he sought to evade, that renouncing all hope of escape,
he would burst from his lair, exclaiming, Come on, and
kill! baring his breast for the javelin that slew him.
The chronicles of Maramma were full of horrors.
In the wild heart of the island, was said still to lurk the
remnant of a band of warriors, who, in the days of the sire
of the present pontiff, had risen in arms to dethrone him,
headed by Foni, an upstart prophet, a personage distinguished
for the uncommon beauty of his person. With terrible
carnage
,
these warriors had been defeated; and the survivors,
fleeing into the interior, for thirty days were pursued by the
victors. But though many were overtaken and speared, a
number survived; who, at last, wandering forlorn and in
despair, like demoniacs, ran wild in the woods. And the
islanders, who at times penetrated into the wilderness, for
the purpose of procuring rare herbs, often scared from their
path some specter, glaring through the foliage. Thrice had
these demoniacs been discovered prowling about the
inhabited
portions of the isle; and at day-break, an attendant of
the holy Morai once came upon a frightful figure, doubled
with age, helping itself to the offerings in the image of
Doleema. The demoniac was slain; and from his
ineffaceable
tatooing, it was proved that this was no other than
Foni, the false prophet; the splendid form he had carried
into the rebel fight, now squalid with age and misery.
CHAPTER VII.
THEY VISIT THE LAKE OF YAMMO.
From
the Morai, we bent our steps toward an unoccupied
arbor; and here, refreshing ourselves with the viands
presented
by Borabolla, we passed the night. And next
morning
proceeded to voyage round to the opposite quarter of the
island; where, in the sacred lake of Yammo, stood the
famous temple of Oro, also the great gallery of the inferior
deities.
The lake was but a portion of the smooth lagoon, made
separate by an arm of wooded reef, extending from the high
western shore of the island, and curving round toward a
promontory, leaving a narrow channel to the sea, almost
invisible, however, from the land-locked interior.
In this lake were many islets, all green with groves. Its
main-shore was a steep acclivity, with jutting points, each
crowned with mossy old altars of stone, or ruinous temples,
darkly reflected in the green, glassy water; while, from its
long line of stately trees, the low reef-side of the lake looked
one verdant bluff.
Gliding in upon Yammo, its many islets greeted us like a
little Mardi; but ever and anon we started at long lines of
phantoms in the water, reflections of the long line of images
on the shore.
Toward the islet of Dolzono we first directed our way;
and there we beheld the great gallery of the gods; a mighty
temple, resting on one hundred tall pillars of palm, each
based, below the surface, on the buried body of a man; its
nave one vista of idols; names carved on their foreheads:
B*
Ogro, Tripoo, Indrimarvoki, Parzillo, Vivivi, Jojijojorora,
Jorkraki, and innumerable others.
Crowds of attendants were new-grouping the images.
My lord, you behold one of their principal occupations,
said Mohi.
Said Media: I have heard much of the famed image of
Mujo, the Nursing Mother;can you point it out,
Braid-Beard
?
My lord, when last here, I saw Mujo at the head of
this file; but they must have removed it; I see it not
now.
Do these attendants, then, said Babbalanja, so
continually
new-marshal the idols, that visiting the gallery
today
,
you are at a loss to-morrow?
Even so, said Braid-Beard. But behold, my lord,
this image is Mujo.
We stood before an obelisk-idol, so towering, that gazing
at it, we were fain to throw back our heads. According to
Mohi, winding stairs led up through its legs; its abdomen
a cellar, thick-stored with gourds of old wine; its head, a
hollow dome; in rude alto-relievo, its scores of hillock-breasts
were carved over with legions of baby deities, frog-like
sprawling; while, within, were secreted whole litters of
infant idols, there placed, to imbibe divinity from the knots
of the wood.
As we stood, a strange subterranean sound was heard,
mingled with a gurgling as of wine being poured. Looking
up, we beheld, through arrow-slits and port-holes, three
masks, cross-legged seated in the abdomen, and holding stout
wassail. But instantly upon descrying us, they vanished
deeper into the interior; and presently was heard a
sepulchral
chant, and many groans and grievous tribulations.
Passing on, we came to an image, with a long
anacondalike
posterior development, wound round and round its own
neck.
This must be Oloo, the god of Suicides, said Babbalanja.
Yes, said Mohi, you perceive, my lord, how he lays
violent tail upon himself.
At length, the attendants having, in due order, new-d
posed the long lines of sphinxes and griffins, and
many-limbed
images, a band of them, in long flowing robes, began
their morning chant.
Awake Rarni! awake Foloona!
Awake unnumbered deities!
With many similar invocations, to which the images made
not the slightest rejoinder. Not discouraged, however, the
attendants now separately proceeded to offer up petitions on
behalf of various tribes, retaining them for that purpose.
One prayed for abundance of rain, that the yams of
Valapee
might not wilt in the ground; another for dry sunshine,
as most favorable for the present state of the Bread-fruit
crop in Mondoldo.
Hearing all this, Babbalanja thus spoke:Doubtless,
my lord Media, besides these petitions we hear, there are
ten thousand contradictory prayers ascending to these idols.
But methinks the gods will not jar the eternal progression
of things, by any hints from below; even were it possible
to satisfy conflicting desires.
Said Yoomy, But I would pray, nevertheless,
Babbalanja
;
for prayer draws us near to our own souls, and
purifies
our thoughts. Nor will I grant that our supplications
are altogether in vain.
Still wandering among the images, Mohi had much to
say, concerning their respective claims to the reverence of
the devout.
For though, in one way or other, all Mardians bowed to
the supremacy of Oro, they were not so unanimous
concerning
the inferior deities; those supposed to be intermediately
concerned in sublunary things. Some nations sacrificed to
one god; some to another; each maintaining, that their
own god was the most potential.
Observing that all the images were more or less defaced,
Babbalanja sought the reason.
To which, Braid-Beard made answer, that they had been
thus defaced by hostile devotees; who quarreling in the
great gallery of the gods, and getting beside themselves with
rage, often sought to pull down, and demolish each other's
favorite idols.
But behold, cried Babbalanja, there seems not a
single image unmutilated. How is this, old man?
It is thus. While one faction defaces the images of its
adversaries, its own images are in like manner assailed;
whence it comes that no idol escapes.
No more, no more, Braid-Beard, said Media. Let
us depart, and visit the islet, where the god of all these
gods is enshrined.
CHAPTER VIII.
THEY MEET THE PILGRIMS AT THE TEMPLE OF ORO.
Deep
, deep, in deep groves, we found the great temple of
Oro, Spreader-of-the-Sky, and deity supreme.
While here we silently stood eyeing this Mardi-renowned
image, there entered the fane a great multitude of its
attendants
,
holding pearl-shells on their heads, filled with a
burning incense. And ranging themselves in a crowd round
Oro, they began a long-rolling chant, a sea of sounds; and
the thick smoke of their incense went up to the roof.
And now approached Pani and the pilgrims; followed, at
a distance, by the willful boy.
Behold great Oro, said the guide.
We see naught but a cloud, said the chief Divino.
My ears are stunned by the chanting, said the blind
pilgrim.
Receive more gifts, oh guide! cried Fanna the matron.
Oh Oro! invisible Oro! I kneel, slow murmured the
sad-eyed maid.
But now, a current of air swept aside the eddying
incense
;
and the willful boy, all eagerness to behold the image,
went hither and thither; but the gathering of attendants
was great; and at last he exclaimed, Oh Oro! I can not
see thee, for the crowd that stands between thee and me.
Who is this babbler? cried they with the censers, one
and all turning upon the pilgrims; let him speak no more;
but bow down, and grind the dust where he stands; and
declare himself the vilest creature that crawls. So Oro and
Alma command.
I feel nothing in me so utterly vile, said the boy, and
I cringe to none. But I would as lief
adore
your image, as
that in my heart, for both mean the same; but more, how
can I? I love great Oro, though I comprehend him not.
I marvel at his works, and feel as nothing in his sight; but
because he is thus omnipotent, and I a mortal, it follows not
that I am vile. Nor so doth he regard me. We do
ourselves
degrade ourselves, not Oro us. Hath not Oro made
me? And therefore am I not worthy to stand erect before
him? Oro is almighty, but no despot. I wonder; I
hope; I love; I weep; I have in me a feeling nigh to fear,
that is not fear; but wholly vile I am not; nor can we
love and cringe. But Oro knows my heart, which I can
not speak.
Impious boy, cried they with the censers, we will
offer thee up, before the very image thou contemnest. In
the name of Alma, seize him.
And they bore him away unresisting.
Thus perish the ungodly, said Pani to the shuddering
pilgrims.
And they quitted the temple, to journey toward the Peak
of Ofo.
My soul bursts! cried Yoomy. My lord, my lord, let
us save the boy.
Speak not, said Media. His fate is fixed. Let
Mardi stand.
Then let us away from hence, my lord; and join the
pilgrims; for, in these inland vales, the lost one may be
found, perhaps at the very base of Ofo.
Not there; not there; cried Babbalanja, Yillah may
have touched these shores; but long since she must have
fled.
CHAPTER IX.
THEY DISCOURSE OF ALMA.
Sailing
to and fro in the lake, to view its scenery, much
discourse took place concerning the things we had seen;
and far removed from the censer-bearers, the sad fate that
awaited the boy was now the theme of all.
A good deal was then said of Alma, to whom the guide,
the pilgrims, and the censer-bearers had frequently alluded,
as to some paramount authority.
Called upon to reveal what his chronicles said on this
theme, Braid-Bead complied; at great length narrating,
what now follows condensed.
Alma, it seems, was an illustrious prophet, and teacher
divine; who, ages ago, at long intervals, and in various
islands, had appeared to the Mardians under the different
titles of Brami, Manko, and Alma. Many thousands of
moons had elasped since his last and most memorable avatar,
as Alma on the isle of Maramma. Each of his advents
had taken place in a comparatively dark and benighted age.
Hence, it was devoutly believed, that he came to redeem
the Mardians from their heathenish thrall; to instruct them
in the ways of truth, virtue, and happiness; to allure them
to good by promises of beatitude hereafter; and to restrain
them from evil by denunciations of woe. Separated from
the impurities and corruptions, which in a long series of
centuries had become attached to every thing originally
uttered by the prophet, the maxims, which as Brami he had
taught, seemed similar to those inculcated by Manko. But
as Alma, adapting his lessons to the improved condition of
humanity, the divine prophet had more completely unfolded
his scheme; as Alma, he had made his last revelation.
This narration concluded, Babbalanja mildly observed,
Mohi: without seeking to accuse you of uttering
falsehoods
;
since what you relate rests not upon testimony of
your own; permit me, to question the fidelity of your
account
of Alma. The prophet came to dissipate errors, you
say; but superadded to many that have survived the past,
ten thousand others have originated in various constructions
of the principles of Alma himself. The prophet came to do
away all gods but one; but since the days of Alma, the
idols of Maramma have more than quadrupled. The
prophet came to make us Mardians more virtuous and
happy; but along with all previous good, the same wars,
crimes, and miseries, which existed in Alma's day, under
various modifications are yet extant. Nay: take from your
chronicles, Mohi, the history of those horrors, one way or
other, resulting from the doings of Alma's nominal followers,
and your chronicles would not so frequently make mention
of blood. The prophet came to guarantee our eternal
felicity
;
but according to what is held in Maramma, that felicity
rests on so hard a proviso, that to a thinking mind, but very
few of our sinful race may secure it. For one, then, I
wholly reject your Alma; not so much, because of all that
is hard to be understood in his histories; as because of
obvious
and undeniable things all round us; which, to me,
seem at war with an unreserved faith in his doctrines as
premulgated here in Maramma. Besides; every thing in
this isle strengthens my incredulity; I never was so
thorough
a disbeliever as now.
Let the winds be laid, cried Mohi, while your rash
confession is being made in this sacred lake.
Said Media, Philosopher; remember the boy, and they
that seized him.
Ah! I do indeed remember him. Poor youth! in his
agony, how my heart yearned toward his. But that very
prudence which you deny me, my lord, prevented me from
saying aught in his behalf. Have you not observed, that
until now, when we are completely by ourselves, I have
refrained
from freely discoursing of what we have seen in this
island? Trust me, my lord, there is no man, that bears
more in mind the necessity of being either a believer or a
hypocrite in Maramma, and the imminent peril of being
honest here, than I, Babbalanja. And have I not reason
to be wary, when in my boyhood, my own sire was burnt
for his temerity; and in this very isle? Just Oro! it was
done in the name of Alma,what wonder then, that, a
times, I almost hate that sound. And from those flames,
they devoutly swore he went to others,horrible fable!
Said Mohi: Do you deny, then, the everlasting
torments
?
'Tis not worth a denial. Nor by formally denying it,
will I run the risk of shaking the faith of thousands, who in
that pious belief find infinite consolation for all they suffer in
Mardi.
How? said Media; are there those who soothe
themselves
with the thought of everlasting flames?
One would think so, my lord, since they defend that
dogma more resolutely than any other. Sooner will they
yield you the isles of Paradise, than it. And in truth, as
liege followers of Alma, they would seem but right in
clinging
to it as they do; for, according to all one hears in
Maramma
,
the great end of the prophet's mission seems to have
been the revealing to us Mardians the existence of horrors,
most hard to escape. But better we were all annihilated,
than that one man should be damned.
Rejoined Media: But think you not, that possibly,
Alma may have been misconceived? Are you certain that
doctrine is his?
I know nothing more than that such is the belief in
this land. And in these matters, I know not where else to
go for information. But, my lord, had I been living in those
days when certain men are said to have been actually
possessed
by spirits from hell, I had not let slip the opportunity
as our forefathers didto cross-question them concerning
the place they came from.
Well, well, said Media, your Alma's faith concerns
not me: I am a king, and a demi-god; and leave vulgar
torments to the commonality.
But it concerns me, muttered Mohi; yet I know not
what to think.
For me, said Yoomy, I reject it. Could I, I would
not believe it. It is at variance with the dictates of my
heart; instinctively my heart turns from it, as a thirsty
man from gall.
Hush; say no more, said Mohi; again we approach
the shore.
CHAPTER X.
MOHI TELLS OF ONE RAVOO, AND THEY LAND TO VISIT
HEVANEVA, A FLOURISHING ARTISAN.
Having
seen all worth viewing in Yammo, we departed,
to complete the circumnavigation of the island, by returning
to Uma without reversing our prows. As we glided along,
we passed many objects of interest, concerning which, Mohi,
as usual, was very diffuse.
Among other things pointed out, were certain little altars,
like mile-stones, planted here and there upon bright bluffs,
running out into the lagoon. Dedicated respectively to the
guardian spirits of Maramma, these altars formed a chain
of spiritual defenses; and here were presumed to stand post
the most vigilant of warders; dread Hivohitee, all by
himself
,
garrisoning the impregnable interior.
But these sentries were only subalterns, subject to the
beck of the Pontiff; who frequently sent word to them,
concerning
the duties of their watch. His mandates were
intrusted to one Ravoo, the hereditary pontifical messenger;
a long-limbed varlet, so swift of foot, that he was said to
travel like a javelin. Art thou Ravoo, that thou so pliest
thy legs? say these islanders, to one encountered in a hurry.
Hivohitee's postman held no oral communication with
the sentries. Dispatched round the island with divers bits
of tappa, hieroglyphically stamped, he merely deposited one
upon each altar; superadding a stone, to keep the missive
in its place; and so went his rounds.
Now, his route lay over hill and over dale, and over many
a coral rock; and to preserve his feet from bruises, he was
fain to wear a sort of buskin, or boot, fabricated of a durable
tappa, made from the thickest and toughest of fibers. As
he never wore his buskins except when he carried the mail,
Ravoo sorely fretted with his Hessians; though it would
have been highly imprudent to travel without them. To
make the thing more endurable, therefore, and, at intervals,
to cool his heated pedals, he established a series of
stopping-places
,
or stages; at each of which a fresh pair of buskins,
hanging from a tree, were taken down and vaulted into by
the ingenious traveler. Those relays of boots were
exceedingly
convenient; next, indeed, to being lifted upon a fresh
pair of legs.
Now, to what purpose that anecdote? demanded
Babbalanja of Mohi, who in substance related it.
Marry! 'tis but the simple recital of a fact; and I tell
it to entertain the company.
But has it any meaning you know of?
Thou art wise, find out, retorted Braid-Beard.
But what comes of it? persisted Babbalanja.
Beshrew me, this senseless catechising of thine, replied
Mohi; naught else, it seems, save a grin or two.
And pray, what may you be driving at, philosopher?
interrupted Media.
I am intent upon the essence of things; the mystery
that lieth beyond; the elements of the tear which much
laughter provoketh; that which is beneath the seeming; the
precious pearl within the shaggy oyster. I probe the circle's
center; I seek to evolve the inscrutable.
Seek on; and when aught is found, cry out, that we
may run to see.
My lord the king is merry upon me. To him my more
subtle cogitations seem foolishness. But believe me, my
lord, there is more to be thought of than to be seen. There
is a world of wonders insphered within the spontaneous
consciousness
;
or, as old Bardianna hath it, a mystery within
the obvious, yet an obviousness within the mystery.
And did I ever deny that? said Media.
As plain as my hand in the dark, said Mohi.
I dreamed a dream, said Yoomy.
They banter me; but enough; I am to blame for
discoursing
upon the deep world wherein I live. I am wrong
in seeking to invest sublunary sounds with celestial sense.
Much that is in me is incommunicable by this ether we
breathe. But I blame ye not. And wrapping round him
his mantle, Babbalanja retired into its most private folds.
Ere coming in sight of Uma, we put into a little bay, to
pay our respects to Hevaneva, a famous character there
dwelling; who, assisted by many journeymen, carried on the
lucrative business of making idols for the surrounding isles.
Know ye, that all idols not made in Maramma, and
consecrated
by Hivohitee; and, what is more, in strings of teeth
paid down for to Hevaneva; are of no more account, than
longs, stocks, or stones. Yet does not the cunning artificer
monopolize the profits of his vocation; for Hevaneva being
but the vassal of the Pontiff, the latter lays claim to King
Leo's share of the spoils, and secures it.
The place was very prettily lapped in a pleasant dell,
nigh to the margin of the water; and here, were several
spacious arbors; wherein, prostrate upon their sacred faces,
were all manner of idols, in every imaginable stage of
statuary
development.
With wonderful industry the journeymen were plying
their tools;some chiseling noses; some trenching for
mouths; and others, with heated flints, boring for ears: a
hole drilled straight through the occiput, representing the
auricular organs.
How easily they are seen through, said Babbalanja,
taking a sight through one of the heads.
The last finish is given to their godships, by rubbing
them all over with dried slips of consecrated shark-skin,
rough as sand paper, tacked over bits of wood.
In one of the farther arbors, Hevaneva pointed out a
goodly array of idols, all complete and ready for the market.
They were of every variety of pattern; and of every size;
from that of a giant, to the little images worn in the ears
of the ultra devout.
Of late, said the artist, there has been a lively
demand
for the image of Arbino the god of fishing; the
present
being the principal season for that business. For
Nadams
(Nadam presides over love and wine), there has also
been urgent call; it being the time of the grape; and the
maidens growing frolicsome withal, and devotional.
Seeing that Hevaneva handled his wares with much
familiarity, not to say irreverence, Babbalanja was minded
to learn from him, what he thought of his trade; whether
the images he made were genuine or spurious; in a word,
whether he believed in his gods.
His reply was curious. But still more so, the marginal
gestures wherewith he helped out the text.
When I cut down the trees for my idols, said he,
they are nothing but logs; when upon those logs, I chalk
out the figures of my images, they yet remain logs; when
the chisel is applied, logs they are still; and when all
complete
,
I at last stand them up in my studio, even then they
are logs. Nevertheless, when I handle the pay, they are
as prime gods, as ever were turned out in Maramma.
You must make a very great variety, said Babbalanja.
All sorts, all sorts.
And from the same material, I presume.
Ay, ay, one grove supplies them all. And, on an
average
,
each tree stands us in full fifty idols. Then, we often
take second-hand images in part pay for new ones. These
we work over again into new patterns; touching up their
eyes and ears; resetting their noses; and more especially
new-footing their legs, where they always decay first.
Under sanction of the Pontiff, Hevaneva, in addition to
his large commerce in idols, also carried on the highly
lucrative
business of canoe-building; the profits whereof,
undivided
,
he dropped into his private exchequer. But Mohi
averred, that the Pontiff often charged him with neglecting
his images, for his canoes. Be that as it may, Hevaneva
drove a thriving trade at both avocations. And in
demonstration
of the fact, he directed our attention to three long
rows of canoes, upheld by wooden supports. They were in
perfect order; at a moment's notice, ready for launching;
being furnished with paddles, out-riggers, masts, sails, and a
human skull, with a short handle thrust through one of its
eyes, the ordinary bailer of Maramma; besides other
appurtenances
,
including on the prow a duodecimo idol to match.
Owing to a superstitious preference bestowed upon the
wood and work of the sacred island, Hevaneva's canoes
were in as high repute as his idols; and sold equally well.
In truth, in several ways one trade helped the other.
The larger images being dug out of the hollow part of the
canoes; and all knotty odds and ends reserved for the idol
ear-rings.
But after all, said the artificer, I find a readier sale
for my images, than for my canoes.
And so it will ever be, said Babbalanja.Stick to thy
idols, man! a trade, more reliable than the baker's.
CHAPTER XI.
A NURSERY-TALE OF BABBALANJA'S.
Having
taken to our canoes once again, we were silently
sailing along, when Media observed, Babbalanja; though
I seldom trouble myself with such thoughts, I have just been
thinking, how difficult it must be, for the more ignorant sort
of people, to decide upon what particular image to worship
as a guardian deity, when in Maramma, it seems, there
exists such a multitude of idols, and a thousand more are to
be heard of.
Not at all, your highness. The more ignorant the
better
.
The multitude of images distracts them not. But I
am in no mood for serious discourse; let me tell you a story.
A story! hear him: the solemn philosopher is
desirous
of regaling us with a tale! But pray, begin.
Once upon a time, then, said Babbalanja, indifferently
adjusting his girdle, nine blind men, with uncommonly
long noses, set out on their travels to see the great island
on which they were born.
A precious beginning, muttered Mohi. Nine blind
men setting out to see sights.
Continued Babbalanja, Staff in hand, they traveled;
one in advance of the other; each man with his palm upon
the shoulder next him; and he with the longest nose took
the lead of the file. Journeying on in this manner, they
came to a valley, in which reigned a king called Tammaro.
Now, in a certain inclosure toward the head of the valley,
there stood an immense wild banian tree; all over moss,
and many centuries old, and forming quite a wood in itself;
its thousand boughs striking into the earth, and fixing there
as many gigantic trunks. With Tammaro, it had long been
a question, which of those many trunks was the original and
true one; a matter that had puzzled the wisest heads among
his subjects; and in vain had a reward been offered for the
solution of the perplexity. But the tree was so vast, and
its fabric so complex; and its rooted branches so similar in
appearance; and so numerous, from the circumstance that
every year had added to them, that it was quite impossible
to determine the point. Nevertheless, no sooner did the
nine blind men hear that there was a reward offered for
discovering
the trunk of a tree, standing all by itself, than, one
and all, they assured Tammaro, that they would quickly
settle that little difficulty of his; and loudly inveighed
against the stupidity of his sages, who had been so easily
posed. So, being conducted into the inclosure, and assured
that the tree was somewhere within, they separated their
forces, so as at wide intervals to surround it at a distance;
when feeling their way, with their staves and their noses,
they advanced to the search, crying out`Pshaw! make
room there; let us wise men feel of the mystery.'
Presently
,
striking with his nose one of the rooted branches, the
foremost blind man quickly knelt down; and feeling that it
struck into the earth, gleefully shouted:`Here it is! here
it is!' But almost in the same breath, his companions, also,
each striking a branch with his staff or his nose, cried out in
like manner, `Here it is! here it is!' Whereupon they
were all confounded: but directly, the man who first cried
out, thus addressed the rest:`Good friends, surely you're
mistaken. There is but one tree in the place, and here it
is.' `Very true,' said the others, `all together; there is only
one
tree; but
here
it is.' `Nay,' said the others, `it is
here!
'
and so saying, each blind man triumphantly felt of the branch,
where it penetrated into the earth. Then again said the first
speaker:`Good friends, if you will not believe what I say,
come hither, and feel for yourselves.' `Nay, nay,' replied they,
vol. ii.C
`why seek further?
here
it is; and nowhere else can it be.'
`You blind fools, you, you contradict yourselves,' continued
the first speaker, waxing wroth; `how can you each have
hold of a separate trunk, when there is but one in the place?'
Whereupon, they redoubled their cries, calling each other all
manner of opprobrious names, and presently they fell to
beating each other with their staves, and charging upon each
other with their noses. But soon after, being loudly called
upon by Tammaro and his people; who all this while had
been looking on; being loudly called upon, I say, to clap
their hands on the trunk, they again rushed for their
respective
branches; and it so happened, that, one and all, they
changed places; but still cried out, `
Here
it is;
here
it is!'
`Peace! peace! ye silly blind men,' said Tammaro. `Will
ye without eyes presume to see more sharply than those who
have them? The tree is too much for us all. Hence!
depart from the valley.'
An admirable story, cried Media. I had no idea that
a mere mortal, least of all a philosopher, could acquit
himself
so well. By my scepter, but it is well done! Ha, ha!
blind men round a banian! Why, Babbalanja, no demi-god
could surpass it. Taji, could you?
But, Babbalanja, what under the sun, mean you by
your blind story! cried Mohi. Obverse, or reverse, I can
make nothing out of it.
Others may, said Babbalanja. It is a polysensuum,
old man.
A pollywog! said Mohi.
CHAPTER XII.
LANDING TO VISIT HIVOHITEE THE PONTIFF, THEY ENCOUNTER
AN EXTRAORDINARY OLD HERMIT; WITH WHOM YOOMY HAS
A CONFIDENTIAL INTERVIEW, BUT LEARNS LITTLE.
Gliding
on, suddenly we spied a solitary Islander putting
out in his canoe from a neighboring cove.
Drawing near, the stranger informed us, that he was just
from the face of the great Pontiff, Hivohitee, who, having
dismissed his celestial guests, had retired to his private
sanctuary
.
Upon this, Media resolved to land forthwith, and
under the guidance of Mohi, proceed inland, and pay a visit
to his Holiness.
Quitting the beach, our path penetrated into the solitudes
of the groves. Skirting the way were tall Casaurinas, a
species of cypress, standing motionless in the shadows, as
files of mutes at a funeral. But here and there, they were
overrun with the adventurous vines of the Convolvulus, the
Morning-glory of the Tropics, whose tendrils, bruised by the
twigs, dropped milk upon the dragon-like scales of the trees.
This vine is of many varieties. Lying perdu, and
shunning
the garish sun through the day, one species rises at
night with the stars; bursting forth in dazzling constellations
of blossoms, which close at dawn. Others, slumbering
through the darkness, are up and abroad with their petals,
by peep of morn; and after inhaling its breath, again drop
their lids in repose. While a third species, more capricious,
refuse to expand at all, unless in the most brilliant sunshine,
and upon the very tops of the loftiest trees. Ambitious
flowers! that will not blow, unless in high places, with the
bright day looking on and admiring.
Here and there, we passed open glades in the woods,
delicious
with the incense of violets. Balsamic ferns, stirred
by the breeze, fanned all the air with aromas. These glades
were delightful.
Journeying on, we at length came to a dark glen so deftly
hidden by the surrounding copses, that were it not for the
miasma thence wafted, an ignorant wayfarer might pass and
repass it, time and again, never dreaming of its vicinity.
Down into the gloom of this glen we descended. Its
sides were mantled with noxious shrubs, whose exhalations,
half way down, unpleasantly blended with the piny breeze
from the uplands. Through its bed ran a brook, whose
incrusted
margin had a strange metallic luster, from the
polluted
waters here flowing; their source a sulphur spring, of
vile flavor and odor, where many invalid pilgrims resorted.
The woods all round were haunted by the dismal
cawings
of crows; tap, tap, the black hawk whetted his bill on
the boughs; each trunk stalked a ghost; and from those
trunks, Hevaneva procured the wood for his idols.
Rapidly crossing this place, Yoomy's hands to his ears,
old Mohi's to his nostrils, and Babbalanja vainly trying to
walk with closed eyes, we toiled among steep, flinty rocks,
along a wild, zigzag pathway; like a mule-track in the
Andes, not so much onward as upward; Yoomy above
Babbalanja
,
my lord Media above him, and Braid-Beard, our
guide, in the air, above all.
Strown over with cinders, the viterous marl seemed
tumbled
together, as if belched from a volcano's throat.
Presently, we came to a tall, slender structure, hidden
among the scenic projections of the cliffs, like a monument
in the dark, vaulted ways of an abbey. Surrounding it,
were five extinct craters. The air was sultry and still, as
if full of spent thunderbolts.
Like a Hindoo pagoda, this bamboo edifice rose story
above story; its many angles and points decorated with
pearl-shells suspended by cords. But the uppermost story,
some ten toises in the air, was closely thatched from apex to
floor; which summit was gained by a series of ascents.
What eremite dwelleth here, like St. Stylites at the top
of his column?a question which Mohi seemed all
eagerness
to have answered.
Dropping upon his knees, he gave a peculiar low call:
no response. Another: all was silent. Marching up to
the pagoda, and again dropping upon his knees, he shook
the bamboos till the edifice rocked, and its pearl-shells
jingled
,
as if a troop of Andalusian mules, with bells round their
necks, were galloping along the defile.
At length the thatch aloft was thrown open, and a head
was thrust forth. It was that of an old, old man; with
steel-gray eyes, hair and beard, and a horrible necklace of
jaw-bones.
Now, issuing from the pagoda, Mohi turned about to gain
a view of the ghost he had raised; and no sonner did he
behold it, than with King Media and the rest, he made a
marked salutation.
Presently, the eremite pointed to where Yoomy was
standing; and waved his hand upward; when Mohi
informed
the minstrel, that it was St. Stylites' pleasure, that
he should pay him a visit.
Wondering what was to come, Yoomy proceeded to mount;
and at last arriving toward the top of the pagoda, was met
by an opening, from which an encouraging arm assisted him
to gain the ultimate landing.
Here, all was murky enough; for the aperture from which
the head of the apparition had been thrust, was now closed;
and what little twilight there was, came up through the
opening in the floor.
In this dismal seclusion, silently the hermit confronted the
minstrel; his gray hair, eyes, and beard all gleaming, as if
streaked with phosphorus; while his ghastly gorget grinned
hideously, with all its jaws.
Mutely Yoomy waited to be addressed; but hearing no
sound, and becoming alive to the strangeness of his situation,
he meditated whether it would not be well to subside out
of sight, even as he had comethrough the floor. An
intention
which the eremite must have anticipated; for of a
sudden, something was slid over the opening; and the
apparition
seating itself thereupon, the twain were in darkness
complete.
Shut up thus, with an inscrutable stranger posted at the
only aperture of escape, poor Yoomy fell into something like
a panic; hardly knowing what step to take next. As for
endeavoring to force his way out, it was alarming to think
of; for aught he knew, the eremite, availing himself of the
gloom, might be bristling all over with javelin points.
At last, the silence was broken.
What see you, mortal?
Chiefly darkness, said Yoomy, wondering at the
audacity
of the question.
I dwell in it. But what else see you, mortal?
The dim gleaming of thy gorget.
But that is not me. What else dost thou see?
Nothing.
Then thou hast found me out, and seen all! Descend.
And with that, the passage-way opened, and groping
through the twilight, Yoomy obeyed the mandate, and
retreated
;
full of vexation at his enigmatical reception.
On his alighting, Mohi inquired whether the hermit was
not a wonderful personage.
But thinking some sage waggery lurked in the question;
and at present too indignant to enter into details, the
minstrel
made some impatient reply; and winding through a
defile, the party resumed its journey.
Straggling behind, to survey the strange plants and
flowers
in his path, Yoomy became so absorbed, as almost to
forget
the scene in the pagoda; yet every moment expected to
be nearing the stately abode of the Pontiff.
But suddenly, the scene around grew familiar; the path
seemed that which had been followed just after leaving the
canoes; and at length, the place of debarkation was in sight.
Surprised that the object of our visit should have been
thus abandoned, the minstrel ran forward, and sought an
explanation.
Whereupon, Mohi lifted his hands in amazement;
exclaiming
at the blindness of the eyes, which had beheld the
supreme Pontiff of Maramma, without knowing it.
The old hermit was no other than the dread Hivohitee;
the pagoda, the inmost oracle of the isle.
CHAPTER XIII.
BABBALANJA ENDEAVORS TO EXPLAIN THE MYSTERY.
This
Great Mogul of a personage, then; this woundy
Ahasuerus; this man of men; this same Hivohitee, whose
name rumbled among the mountains like a peal of thunder,
had been seen face to face, and taken for naught, but a
bearded old hermit, or at best, some equivocal conjuror.
So great was his wonderment at the time, that Yoomy
could not avoid expressing it in words.
Whereupon thus discoursed Babbalanja:
Gentle Yoomy, be not astounded, that Hivohitee is so
far behind your previous conceptions. The shadows of
things are greater than themselves; and the more
exaggerated
the shadow, the more unlike to the substance.
But knowing now, what manner of person Hivohitee
is, said Yoomy, much do I long to behold him again.
But Mohi assured him it was out of the question; that
the Pontiff always acted toward strangers as toward him
(Yoomy); and that but one dim blink at the eremite was
all that mortal could obtain.
Debarred thus from a second and more satisfactory
interview
with one, concerning whom his curiosity had been
violently aroused, the minstrel again turned to Mohi for
enlightenment
;
especially touching that magnate's Egyptian
reception of him in his aerial den.
Whereto, the chronicler made answer, that the Pontiff
affected darkness because he liked it: that he was a ruler
of few words, but many deeds; and that, had Yoomy been
permitted to tarry longer with him in the pagoda, he would
have been privy to many strange attestations of the divinity
imputed to him. Voices would have been heard in the air,
gossiping with Hivohitee; noises inexplicable proceeding
from him; in brief, light would have flashed out of his
darkness.
But who has seen these things, Mohi? said
Babbalanja
,
have you?
Nay.
Who then?Media?Any one you know?
Nay: but the whole Archipelago has.
Thus, exclaimed Babbalanja, does Mardi, blind
though it be in many things, collectively behold the marvels,
which one pair of eyes sees not.
C*
CHAPTER XIV.
TAJI RECEIVES TIDINGS AND OMENS.
Slowly
sailing on, we were overtaken by a shallop; whose
inmates grappling to the side of Media's, said they came
from Borabolla.
Dismal tidings!My faithful follower's death.
Absent over night, that morning early, he had been
discovered
lifeless in the woods, three arrows in his heart.
And the three pale strangers were nowhere to be found.
But a fleet canoe was missing from the beach.
Slain for me! my soul sobbed out. Nor yet appeased
Aleema's manes; nor yet seemed sated the avengers' malice;
who, doubtless, were on my track.
But I turned; and instantly the three canoes had been
reversed; and full soon, Jarl's dead hand in mine, had not
Media interposed.
To death, your presence will not bring life back.
And we must on, said Babbalanja. We seek the
living, not the dead.
Thus they overruled me; and Borabolla's messengers
departed.
Soon evening came, and in its shades, three shadows,
Hautia's heralds.
Their shallop glided near.
A leaf tri-foiled was first presented; then another,
arrow-shaped
.
Said Yoomy, Still I swiftly follow, behind revenge
Then were showered faded, pallid daffodils.
Said Yoomy, Thy hopes are blighted all.
Not dead, but living with the life of life. Sirens! I
heed ye not.
They would have showered more flowers; but crowding
sail we left them.
Much converse followed. Then, beneath the canopy all
sought repose. And ere long slouched sleep drew nigh,
tending dreams innumerable; silent dotting all the downs;
a shepherd with his flock.
CHAPTER XV.
DREAMS.
Dreams
! dreams! golden dreams: endless, and golden, as
the flowery prairies, that stretch away from the Rio
Sacramento
,
in whose waters Danae's shower was woven;
prairies
like rounded eternities: jonquil leaves beaten out; and
my dreams herd like buffaloes, browsing on to the horizon, and
browsing on round the world; and among them, I dash
with my lance, to spear one, ere they all flee.
Dreams! dreams! passing and repassing, like Oriental
empires in history; and scepters wave thick, as Bruce's
pikes at Bannockburn; and crowns are plenty as marigolds
in June. And far in the background, hazy and blue, their
steeps let down from the sky, loom Andes on Andes, rooted
on Alps; and all round me, long rushing oceans, roll
Amazons
and Oronocos; waves, mounted Parthians; and, to and
fro, toss the wide woodlands: all the world an elk, and the
forests its antlers.
But far to the South, past my Sicily suns and my
vineyards
,
stretches the Antarctic barrier of ice: a China wall,
built up from the sea, and nodding its frosted towers in the
dun, clouded sky. Do Tartary and Siberia lie beyond?
Deathful, desolate dominions those; bleak and wild the
ocean, beating at that barrier's base, hovering 'twixt
freezing
and foaming; and freighted with navies of ice-bergs,
warring worlds crossing orbits; their long icicles, projecting
like spears to the charge. Wide away stream the floes of
drift ice, frozen cemeteries of skeletons and bones. White
bears howl as they drift from their cubs; and the grinding
islands crush the skulls of the peering seals.
But beneath me, at the Equator, the earth pulses and
beats like a warrior's heart; till I know not, whether it be
not myself. And my soul sinks down to the depths, and
soars to the skies; and comet-like reels on through such
boundless expanses, that methinks all the worlds are my
kin, and I invoke them to stay in their course. Yet, like a
mighty three-decker, towing argosies by scores, I tremble,
gasp, and strain in my flight, and fain would cast off the
cables that hamper.
And like a frigate, I am full with a thousand souls; and
as on, on, on, I scud before the wind, many mariners rush
up from the orlop below, like miners from caves; running
shouting across my decks; opposite braces are pulled; and
this way and that, the great yards swing round on their
axes; and boisterous speaking-trumpets are heard; and
contending orders, to save the good ship from the shoals.
Shoals, like nebulous vapors, shoreing the white reef of the
Milky Way, against which the wrecked worlds are dashed;
strowing all the strand, with their Himmaleh keels and ribs.
Ay: many, many souls are in me. In my tropical calms,
when my ship lies tranced on Eternity's main, speaking one
at a time, then all with one voice: an orchestra of many
French bugles and horns, rising, and falling, and swaying,
in golden calls and responses.
Sometimes, when these Atlantics and Pacifics thus
undulate
round me, I lie stretched out in their midst: a
land-locked
Mediterranean, knowing no ebb, nor flow. Then
again, I am dashed in the spray of these sounds: an eagle at
the world's end, tossed skyward, on the horns of the tempest.
Yet, again, I descend, and list to the concert.
Like a grand, ground swell, Homer's old organ rolls its
vast volumes under the light frothy wave-crests of Anacreon
and Hafiz; and high over my ocean, sweet Shakespeare
soars, like all the larks of the spring. Throned on my
seaside
,
like Canute, bearded Ossian smites his hoar harp,
wreathed with wild-flowers, in which warble my Wallers;
blind Milton sings bass to my Petrarchs and Priors, and
laureats crown me with bays.
In me, many worthies recline, and converse. I list to
St. Paul who argues the doubts of Montaigne; Julian the
Apostate cross-questions Augustine; and Thomas-a-Kempis
unrolls his old black letters for all to decipher. Zeno
murmurs
maxims beneath the hoarse shout of Democritus; and
though Democritus laugh loud and long, and the sneer of
Pyrrho be seen; yet, divine Plato, and Proclus, and
Verulam
are of my counsel; and Zoroaster whispered me before
I was born. I walk a world that is mine; and enter
many nations, as Mungo Park rested in African cots; I am
served like Bajazet: Bacchus my butler, Virgil my minstrel,
Philip Sidney my page. My memory is a life beyond birth;
my memory, my library of the Vatican, its alcoves all
endless
perspectives, eve-tinted by cross-lights from Middle-Age
oriels.
And as the great Mississippi musters his watery nations:
Ohio, with all his leagued streams; Missouri, bringing down
in torrents the clans from the highlands; Arkansas, his
Tartar rivers from the plain;so, with all the past and
present pouring in me, I roll down my billow from afar.
Yet not I, but another: God is my Lord; and though
many satellites revolve around me, I and all mine revolve
round the great central Truth, sun-like, fixed and luminous
forever in the foundationless firmament.
Fire flames on my tongue; and though of old the
Bactrian
prophets were stoned, yet the stoners in oblivion sleep.
But whoso stones me, shall be as Erostratus, who put torch
to the temple; though Genghis Khan with Cambyses
combine
to obliterate him, his name shall be extant in the mouth
of the last man that lives. And if so be, down unto death,
whence I came, will I go, like Xenophon retreating on
Greece, all Persia brandishing her spears in his rear.
My cheek blanches white while I write; I start at the
scratch of my pen; my own mad brood of eagles devours me;
fain would I unsay this audacity; but an iron-mailed hand
clenches mine in a vice, and prints down every letter in
my spite. Fain would I hurl off this Dionysius that rides
me; my thoughts crush me down till I groan; in far fields
I hear the song of the reaper, while I slave and faint in
this cell. The fever runs through me like lava; my hot
brain burns like a coal; and like many a monarch, I am less
to be envied, than the veriest hind in the land.
CHAPTER XVI.
MEDIA AND BABBALANJA DISCOURSE.
Our
visiting the Pontiff at a time previously unforeseen,
somewhat altered our plans. All search in Maramma for
the lost one proving fruitless, and nothing of note remaining
to be seen, we returned not to Uma; but proceeded with
the tour of the lagoon.
When day came, reclining beneath the canopy,
Babbalanja
would fain have seriously discussed those things we
had lately been seeing, which, for all the occasional levity
he had recently evinced, seemed very near his heart.
But my lord Media forbade; saying that they
necessarily
included a topic which all gay, sensible Mardians, who
desired to live and be merry, invariably banished from social
discourse.
Meditate as much as you will, Babbalanja, but say
little aloud, unless in a merry and mythical way. Lay down
the great maxims of things, but let inferences take care
of themselves. Never be special; never, a partisan. In
safety, afar off, you may batter down a fortress; but at your
peril you essay to carry a single turret by escalade. And if
doubts distract you, in vain will you seek sympathy from
your fellow men. For upon this one theme, not a few of
you free-minded mortals, even the otherwise honest and
intelligent
,
are the least frank and friendly. Discourse with them,
and it is mostly formulas, or prevarications, or hollow
assumption
of philosophical indifference, or urbane hypocrisies,
or a cool, civil deference to the dominant belief; or still
worse, but less common, a brutality of indiscriminate
skepticism
.
Furthermore, Babbalanja, on this head, final, last
thoughts you mortals have none; nor can have; and, at
bottom, your own fleeting fancies are too often secrets to
yourselves; and sooner may you get another's secret, than
your own. Thus with the wisest of you all; you are ever
unfixed. Do you show a tropical calm without? then, be
sure a thousand contrary currents whirl and eddy within.
The free, airy robe of your philosophy is but a dream, which
seems true while it lasts; but waking again into the
orthodox
world, straightway you resume the old habit. And
though in your dreams you may hie to the uttermost Orient,
yet all the while you abide where you are. Babbalanja,
you mortals dwell in Mardi, and it is impossible to get
elsewhere
.
Said Babbalanja, My lord, you school me. But though
I dissent from some of your positions, I am willing to
confess
,
that this is not the first time a philosopher has been
instructed by a man.
A demi-god, sir; and therefore I the more readily
discharge
my mind of all seriousness, touching the subject, with
which you mortals so vex and torment yourselves.
Silence ensued. And seated apart, on both sides of the
barge, solemnly swaying, in fixed meditation, to the roll of
the waves, Babbalanja, Mohi, and Yoomy, drooped lower
and lower, like funeral plumes; and our gloomy canoe
seemed a hearse.
CHAPTER XVII.
THEY REGALE THEMSELVES WITH THEIR PIPES.
Ho
! mortals! mortals! cried Media. Go we to
bury our dead? Awake, sons of men! Cheer up, heirs of
immortality! Ho, Vee-Vee! bring forth our pipes: we'll
smoke off this cloud.
Nothing so beguiling as the fumes of tobacco, whether
inhaled through hookah, narghil, chibouque, Dutch porcelain,
pure Principe, or Regalia. And a great oversight had it been
in King Media, to have omitted pipes among the appliances
of this voyage that we went. Tobacco in rouleaus we had
none; cigar nor cigarret; which little the company esteemed.
Pipes were preferred; and pipes we often smoked; testify,
oh! Vee-Vee, to that. But not of the vile clay, of which
mankind and Etruscan vases were made, were these jolly
fine pipes of ours. But all in good time.
Now, the leaf called tobacco is of divers species and sorts.
Not to dwell upon vile Shag, Pig-tail, Plug, Nail-rod,
Negro-head
,
Cavendish, and misnamed Lady's-twist, there are
the following varieties:Gold-leaf, Oronoco, Cimaroza,
Smyrna, Bird's-eye, James-river, Sweet-scented, Honey-dew,
Kentucky, Cnaster, Scarfalati, and famed Shiraz, or
Persian
.
Of all of which, perhaps the last is the best.
But smoked by itself, to a fastidious wight, even Shiraz
is not gentle enough. It needs mitigation. And the
cunning
craft of so mitigating even the mildest tobacco was well
understood in the dominions of Media. There, in
plantations
ever covered with a brooding, blue haze, they raised
its fine leaf in the utmost luxuriance; almost as broad as the
broad fans of the broad-bladed banana. The stalks of the
leaf withdrawn, the remainder they cut up, and mixed with
soft willow-bark, and the aromatic leaves of the Betel.
Ho! Vee-Vee, bring forth the pipes, cried Media.
And forth they came, followed by a quaint, carved
cocoanut
,
agate-lidded, containing ammunition sufficient for many
stout charges and primings.
Soon we were all smoking so hard, that the canopied
howdah, under which we reclined, sent up purple wreaths
like a Michigan wigwam. There we sat in a ring, all
smoking in councilevery pipe a halcyon pipe of peace.
And among those calumets, my lord Media's showed like
the turbaned Grand Turk among his Bashaws. It was an
extraordinary pipe, be sure; of right royal dimensions. Its
mouth-piece an eagle's beak; its long stem, a bright,
red-barked
cherry-tree branch, partly covered with a close
network
of purple dyed porcupine quills; and toward the upper
end, streaming with pennons, like a Versailles flag-staff of
a coronation day. These pennons were managed by
halyards
;
and after lighting his prince's pipe, it was little
Vee-Vee's
part to run them up toward the mast-head, or
mouth-piece
,
in token that his lord was fairly under weigh.
But Babbalanja's was of a different sort; an immense,
black, serpentine stem of ebony, coiling this way and that,
in endless convolutions, like an anaconda round a traveler
in Brazil. Smoking this hydra, Babbalanja looked as if
playing upon the trombone.
Next, gentle Yoomy's. Its stem, a slender golden reed,
like musical Pan's; its bowl very merry with tassels.
Lastly, old Mohi the chronicler's. Its Death's-head
bowl forming its latter end, continually reminding him of
his own. Its shank was an ostrich's leg, some feathers still
waving nigh the mouth-piece.
Here, Vee-Vee! fill me up again, cried Media, through
the blue vapors sweeping round his great gonfalon, like
plumed Marshal Ney, waving his baton in the smoke of
Waterloo; or thrice gallant Anglesea, crossing his wooden
eg mid the reek and rack of the Apsley House banquet.
Vee-Vee obeyed; and quickly, like a howitzer, the
pipe-owl
was reloaded to the muzzle, and King Media smoked on.
Ah! this is pleasant indeed, he cried. Look, it's a
calm on the waters, and a calm in our hearts, as we inhale
these sedative odors.
So calm, said Babbalanja; the very gods must be
smoking now.
And thus, said Media, we demi-gods hereafter shall
cross-legged sit, and smoke out our eternities. Ah, what a
glorious puff! Mortals, methinks these pipe-bowls of ours
must be petrifactions of roses, so scented they seem. But,
old Mohi, you have smoked this many a long year;
doubtless
,
you know something about their materialthe
Froth-of-the-Sea
they call it, I thinkere my handicraft subjects
obtain it, to work into bowls. Tell us the tale.
Delighted to do so, my lord, replied Mohi, slowly
disentangling
his mouth-piece from the braids of his beard. I
have devoted much time and attention to the study of
pipe-bowls
,
and groped among many learned authorities, to
reconcile
the clashing opinions concerning the origin of the so-called
Farnoo, or Froth-of-the-Sea.
Well, then, my old centenarian, give us the result of
your investigations. But smoke away: a word and a puff:
go on.
May it please you, then, my right worshipful lord, this
Farnoo is an unctuous, argillaceous substance; in its natural
state, soft, malleable, and easily worked as the cornelian-red
clay from the famous pipe-quarries of the wild tribes to the
North. But though mostly found buried in terra-firma,
especially in the isles toward the East, this Farnoo, my lord,
is sometimes thrown up by the ocean; in seasons of high sea,
being plentifully found on the reefs. But, my lord, like
amber, the precise nature and origin of this Farnoo are
points widely mooted.
Stop there! cried Media; our mouth-pieces are of
amber; so, not a word more of the Froth-of-the-Sea, until
something be said to clear up the mystery of amber. What
is amber, old man?
A still more obscure thing to trace than the other, my
worshipful lord. Ancient Plinnee maintained, that
originally
it must be a juice, exuding from balsam firs and pines;
Borhavo, that, like camphor, it is the crystalized oil of
aromatic ferns; Berzilli, that it is the concreted scum of the
lake Cephioris; and Vondendo, against scores of antagonists,
stoutly held it a sort of bituminous gold, trickling from
antediluvian smugglers' caves, nigh the sea.
Why, old Braid-Beard, cried Media, placing his pipe
in rest, you are almost as erudite as our philosopher here.
Much more so, my lord, said Babbalanja; for Mohi
has somehow picked up all my worthless forgettings, which
are more than my valuable rememberings.
What say you, wise one? cried Mohi, shaking his
braids, like an enraged elephant with many trunks.
Said Yoomy: My lord, I have heard that amber is
nothing less than the congealed tears of broken-hearted
mermaids
.
Absurd, minstrel, cried Mohi. Hark ye; I know
what it is. All other authorities to the contrary, amber is
nothing more than gold-fishes' brains, made waxy, then
firm, by the action of the sea.
Nonsense! cried Yoomy.
My lord, said Braid-Beard, waving his pipe, this
thing is just as I say. Imbedded in amber, do we not find
little fishes' fins, porpoise-teeth, sea-gulls' beaks and claws;
nay, butterflies' wings, and sometimes a topaz? And how
could that be, unless the substance was first soft? Amber
is gold-fishes' brains, I say.
For one, said Babbalanja, I'll not believe that, till
you prove to me, Braid-Beard, that ideas themselves are
found imbedded therein.
Another of your crazy conceits, philosopher, replied
Mohi, disdainfully; yet, sometimes plenty of strange
black-letter
characters have been discovered in amber. And
throwing back his hoary old head, he jetted forth his vapors
like a whale.
Indeed? cried Babbalanja. Then, my lord Media,
it may be earnestly inquired, whether the gentle laws of the
tribes before the flood, were not sought to be embalmed and
perpetuated between transparent and sweet scented tablets
of amber.
That, now, is not so unlikely, said Mohi; for old
King Rondo the Round once set about getting him a
coffinlid
of amber; much desiring a famous mass of it owned by
the ancestors of Donjalolo of Juam. But no navies could
buy it. So Rondo had himself urned in a crystal.
And that immortalized Rondo, no doubt, said
Babbalanja
.
Ha! ha! pity he fared not like the fat porpoise
frozen and tombed in an iceberg; its icy shroud drifting
south, soon melted away, and down, out of sight, sunk the
dead.
Well, so much for amber, cried Media. Now,
Mohi, go on about Farnoo.
Know, then, my lord, that Farnoo is more like
ambergris
than amber.
Is it? then, pray, tell us something on that head. You
know all about ambergris, too, I suppose.
Every thing about all things, my lord. Ambergris is
found both on land and at sea. But especially, are lumps
of it picked up on the spicy coasts of Jovanna; indeed, all
over the atolls and reefs in the eastern quarter of Mardi.
But
what
is this ambergris? Braid-Beard, said
Babbalanja
.
Aquovi, the chymist, pronounced it the fragments of
mushrooms growing at the bottom of the sea; Voluto held,
that like naptha, it springs from fountains down there. But
it is neither.
I have heard, said Yoomy, that it is the honey-comb
of bees, fallen from flowery cliffs into the brine.
Nothing of the kind, said Mohi. Do I not know all
about it, minstrel? Ambergris is the petrified gall-stones of
crocodiles.
What! cried Babbalanja, comes sweet scented
ambergris
from those musky and chain-plated river cavalry?
No wonder, then, their flesh is so fragrant; their upper
jaws as the visors of vinaigrettes.
Nay, you are all wrong, cried King Media
Then, laughing to himself:It's pleasant to sit by, a
demi-god, and hear the surmisings of mortals, upon things
they know nothing about; theology, or amber, or ambergris,
it's all the same. But then, did I always out with every
thing I know, there would be no conversing with these
comical
creatures.
Listen, old Mohi; ambergris is a morbid secretion of
the Spermaceti whale; for like you mortals, the whale is
at times a sort of hypochondriac and dyspeptic. You must
know, subjects, that in antediluvian times, the Spermaceti
whale was much hunted by sportsmen, that being accounted
better pastime, than pursuing the Behemoths on shore.
Besides
,
it was a lucrative diversion. Now, sometimes upon
striking the monster, it would start off in a dastardly fright,
leaving certain fragments in its wake. These fragments the
hunters picked up, giving over the chase for a while. For
in those days, as now, a quarter-quintal of ambergris was
more valuable than a whole ton of spermaceti.
Nor, my lord, said Babbalanja, would it have been
wise to kill the fish that dropped such treasures: no more
than to murder the noddy that laid the golden eggs.
Beshrew me! a noddy it must have been, gurgled
Mohi through his pipe-stem, to lay golden eggs for others
to hatch.
Come, no more of that now, cried Media. Mohi,
how long think you, may one of these pipe-bowls last?
My lord, like one's cranium, it will endure till broken.
I have smoked this one of mine more than half a century.
But unlike our craniums, stocked full of concretions,
said Babbalanja, our pipe-bowls never need clearing out.
True, said Mohi, they absorb the oil of the smoke,
instead of allowing it offensively to incrust.
Ay, the older the better, said Media, and the more
delicious the flavor imparted to the fumes inhaled.
Farnoos forever! my lord, cried Yoomy. By much
smoking, the bowl waxes russet and mellow, like the
berry-brown
cheek of a sunburnt brunette.
And as like smoked hams, cried Braid-Beard, we
veteran old smokers grow browner and browner; hugely do
we admire to see our jolly noses and pipe-bowls mellowing
together.
Well said, old man, cried Babbalanja; for, like a
good wife, a pipe is a friend and companion for life. And
whoso weds with a pipe, is no longer a bachelor. After
many vexations, he may go home to that faithful counselor,
and ever find it full of kind consolations and suggestions.
But not thus with cigars or cigarrets: the acquaintances of
a moment, chatted with in by-places, whenever they come
handy; their existence so fugitive, uncertain, unsatisfactory.
Once ignited, nothing like longevity pertains to them. They
never grow old. Why, my lord, the stump of a cigarret is an
abomination; and two of them crossed are more of a
memento-mori
,
than a brace of thigh-bones at right angles.
So they are, so they are, cried King Media. Then,
mortals, puff we away at our pipes. Puff, puff, I say. Ah!
how we puff! But thus we demi-gods ever puff at our ease.
Puff, puff, how we puff, cried Babbalanja. But life
itself is a puff and a wheeze. Our lungs are two pipes
which we constantly smoke.
Puff, puff! how we puff, cried old Mohi. All
thought is a puff.
Ay, said Babbalanja, not more smoke in that
skullbowl
of yours than in the skull on your shoulders: both ends
alike.
Puff! puff! how we puff, cried Yoomy. But in
every puff, there hangs a wreath. In every puff, off flies a
care.
Ay, there they go, cried Mohi, there goes another
and there, and there;this is the way to get rid of them
my worshipful lord; puff them aside.
Yoomy, said Media, give us that pipe song of thine.
Sing it, my sweet and pleasant poet. We'll keep time with
the flageolets of ours.
So with pipes and puffs for a chorus, thus Yoomy
sang:
Care is all stuff:
Puff! Puff:
To puff is enough:
Puff! Puff!
More musky than snuff,
And warm is a puff:
Puff! Puff!
Here we sit mid our puffs,
Like old lords in their ruffs,
Snug as bears in their muffs:
Puff! Puff!
Then puff, puff, puff,
For care is all stuff,
Puffed off in a puff.
Puff! Puff!
Ay, puff away, cried Babbalanja, puff, puff, so we
are born, and so die. Puff, puff, my volcanos: the great
sun itself will yet go out in a snuff, and all Mardi smoke
out its last wick.
Puffs enough, said King Media, Vee-Vee! haul
down my flag. There, lie down before me, oh Gonfalon!
and, subjects, hear,when I die, lay this spear on my right,
and this pipe on my left, its colors at half mast; so shall I
be ambidexter, and sleep between eloquent symbols.
vol. ii.D
CHAPTER XVIII.
THEY VISIT AN EXTRAORDINARY OLD ANTIQUARY.
About
prows there, ye paddlers, cried Media. In
this fog we've been raising, we have sailed by Padulla, our
destination.
Now Padulla, was but a little island, tributary to a
neighboring king; its population embracing some hundreds
of thousands of leaves, and flowers, and butterflies, yet only
two solitary mortals; one, famous as a venerable
antiquarian
:
a collector of objects of Mardian vertu; a cognoscenti,
and dilettante in things old and marvelous; and for that
reason, very choice of himself.
He went by the exclamatory cognomen of Oh-Oh; a
name bestowed upon him, by reason of the delighted
interjections
,
with which he welcomed all accessions to his museum.
Now, it was to obtain a glimpse of this very museum,
that Media was anxious to touch at Padulla.
Landing, and passing through a grove, we were accosted
by Oh-Oh himself; who, having heard the shouts of our
paddlers, had sallied forth, staff in hand.
The old man was a sight to see; especially his nose; a
remarkable one. And all Mardi over, a remarkable nose is
a prominent feature: an ever obvious passport to distinction.
For, after all, this gaining a name, is but the individualizing
of a man; as well achieved by an extraordinary nose, as by
an extraordinary epic. Far better, indeed; for you may
pass poets without knowing them. Even a hero, is no hero
without his sword; nor Beelzebub himself a lion, minus
that lasso-tail of his, wherewith he catches his prey.
Whereas, he who is famous through his nose, it is impossible
to overlook. He is a celebrity without toiling for a name.
Snugly ensconced behind his proboscis, he revels in its shadow,
receiving tributes of attention wherever he goes.
Not to enter at large upon the topography of Oh-Oh's
nasal organ, all must be content with this; that it was of
a singular magnitude, and boldly aspiring at the end; an
exclamation point in the face of the wearer, forever
wondering
at the visible universe. The eyes of Oh-Oh were like
the creature's that the Jew abhors: placed slanting in his
head, and converging their rays toward the mouth; which
was no mouth, but a gash.
I mean not to be harsh, or unpleasant upon thee, Oh-Oh;
but I must paint thee as thou wert.
The rest of his person was crooked, and dwarfed, and
surmounted by a hump, that sat on his back like a burden.
And a weary load is a hump, Heaven knows, only to be
cast off in the grave.
Thus old, and antiquated, and gable-ended, was the
tabernacle
of Oh-Oh's soul. But his person was housed in as
curious a structure. Built of old boughs of trees blown down
in the groves, and covered over with unruly thatching, it
seemed, without, some ostrich nest. But within, so intricate,
and grotesque, its brown alleys and cells, that the interior
of no walnut was more labyrinthine.
And here, strewn about, all dusty and disordered, were
the precious antiques, and
curios
, and obsoletes, which to
Oh-Oh were dear as the apple of his eye, or the memory of
departed days.
The old man was exceedingly importunate, in directing
attention to his relics; concerning each of which, he had an
endless story to tell. Time would fail; nay, patience, to
repeat his legends. So, in order, here follow the most
prominent
of his rarities:
The identical Canoe, in which, ages back, the god Unja came from
the bottom of the sea.
(Very ponderous; of lignum-vit wood).
A stone Flower-pot, containing in the original soil, Unja's last
foot-prints
,
when he embarked from Mardi for parts unknown.
(One foot-print unaccountably reversed).
The Jaw-bones of Tooroorooloo, a great orator in the days of Unja.
(Somewhat twisted).
A quaint little Fish-hook.
(Made from the finger-bones of Kravi the Cunning).
The mystic Gourd; carved all over with cabalistic triangles, and
hypogriffs; by study of which a reputed prophet, was said to have
obtained his inspiration.
(Slightly redolent of vineyards).
The complete Skeleton of an immense Tiger-shark; the bones of a
Pearl-shell-diver's leg inside.
(Picked off the reef at low tide).
An inscrutable, shapeless block of a mottled-hued, smoke-dried
wood.
(Three unaccountable holes drilled through the middle).
A sort of ecclesiastical Fasces, being the bony blades of nine
sword-fish
,
basket-hilted with shark's jaws, braided round and tasseled
with cords of human hair.
(Now obsolete).
The mystic Fan with which Unja fanned himself when in trouble.
(Woven from the leaves of the Water-Lily).
A Tripod of a Stork's Leg, supporting a nautilus shell, containing
the fragments of a bird's egg; into which, was said to have
been magically decanted the soul of a deceased chief.
(Unfortunately crushed in by atmospheric pressure).
Two clasped Right Hands, embalmed; being those of twin warriors,
who thus died on a battle-field.
(Impossible to sunder).
A curious Pouch, or Purse, formed from the skin of an Albatross'
foot, and decorated with three sharp claws, naturally pertaining
to it.
(Originally the property of a notorious old Tooth-per-Tooth).
A long tangled lock of Mermaid's Hair, much resembling the
curling
silky fibres of the finer sea-weed.
(Preserved between fins of the dolphin).
A Mermaid's Comb for the toilet. The stiff serrated erest of a
Cock Storm-petrel.
(Oh-Oh was particularly curious concerning Mermaids).
Files, Rasps, and Pincers, all bone, the implements of an eminent
Chiropedist, who flourished his tools before the flood.
(Owing to the excessive unevenness of the surface in those
times, the diluvians were peculiarly liable to pedal afflictions).
The back Tooth, that Zozo the Enthusiast, in token of grief,
recklessly
knocked out at the decease of a friend.
(Worn to a stump and quite useless).
These wonders inspected, Oh-Oh conducted us to an
arbor
,
to show us the famous telescope, by help of which, he
said he had discovered an ant-hill in the moon. It rested
in the crotch of a Bread-fruit tree; and was a prodigiously
long and hollow trunk of a Palm; a scale from a sea-kraken
its lens.
Then returning to his cabinet, he pointed to a bamboo
microscope, which had wonderfully assisted him in his
entomological
pursuits.
By this instrument, my masters, said he, I have
satisfied
myself, that in the eye of a dragon-fly there are
precisely
twelve thousand five hundred and forty-one triangular
lenses; and in the leg of a flea, scores on scores of distinct
muscles. Now, my masters, how far think you a flea may
leap at one spring? Why, two hundred times its own
length; I have often measured their leaps, with a small
measure I use for scientific purposes.
Truly, Oh-Oh, said Babbalanja, your discoveries must
ere long result in something grand; since you furnish such
invaluable data for theorists. Pray, attend, my lord
Media. If, at one spring, a flea leaps two hundred
times its own length, then, with the like proportion of
muscles in his calves, a bandit might pounce upon the
unwary traveler from a quarter of a mile off. Is it not so,
Oh-Oh?
Indeed, but it is, my masters. And one of the greatest
consolations I draw from these studies, is the
ever-strengthening
conviction of the beneficent wisdom that framed our
Mardi. For did men possess thighs in proportion to fleas,
verily, the wicked would grievously leap about, and curvet
in the isles.
But Oh-Oh, said Babbalanja, what other discoveries
have you made? Hast yet put a usurer under your lens, to
find his conscience? or a libertine, to find his heart? Hast
yet brought your microscope to bear upon a downy peach,
or a rosy cheek?
I have, said Oh-Oh, mournfully; and from the
moment
I so did, I have had no heart to eat a peach, or salute
a cheek.
Then dash your lens! cried Media.
Well said, my lord. For all the eyes we get beyond
our own, but minister to infelicity. The microscope disgusts
us with our Mardi; and the telescope sets us longing for
some other world.
CHAPTER XIX.
THEY GO DOWN INTO THE CATACOMBS.
With
a dull flambeau, we now descended some narrow
stone steps, to view Oh-Oh's collection of ancient and curious
manuscripts, preserved in a vault.
This way, this way, my masters, cried Oh-Oh, aloft,
swinging his dim torch. Keep your hands before you;
it's a dark road to travel.
So it seems, said Babbalanja, wide-groping, as he
descended
lower and lower. My lord this is like going down
to posterity.
Upon gaining the vault, forth flew a score or two of bats,
extinguishing the flambeau, and leaving us in darkness, like
Belzoni deserted by his Arabs in the heart of a pyramid.
The torch at last relumed, we entered a tomb-like
excavation
,
at every step raising clouds of dust; and at last stood
before long rows of musty, mummyish parcels, so dingy-red,
and so rolled upon sticks, that they looked like stiff sausages
of Bologna; but smelt like some fine old Stilton or Cheshire.
Most ancient of all, was a hieroglyphical Elegy on the
Dumps, consisting of one thousand and one lines; the
characters
,herons,
weeping-willows, and ravens, supposed to
have been traced by a quill from the sea-noddy.
Then there were plenty of rare old ballads:
King Kroko, and the Fisher Girl.
The Fight at the Ford of Spears.
The Song of the Skulls.
And brave old chronicles, that made Mohi's mouth water:
The Rise and Setting of the Dynasty of Foofoo.
The Heroic History of the Noble Prince Dragoni; showing
how he killed ten Pinioned Prisoners with his Own Hand.
The whole Pedigree of the King of Kandidee, with that of his
famous horse, Znorto.
And Tarantula books:
Sour Milk for the Young, by a Dairyman.
The Devil adrift, by a Corsair.
Grunts and Groans, by a Mad Boar.
Stings, by a Scorpion.
And poetical productions:
Suffusions of a Lily in a Shower.
Sonnet on the last Breath of an Ephemera.
`The Gad-fly, and Other Poems.
And metaphysical treatises:
Necessitarians not Predestinarians.
Philosophical Necessity and Predestination One Thing and The
Same.
Whatever is not, is.
Whatever is, is not.
And scarce old memoris:
The One Hundred Books of the Biography of the Great and
Good King Grandissimo.
The Life of old Philo, the Philanthropist, in one Chapter.
And popular literature:
A most Sweet, Pleasant, and Unctuous Account of the Manner
in which Five-and-Forty Robbers were torn asunder by
Swiftly-Going Canoes.
And books by chiefs and nobles:
The Art of Making a Noise in Mardi.
On the Proper Manner of Saluting a Bosom Friend.
Letters from a Father to a Son, inculcating the Virtue of
Vice.
Pastorals by a Younger Son.
A Catalogue of Chieftains who have been Authors, by a
Chieftain
,
who disdains to be deemed an Author.
A Canto on a Cough caught by my Consort.
The Philosophy of Honesty, by a late Lord, who died in
disgrace
.
And theological works:
Pepper for the Perverse.
Pudding for the Pious.
Pleas for Pardon.
Pickles for the Persecuted.
And long and tedious romances with short and easy titles:
The Buck.
The Belle.
The King and the Cook, or the Cook and the King.
And books of voyages:
A Sojourn among the Anthropophagi, by One whose Hand was
eaten off at Tiffin among the Savages.
Franko: its King, Court, and Tadpoles.
Three Hours in Vivenza, containing a Full and Impartial
Account
of that Whole Country: by a Subject of King Bello.
And works of nautical poets:
Sky-Sail-Pole Lyrics.
And divers brief books, with panic-striking titles:
Are you safe?
A Voice from Below.
Hope for none.
Fire for all.
And pamphlets by retired warriors:
On the Best Gravy for Wild Boar's Meat.
Three Receipts for Bottling New Arrack.
To Brown Bread Fruit without Burning.
Advice to the Dyspeptic.
On Starch for Tappa.
All these MSS. were highly prized by Oh-Oh. He
averred, that they spoke of the mighty past, which he
reverenced
more than the paltry present, the dross and sediment
of what had been.
Peering into a dark crypt, Babbalanja drew forth a few
crumbling, illegible, black-letter sheets of his favorite old
essayist, brave Bardianna. They seemed to have formed
parts of a work, whose title only remainedThoughts, by
a Thinker.
D*
Silently Babbalanja pressed them to his heart. Then at
arm's length held them, and said, And is all this wisdom
lost? Can not the divine cunning in thee, Bardianna,
transmute to brightness these sullied pages? Here, perhaps,
thou didst dive into the deeps of things, treating of the
normal
forms of matter and of mind; how the particles of solids
were first molded in the interstices of fluids; how the
thoughts of men are each a soul, as the lung-cells are each
a lung; how that death is but a mode of life; while
midmost
is the Pharzi.But all is faded. Yea, here the
Thinker's thoughts lie cheek by jowl with phrasemen's
words. Oh Bardianna! these pages were offspring of thee,
thought of thy thought, soul of thy soul. Instinct with
mind, they once spoke out like living voices; now, they're
dust; and would not prick a fool to action. Whence then
is this? If the fogs of some few years can make soul linked
to matter naught; how can the unhoused spirit hope to
live when mildewed with the damps of death.
Piously he folded the shreds of manuscript together,
kissed them, and laid them down.
Then approaching Oh-Oh, he besought him for one leaf,
one shred of those most precious pages, in memory of
Bardianna
,
and for the love of him.
But learning who he was, one of that old Ponderer's
commentators
,
Oh-Oh tottered toward the manuscripts; with
trembling fingers told them over, one by one, and said
Thank Oro! all are here.Philosopher, ask me for my
limbs, my life, my heart, but ask me not for these. Steeped
in wax, these shall be my cerements.
All in vain; Oh-Oh was an antiquary,
Turning in despair, Babbalanja spied a heap of
wormeaten
parchment covers, and many clippings and parings.
And whereas the rolls of manuscripts did smell like unto old
cheese; so these relics did marvelously resemble the rinds
of the same.
Turning over this pile, Babbalanja lighted upon
something
that restored his good humor. Long he looked it
over delighted; but bethinking him, that he must have
dragged to day some lost work of the collection, and much
desirous of possessing it, he made bold again to ply Oh-Oh;
offering a tempting price for his discovery.
Glancing at the titleA Happy Lifethe old man
criedOh, rubbish! rubbish! take it for nothing.
And Babbalanja placed it in his vestment.
The catacombs surveyed, and day-light gained, we
inquired
the way to Ji-Ji's, also a collector, but of another sort;
one miserly in the matter of teeth, the money of Mardi.
At the mention of his name, Oh-Oh flew out into
scornful
philippics upon the insanity of that old dotard, who
hoarded
up teeth, as if teeth were of any use, but to purchase
rarities. Nevertheless, he pointed out our path; following
which, we crossed a meadow.
CHAPTER XX.
BABBALANJA QUOTES FROM AN ANTIQUE PAGAN; AND
EARNESTLY
PRESSES IT UPON THE COMPANY, THAT WHAT HE
RECITES IS NOT HIS, BUT ANOTHER'S.
Journeying
on, we stopped by a gurgling spring, in a
beautiful grove; and here, we stretched out on the grass,
and our attendants unpacked their hampers, to provide us a
lunch.
But as for that Babbalanja of ours, he must needs go
and lunch by himself, and, like a cannibal, feed upon an
author; though in other respects he was not so partial to
bones.
Bringing forth the treasure he had buried in his bosom,
he was soon buried in it; and motionless on his back,
looked
as if laid out, to keep an appointment with his
undertaker
.
What, ho! Babbalanja! cried Media from under a
tree, don't be a duck, there, with your bill in the air;
drop your metaphysics, man, and fall to on the solids. Do
you hear?
Come, philosopher, said Mohi, handling a banana,
you will weigh more after you have eaten.
Come, list, Babbalanja, cried Yoomy, I am going to
sing.
Up! up! I say, shouted Media again. But go, old
man, and wake him: rap on his head, and see whether he
be in.
Mohi, obeying, found him at home; and Babbalanja
started up.
In Oro's name, what ails you, philosopher? See you
Paradise, that you look so wildly?
A Happy Life! a Happy Life! cried Babbalanja, in
an ecstasy. My lord, I am lost in the dream of it, as
here recorded. Marvelous book! its goodness transports
me. Let me read:`I would bear the same mind, whether
I be rich or poor, whether I get or lose in the world. I
will reckon benefits well placed as the fairest part of my
possession, not valuing them by number or weight, but by
the profit and esteem of the receiver; accounting myself
never the poorer for any thing I give. What I do shall be
done for conscience, not ostentation. I will eat and drink,
not to gratify my palate, but to satisfy nature. I will be
cheerful to my friends, mild and placable to my enemies.
I will prevent an honest request, if I can foresee it; and I
will grant it, without asking. I will look upon the whole
world as my country; and upon Oro, both as the witness
and the judge of my words and my deeds. I will live and
die with this testimony: that I loved a good conscience;
that I never invaded another man's liberty; and that I
preserved my own. I will govern my life and my thoughts,
as if the whole world were to see the one, and to read
the other; for what does it signify, to make any thing a
secret to my neighbor, when to Oro all our privacies are
open.'
Very fine, said Media.
The very spirit of the first followers of Alma, as
recorded
in the legends, said Mohi.
Inimitable, said Yoomy.
Said Babbalanja, Listen again:`Righteousness is
sociable and gentle; free, steady, and fearless; full of
inexhaustible
delights.' And here again, and here, and here:
`The true felicity of life is to understand our duty to Oro.'
`True joy is a serene and sober motion.' And here, and
here,my lord, 'tis hard quoting from this book;but
listen`A peaceful conscience, honest thoughts, and
righteous
actions are blessings without end, satiety, or measure.
The poor man wants many things; the covetous man, all.
It is not enough to know Oro, unless we obey him.'
Alma all over, cried Mohi; sure, you read from his
sayings?
I read but odd sentences from one, who though he lived
ages ago, never saw, scarcely heard of Alma. And mark
me, my lord, this time I improvise nothing. What I have
recited, is here. Mohi, this book is more marvelous than
the prophecies. My lord, that a mere man, and a heathen,
in that most heathenish time, should give utterance to such
heavenly wisdom, seems more wonderful than that an
inspired
prophet should reveal it. And is it not more divine
in this philosopher, to love righteousness for its own sake,
and in view of annihilation, than for pious sages to extol it
as the means of everlasting felicity?
Alas, sighed Yoomy, and does he not promise us any
good thing, when we are dead?
He speaks not by authority. He but woos us to
goodness
and happiness here.
Then, Babbalanja, said Media, keep your treasure
to yourself. Without authority, and a full right hand,
Righteousness better be silent. Mardi's religion must seem
to come direct from Oro, and the mass of you mortals
endeavor
it not, except for a consideration, present or to come.
And call you that righteousness, my lord, which is but
the price paid down for something else?
I called it not righteousness; it is religion so called.
But let us prate no more of these things; with which I, a
demi-god, have but little in common. It ever impairs my
digestion. No more, Babbalanja.
My lord! my lord! out of itself, Religion has nothing
to bestow. Nor will she save us from aught, but from the
evil in ourselves. Her one grand end is to make us wise;
her only manifestations are reverence to Oro and love to man;
her only, but ample reward, herself. He who has this, has
all. He who has this, whether he kneel to an image of
wood, calling it Oro; or to an image of air, calling it the
same; whether he fasts or feasts; laughs or weeps;that
man can be no richer. And this religion, faith, virtue,
righteousness, good, whate'er you will, I find in this book I
hold. No written page can teach me more.
Have you that, then, of which you speak, Babbalanja?
Are you content, there where you stand?
My lord, you drive me home. I am not content. The
mystery of mysteries is still a mystery. How this author
came to be so wise, perplexes me. How he led the life he
did, confounds me. Oh, my lord, I am in darkness, and no
broad blaze comes down to flood me. The rays that come
to me are but faint cross lights, mazing the obscurity wherein
I live. And after all, excellent as it is, I can be no gainer
by this book. For the more we learn, the more we unlearn;
we accumulate not, but substitute; and take away, more
than we add. We dwindle while we grow; we sally out
for wisdom, and retreat beyond the point whence we started;
we essay the Fondiza, and get but the Phe. Of all
simpletons
,
the simplest! Oh! that I were another sort of fool
than I am, that I might restore my good opinion of myself.
Continually I stand in the pillory, am broken on the wheel,
and dragged asunder by wild horses. Yes, yes, Bardianna,
all is in a nut, as thou sayest; but all my back teeth can
not crack it; I but crack my own jaws. All round me,
my fellow men are new-grafting their vines, and dwelling in
flourishing arbors; while I am forever pruning mine, till it
is become but a stump. Yet in this pruning will I
persist
;
I will not add, I will diminish; I will train myself
down to the standard of what is unchangeably true. Day
by day I drop off my redundancies; ere long I shall have
stripped my ribs; when I die, they will but bury my spine.
Ah! where, where, where, my lord, is the everlasting
Tekana
?
Tell me, Mohi, where the Ephina? I may have
come to the Penultimate, but where, sweet Yoomy, is the
Ultimate? Ah, companions! I faint, I am wordless:
something,nothing,riddles,does Mardi hold her?
He swoons! cried Yoomy.
Water! water! cried Media.
Away: said Babbalanja serenely, I revive.
CHAPTER XXI.
THEY VISIT A WEALTHY OLD PAUPER.
Continuing
our route to Jiji's, we presently came to a
miserable hovel. Half projecting from the low, open
entrance
,
was a bald overgrown head, intent upon an upright
row of dark-colored bags:pelican pouchesprepared by
dropping a stone within, and suspending them, when moist.
Ever and anon, the great head shook with a tremulous
motion, as one by one, to a clicking sound from the old
man's mouth, the strings of teeth were slowly drawn forth,
and let fall, again and again, with a rattle.
But perceiving our approach, the old miser suddenly
swooped his pouches out of sight; and, like a turtle into
its shell, retreated into his den. But soon he decrepitly
emerged upon his knees, asking what brought us thither?
to steal the teeth, which lying rumor averred he possessed in
abundance? And opening his mouth, he averred he had
none; not even a sentry in his head.
But Babbalanja declared, that long since he must have
drawn his own dentals, and bagged them with the rest.
Now this miserable old miser must have been idiotic; for
soon forgetting what he had but just told us of his utter
toothlessness, he was so smitten with the pearly mouth of
Hohora, one of our attendants (the same for whose pearls,
little King Peepi had taken such a fancy), that he made the
following overture to purchase its contents: namely: one
tooth of the buyer's, for every three of the seller's. A
proposition
promptly rejected, as involving a mercantile absurdity.
Why? said Babbalanja. Doubtless, because that
proposed
to be given, is less than that proposed to be received.
Yet, says a philosopher, this is the very principle which
regulates all barterings. For where the sense of a simple
exchange of quantities, alike in value?
Where, indeed? said Hohora with open eyes, though
I never heard it before, that's a staggering question. I
beseech
you, who was the sage that asked it?
Vivo, the Sophist, said Babbalanja, turning aside.
In the hearing of Jiji, allusion was made to Oh-Oh, as a
neighbor of his. Whereupon he vented much slavering
opprobrium
upon that miserable old hump-back; who
accumulated
useless monstrosities; throwing away the precious
teeth, which otherwise might have sensibly rattled in his
own pelican pouches.
When we quitted the hovel, Jiji, marking little Vee-Vee,
from whose shoulder hung a calabash of edibles, seized the
hem of his garment and besought him for one mouthful of
food; for nothing had he tasted that day
The boy tossed him a yam.
CHAPTER XXII.
YOOMY SINGS SOME ODD VERSES, AND BABBALANJA QUOTES
FROM THE OLD AUTHORS RIGHT AND LEFT.
Sailing
from Padulla, after many pleasant things had
been said concerning the sights there beheld; Babbalanja
thus addressed YoomyWarbler, the last song you sung
was about moonlight, and paradise, and fabulous pleasures
evermore: now, have you any hymns about earthly felicity?
If so, minstrel, said Media, jet it forth, my fountain,
forthwith.
Just now, my lord, replied Yoomy, I was singing to
myself
,
as I often do, and by your leave, I will continue aloud.
Better begin at the beginning, I should think, said the
chronicler, both hands to his chin, beginning at the top to
new braid his beard.
No: like the roots of your beard, old Mohi, all
beginnings
are stiff, cried Babbalanja. We are lucky in living
midway in eternity. So sing away, Yoomy, where you left
off, and thus saying he unloosed his girdle for the song, as
Apicius would for a banquet.
Shall I continue aloud, then, my lord?
My lord nodded, and Yoomy sang:
Full round, full soft, her dewy arms,
Sweet shelter from all Mardi's harms!
Whose arms? cried Mohi.
Sang Yoomy:
Diving deep in the sea,
She takes sunshine along:
Down flames in the sea,
As of dolphins a throng.
What mermaid is this? cried Mohi.
Sang Yoomy:
Her foot, a falling sound,
That all day long might bound.
Over the beach,
The soft sand beach,
And none would find
A trace behind.
And why not? demanded Media, why could no trace
be found?
Said Braid - Beard, Perhaps owing, my lord, to the
flatness of the mermaid's foot. But no; that can not be;
for mermaids are all vertebr below the waist.
Your fragment is pretty good, I dare say, Yoomy,
observed
Media, but as Braid-Beard hints, rather flat.
Flat as the foot of a man with his mind made up,
cried Braid-Beard. Yoomy, did you sup on flounders last
night?
But Yoomy vouchsafed no reply, he was ten thousand
leagues off in a reverie: somewhere in the Hyades perhaps.
Conversation proceeding, Braid-Beard happened to make
allusion to one Rotato, a portly personage, who, though a
sagacious philosopher, and very ambitious to be celebrated
as such, was only famous in Mardi as the fattest man of his
tribe.
Said Media, Then, Mohi, Rotato could not pick a
quarrel with Fame, since she did not belie him. Fat he
was, and fat she published him.
Right, my lord, said Babbalanja, for Fame is not
always so honest. Not seldom to be famous, is to be widely
known for what you are not, says Alla-Malolla. Whence
it comes, as old Bardianna has it, that for years a man may
move unnoticed among his fellows; but all at once, by some
chance attitude, foreign to his habit, become a trumpet-full
for fools; though, in himself, the same as ever. Nor has
he shown himself yet; for the entire merit of a man can
never be made known; nor the sum of his demerits, if he
have them. We are only known by our names; as letters
sealed up, we but read each other's superscriptions.
So with the commonalty of us Mardians. How then
with those beings who every way are but too apt to be riddles.
In many points the works of our great poet Vavona, now
dead a thousand moons, still remain a mystery. Some call
him a mystic; but wherein he seems obscure, it is, perhaps,
we that are in fault; not by premeditation spoke he those
archangel thoughts, which made many declare, that Vavona,
after all, was but a crack-pated god, not a mortal of sound
mind. But had he been less, my lord, he had seemed more.
Saith Fulvi, `Of the highest order of genius, it may be
truly asserted, that to gain the reputation of superior power,
it must partially disguise itself; it must come down, and
then it will be applauded for soaring.' And furthermore,
`that there are those who falter in the common tongue,
because
they think in another; and these are accounted
stutterers
and stammerers.'
Ah! how true! cried the Warbler.
And what says the archangel Vavona, Yoomy, in that
wonderful drama of his, `The Souls of the Sages?'`
Beyond
most barren hills, there are landscapes ravishing; with
but one eye to behold; which no pencil can portray.' What
wonder then, my lord, that Mardi itself is so blind. `Mardi
is a monster,' says old Bardianna, `whose eyes are fixed in
its head, like a whale's; it can see but two ways, and those
comprising but a small are of a perfect vision. Poets,
heroes
,
and men of might, are all around this monster Mardi.
But stand before me on stilts, or I will behold you not, says
the monster; brush back your hair; inhale the wind
largely
;
lucky are all men with dome-like foreheads; luckless
those with pippin-heads; loud lungs are a blessing; a lion is
no lion that can not roar.' Says Aldina, `There are those
looking on, who know themselves to be swifter of foot than the
racers, but are confounded with the simpletons that stare.'
The mere carping of a disappointed cripple, cried Mohi.
His biographer states, that Aldina had only one leg.
Braid-Beard, you are witty, said Babbalanja,
adjusting
his robe. My lord, there are heroes without armies,
who hear martial music in their souls.
Why not blow their trumpets louder, then, cried Media,
that all Mardi may hear?
My lord Media, too, is witty, Babbalanja, said Mohi.
Breathed Yoomy, There are birds of divinest plumage,
and most glorious song, yet singing their lyrics to themselves.
Said Media, The lark soars high, cares for no auditor,
yet its sweet notes are heard here below. It sings, too, in
company with myriads of mates. Your soliloquists, Yoomy,
are mostly herons and owls.
Said Babbalanja, Very clever, my lord; but think you
not, there are men eloquent, who never babble in the
marketplace
?
Ay, and arrant babblers at home. In few words,
Babbalanja
,
you espouse a bad cause. Most of you mortals are
peacocks; some having tails, and some not; those who have
them will be sure to thrust their plumes in your face; for
the rest, they will display their bald cruppers, and still
screech for admiration. But when a great genius is born
into Mardi, he nods, and is known.
More wit, but, with deference, perhaps less truth, my
lord. Say what you will, Fame is an accident; merit a
thing absolute. But what matter? Of what available
value reputation, unless wedded to power, dentals, or place?
To those who render him applause, a poet's may seem a
thing tangible; but to the recipient, 'tis a fantasy; the poet
never so stretches his imagination, as when striving to
comprehend
what it is; often, he is famous without knowing it.
At the sacred games of Lazella, said Yoomy, slyly
crowned from behind with a laurel fillet, for many hours, the
minstrel Jarmi wandered about ignorant of the honors he
bore. But enlightened at last, he doffed the wreath; then,
holding it at arm's length, sighed forthOh, ye laurels! to
be visible to me, ye must be removed from my brow!
And what said Botargo, cried Babbalanja, hearing
that his poems had been translated into the language of the
remote island of Bertranda?`It stirs me little; already,
in merry fancies, have I dreamed of their being trilled by
the blessed houris in paradise; I can only imagine the same
of the damsels of Bertranda.' Says Boldo, the
Materialist
,`Substances
alone are satisfactory.'
And so thought the mercenary poet, Zenzi, said Yoomy.
Upon receiving fourteen ripe yams for a sonnet, one for
every line, he said to me,`Yoomy, I shall make a better
meal upon these, than upon so many compliments.'
Ay, cried Babbalanja,  `Bravos,' saith old Bardianna,
but induce flatulency.'
Said Media, And do you famous mortals, then, take no
pleasure in hearing your bravos?
Much, my good lord; at least such famous mortals,
so enamored of a clamorous notoriety, as to bravo for
themselves
,
when none else will huzza; whose whole existence is
an unintermitting consciousness of self; whose very persons
stand erect and self-sufficient as their infallible index, the
capital letter I; who relish and comprehend no reputation
but what attaches to the carcass; who would as lief be
renowned
for a splendid mustache, as for a splendid drama:
who know not how it was that a personage, to posterity so
universally celebrated as the poet Vavona, ever passed
through the crowd unobserved; who deride the very thunder
for making such a noise in Mardi, and yet disdain to
manifest
itself to the eye.
Wax not so warm, Babbalanja; but tell us, if to his
contemporaries Vavona's person was almost unknown, what
satisfaction did he derive from his genius?
Had he not its consciousness?an empire boundless as
the West. What to him were huzzas? Why, my lord,
from his privacy, the great and good Logodora sent liniment
to the hoarse throats without. But what said Bardianna,
when they dunned him for autographs?`Who keeps the
register of great men? who decides upon noble actions?
and how long may ink last? Alas! Fame has dropped
more rolls than she displays; and there are more lost
chronicles
,
than the perished books of the historian Livella.' But
what is lost forever, my lord, is nothing to what is now
unseen
.
There are more treasures in the bowels of the earth,
than on its surface.
Ah! no gold, cried Yoomy, but that comes from
dark mines.
Said Babbalanja, Bear witness, ye gods! cries fervent
old Bardianna, that besides disclosures of good and evil
undreamed
of now, there will be other, and more astounding
revelations hereafter, of what has passed in Mardi unbeheld.
A truce to your everlasting pratings of old Bardianna,
said King Media; why not speak your own thoughts,
Babbalanja? then would your discourse possess more
completeness
;
whereas, its warp and woof are of all sorts,
Bardianna, Alla-Malolla, Vavona, and all the writers that
ever have written. Speak for yourself, mortal!
May you not possibly mistake, my lord? for I do not
so much quote Bardianna, as Bardianna quoted me, though
he flourished before me; and no vanity, but honesty to say
so. The catalogue of true thoughts is but small; they are
ubiquitous; no man's property; and unspoken, or bruited,
are the same. When we hear them, why seem they so
natural, receiving our spontaneous approval? why do we
think we have heard them before? Because they but
reiterate
ourselves; they were in us, before we were born.
The truest poets are but mouth-pieces; and some men are
duplicates of each other; I see myself in Bardianna.
And there, for Oro's sake, let it rest, Babbalanja;
Bardianna
in you, and you in Bardianna forever!
CHAPTER XXIII.
WHAT MANNER OF MEN THE TAPPARIANS WERE.
The
canoes sailed on. But we leave them awhile. For
our visit to Jiji, the last visit we made, suggests some
further
revelations concerning the dental money of Mardi.
Ere this, it should have been mentioned, that throughout
the Archipelago, there was a restriction concerning incisors
and molars, as ornaments for the person; none but great
chiefs, brave warriors, and men distinguished by rare
intellectual
endowments, orators, romancers, philosophers,
and poets, being permitted to sport them as jewels. Though,
as it happened, among the poets there were many who had
never a tooth, save those employed at their repasts; which,
coming but seldom, their teeth almost corroded in their
mouths. Hence, in commerce, poets' teeth were at a
discount
.
For these reasons, then, many mortals blent with the
promiscuous mob of Mardians, who, by any means,
accumulated
teeth, were fain to assert their dental claims to
distinction
,
by clumsily carrying their treasures in pelican
pouches slung over their shoulders; which pouches were a
huge burden to carry about, and defend. Though, in good
truth, from any of these porters, it was harder to wrench
his pouches, than his limbs. It was also a curious
circumstance
that at the slightest casual touch, these bags seemed
to convey a simultaneous thrill to the owners.
Besides these porters, there were others, who exchanged
their teeth for richly stained calabashes, elaborately carved
canoes, and more especially, for costly robes, and turbans;
vol. ii.E
in which last, many outshone the noblest-born nobles.
Nevertheless
,
this answered not the end they had in view;
some of the crowd only admiring what they wore, and not
them; breaking out into laudation of the inimitable
handiwork
of the artisans of Mardi.
And strange to relate, these artisans themselves often
came to be men of teeth and turbans, sporting their bravery
with the best. A circumstance, which accounted for the
fact, that many of the class above alluded to, were
considered
capital judges of tappa and tailoring.
Hence, as a general designation, the whole tribe went by
the name of Tapparians; otherwise, Men of Tappa.
Now, many moons ago, according to Braid-Beard, the
Tapparians of a certain cluster of islands, seeing themselves
hopelessly confounded with the plebeian race of mortals;
such as artificers, honest men, bread-fruit bakers, and the
like; seeing, in short, that nature had denied them every
inborn mark of distinction; and furthermore, that their
external
assumptions were derided by so many in Mardi, these
selfsame Tapparians, poor devils, resolved to secede from the
rabble; form themselves into a community of their own;
and conventionally pay that homage to each other, which
universal Mardi could not be prevailed upon to render to
them.
Jointly, they purchased an island, called Pimminee,
toward
the extreme west of the lagoon; and thither they
went; and framing a code of lawsamazingly arbitrary,
considering they themselves were the framerssolemnly
took the oth of allegiance to the commonwealth thus
established
.
Regarded section by section, this code of laws
seemed exceedingly trivial; but taken together, made a
somewhat imposing aggregation of particles.
By this code, the minutest things in life were all ordered
after a specific fashion. More especially one's dress was
legislated upon, to the last warp and woof. All girdles
must be so many inches in length, and with such a number
of tassels in front. For a violation of this ordinance, before
the face of all Mardi, the most dutiful of sons would cut the
most affectionate of fathers.
Now, though like all Mardi, kings and slaves included,
the people of Pimminee had dead dust for grandsires, they
seldom reverted to that fact; for, like all founders of
families
,
they had no family vaults. Nor were they much
encumbered
by living connections; connections, some of them
appeared to have none. Like poor Logan the last of his
tribe, they seemed to have monopolized the blood of their
race, having never a cousin to own.
Wherefore it was, that many ignorant Mardians, who
had not pushed their investigations into the science of
physiology
,
sagely divined, that the Tapparians must have podded
into life like peas, instead of being otherwise indebted for
their existence. Certain it is, they had a comical way of
backing up their social pretensions. When the
respectability
of his clan was mooted, Paivai, one of their bucks,
disdained
all reference to the Dooms-day Book, and the ancients.
More reliable evidence was had. He referred the anxious
world to a witness, still alive and hearty,his contemporary
tailor; the varlet who cut out his tappa doublets, and
rejoiced his soul with good fits.
Ah! sighed Babbalanja, how it quenches in one the
thought of immortality, to think that these Tapparians too,
will hereafter claim each a niche!
But we rove. Our visit to Pimminee itself, will best
make known the ways of its denizens.
CHAPTER XXIV.
THEIR ADVENTURES UPON LANDING AT PIMMINEE.
A long
sail over, the island of Pimminee came in sight;
one dead flat, wreathed in a thin, insipid vapor.
My lord, why land? said Babbalanja; no Yillah is
here.
'Tis my humor, Babbalanja.
Said Yoomy, Taji would leave no isle unexplored.
As we neared the beach, the atmosphere became still
closer and more languid. Much did we miss the refreshing
balm which breathed in the fine breezy air of the open lagoon.
Of a slender and sickly growth seemed the trees; in the
meadows, the grass grew small and mincing.
Said Media, Taji, from the accounts which Braid-Beard
gives, there must be much to amuse, in the ways of these
Tapparians.
Yes, said Babbalanja, their lives are a continual
farce, gratuitously performed for the diversion of Mardi.
My lord, perhaps we had best doff our dignity, and land
among them as persons of lowly condition; for then, we
shall receive more diversion, though less hospitality.
A good proposition, said Media.
And so saying, he put off his robe for one less
pretentious
.
All followed suit; Yoomy doffing turban and sash; and,
at last, completely metamorphosed, we looked like Hungarian
gipsies.
Voyaging on, we entered a bay, where numbers of
menials
were standing in the water, engaged in washing the
carved work of certain fantastic canoes, belonging to the
Tapparians, their masters.
Landing at some distance, we followed a path that soon
conducted us to a betwisted dwelling of bamboos, where,
gently, we knocked for admittance. So doing, we were
accosted
by a servitor, his portliness all in his calves.
Marking
our appearance, he monopolized the threshold, and
gruffly demanded what was wanted.
Strangers, kind sir, fatigued with travel, and in need of
refreshment and repose.
Then hence with ye, vagabonds! and with an
emphasis
,
he closed the portal in our face.
Said Babbalanja, turning, You perceive, my lord Media,
that these varlets take after their masters; who feed none
but the well-fed, and house none but the well-housed.
Faith! but they furnish most rare entertainment,
nevertheless
,
cried Media. Ha! ha! Taji, we had missed
much, had we missed Pimminee.
As this was said, we observed, at a distance, three menials
running from seaward, as if conveying important intelligence.
Halting here and there, vainly seeking admittance at
other habitations, and receiving nothing but taunts for our
pains, we still wandered on; and at last came upon a village,
toward which, those from the sea-side had been running.
And now, to our surprise, we were accosted by an eager
and servile throng.
Obsequious varlets, said Media, where tarry your
masters?
Right royal, and thrice worshipful Lord of Odo, do you
take us for our domestics? We are Tapparians, may it
please your illustrious Highness; your most humble and
obedient servants. We beseech you, supereminent Sir,
condescend
to visit our habitations, and partake of our cheer.
Then turning upon their attendants, Away with ye,
hounds! and set our dwellings in order.
How know ye me to be king? asked Media.
Is it not in your serene Highness's regal port, and eye?
'Twas their menials, muttered Mohi, who from the
paddlers in charge of our canoes must have learned who my
lord was, and published the tidings.
After some further speech, Media made a social surrender
of himself to the foremost of the Tapparians, one Nimni;
who, conducting us to his abode, with much deference
introduced
us to a portly old Begum, and three slender damsels;
his wife and daughters.
Soon, refreshments appeared:green and yellow
compounds
,
and divers enigmatical dainties; besides vegetable
liqueurs of a strange and alarming flavor served in fragile
little leaves, folded into cups, and very troublesome to handle.
Excessively thirsty, Babbalanja made bold to inquire for
water; which called forth a burst of horror from the old
Begum, and minor shrieks from her daughters; who
declared
,
that the beverage to which remote reference had
been made, was far too widely diffused in Mardi, to be at
all esteemed in Pimminee.
But though we seldom imbibe it, said the old Begum,
ceremoniously adjusting her necklace of cowrie-shells, we
occasionally employ it for medicinal purposes.
Ah, indeed? said Babbalanja.
But oh! believe me; even then, we imbibe not the
ordinary fluid of the springs and streams; but that which
in afternoon showers softly drains from our palm-trees into
the little hollow or miniature reservoir beneath its
compacted
roots.
A goblet of this beverage was now handed Babbalanja;
but having a curious, gummy flavor, it proved any thing but
palatable.
Presently, in came a company of young men, relatives of
Nimni. They were slender as sky-sail-poles; standing in
a row, resembled a picket-fence; and were surmounted by
enormous heads of hair, combed out all round, variously
dyed, and evened by being singed with a lighted wisp of
straw. Like milliners' parcels, they were very neatly done
up; wearing redolent robes.
How like the woodlands they smell, whispered Yoomy.
Ay, marvelously like sap, said Mohi.
One part of their garniture consisted of numerous tasseled
cords, like those of an aigulette, depending from the neck,
and attached here and there about the person. A separate
one, at a distance, united their ankles. These served to
measure and graduate their movements; keeping their
gestures
,
paces, and attitudes, within the prescribed standard of
Tapparian gentility. When they went abroad, they were
preceded by certain footmen; who placed before them small,
carved boards, whereon their masters stepped; thus avoiding
contact with the earth. The simple device of a shoe, as a
fixture for the foot, was unknown in Pimminee.
Being told, that Taji was lately from the sun, they
manifested
not the slightest surprise; one of them incidentally
observing, however, that the eclipses there, must be a sad
bore to endure.
CHAPTER XXV.
A, I, AND O
islands in Mardi, the Begum was surprised that he could
have thus hazarded his life among the barbarians of the
East. She desired to know whether his constitution was not
impaired by inhaling the unrefined atmosphere of those remote
and barbarous regions. For her part, the mere thought of
it made her faint in her innermost citadel; nor went she
ever abroad with the wind at East, dreading the contagion
which might lurk in the air.
Upon accosting the three damsels, Taji very soon
discovered
that the tongue which had languished in the presence
of the Begum, was now called into active requisition, to
entertain the Polysyllables, her daughters. So assiduously
were they occupied in silent endeavors to look sentimental
and pretty, that it proved no easy task to sustain with them
an ordinary chat. In this dilemma, Taji diffused not his
remarks among all three; but discreetly centered them upon
O. Thinking she might be curious concerning the sun, he
made some remote allusion to that luminary as the place of
his nativity. Upon which, O inquired where that country
was, of which mention was made.
Some distance from here; in the air above; the sun that
gives light to Pimminee, and Mardi at large.
She replied, that if that were the case, she had never
beheld it; for such was the construction of her farthingale,
that her head could not be thrown back, without impairing
its set. Wherefore, she had always abstained from
astronomical
investigations.
Hereupon, rude Mohi laughed out. And that lucky
laugh happily relieved Taji from all further necessity of
entertaining
the Vowels. For at so vulgar, and in Pimminee, so
unwonted a sound, as a genuine laugh, the three startled
nymphs fainted away in a row, their round farthingales
falling
over upon each other, like a file of empty tierces. But
they presently revived.
Meanwhile, without stirring from their mats, the polite
young bucks in the aigulettes did nothing but hold
semitransparent
E*
leaves to their eyes, by the stems; which leaves
they directed downward, toward the disordered hems of the
farthingales; in wait, perhaps, for the revelation of an ankle,
and its accompaniments. What the precise use of these
leaves could have been, it would be hard to say, especially
as the observers invariably peeped over and under them.
The calamity of the Vowels was soon followed by the
breaking up of the party; when, evening coming on, and
feeling much wearied with the labor of seeing company in
Pimminee, we retired to our mats; there finding that
repose which ever awaits the fatigued.
CHAPTER XXVI.
A RECEPTION DAY AT PIMMINEE.
Next
morning, Nimmi apprized us, that throughout the
day he proposed keeping open house, for the purpose of
enabling
us to behold whatever of beauty, rank, and fashion,
Pimminee could boast; including certain strangers of note
from various quarters of the lagoon, who doubtless would
honor themselves with a call.
As inmates of the mansion, we unexpectedly had a rare
opportunity of witnessing the final toilets of the Begum and
her daughters, preparatory to receiving their guests.
Their four farthingales were placed standing in the middle
of the dwelling; when their future inmates, arrayed in
rudimental
vestments, went round and round them, attaching
various articles of finery, dyed scarfs, ivory trinkets, and
other decorations. Upon the propriety of this or that
adornment
,
the three Vowels now and then pondered apart, or
together consulted. They talked and they laughed; they
were silent and sad; now merry at their bravery; now
pensive at the thought of the charms to be hidden.
It was O who presently suggested the expediency of an
artful fold in their draperies, by the merest accident in
Mardi, to reveal a tantalizing glimpse of their ankles, which
were thought to be pretty.
But the old Begum was more active than any; by far
the most disinterested in the matter of advice. Her great
object seemed to be to pile on the finery at all hazards; and
she pointed out many as yet vacant and unappropriated
spaces, highly susceptible of adornment.
At last, all was in readiness; when, taking a valedictory
glance, at their intrenchments, the Begum and damsels
simultaneously
dipped their heads, directly after emerging from
the summit, all ready for execution.
And now to describe the general reception that followed.
In came the Roes, the Fees, the Lol-Lols, the
Hummee-Hums
,
the Bidi-Bidies, and the Dedidums; the Peenees, the
Yamoyamees, the Karkies, the Fanfums, the Diddledees,
and the Fiddlefies; in a word, all the aristocracy of
Pimminee
;
people with exceedingly short names; and some all
name, and nothing else. It was an imposing array of sounds;
a circulation of ciphers; a marshaling of tappas; a getting
together of grimaces and furbelows; a masquerade of
vapidities
.
Among the crowd was a bustling somebody, one Gaddi,
arrayed in much apparel to little purpose; who, singling out
Babbalanja, for some time adhered to his side, and with
excessive complaisance, enlightened him as to the people
assembled.
That
is rich Marmonora, accounted a mighty man in
Pimminee; his bags of teeth included, he is said to weigh
upwards of fourteen stone; and is much sought after by
tailors for his measure, being but slender in the region of the
heart. His riches are great. And that old vrow is the
widow Roo; very rich; plenty of teeth; but has none in
her head. And
this
is Finfi; said to be not very rich, and
a maid. Who would suppose she had ever beat tappa for a
living?
And so saying, Gaddi sauntered off; his place by
Babbalanja's
side being immediately supplied by the damsel Finfi.
That vivacious and amiable nymph at once proceeded to
point out the company, where Gaddi had left off; beginning
with Gaddi himself, who, she insinuated, was a mere
parvenu
,
a terrible infliction upon society, and not near so rich
as he was imagined to be.
Soon we were accosted by one Nonno, a sour, saturnine
personage. I know nobody here; not a soul have I seen
before; I wonder who they all are. And just then he was
familiarly nodded to by nine worthies abreast. Whereupon
Nonno vanished. But after going the rounds of the
company
,
and paying court to many, he again sauntered by
Babbalanja, saying, Nobody, nobody; nobody but nobodies;
I see nobody I know.
Advancing, Nimni now introduced many strangers of
distinction
,
parading their titles after a fashion, plainly
signifying
that he was bent upon convincing us, that there were
people present at this little affair of his, who were men of
vast reputation; and that we erred, if we deemed him
unaccustomed
to the society of the illustrious.
But not a few of his magnates seemed shy of Media and
their laurels. Especially a tall robustuous fellow, with a
terrible javelin in his hand, much notched and splintered,
as if it had dealt many a thrust. His left arm was
gallanted
in a sling, and there was a patch upon his sinister
eye. Him Nimni made known as a famous captain, from
King Piko's island (of which anon) who had been all but
mortally wounded somewhere, in a late desperate though
nameless encounter.
Ah, said Media as this redoubtable withdrew, Fofi
is a cunning knave; a braggart, driven forth, by King Piko
for his cowardice. He has blent his tattooing into one mass
of blue, and thus disguised, must have plamed himself off
here in Pimminee, for the man he is not. But I see many
more like him.
Oh ye Tapparians, said Babbalanja, none so easily
humbugged as humbugs. Taji: to behold this folly makes
one wise. Look, look; it is all round us. Oh Pimminee,
Pimminee!
CHAPTER XXVII.
BABBALANJA FALLETH UPON PIMMINEE TOOTH AND NAIL.
The
levee over, waiving further civilities, we took
courteus
leave of the Begum and Nimni, and proceeding to the
beach, very soon were embarked.
When all were pleasantly seated beneath the canopy,
pipes in full blast, calabashes revolving, and the paddlers
quietly urging us along, Media proposed that, for the benefit
of the company, some one present, in a pithy, whiffy sentence
or two, should sum up the character of the Tapparians; and
ended by nominating Babbalanja to that office.
Come, philosopher: let us see in how few syllables you
can put the brand on those Tapparians.
Pardon me, my lord, but you must permit me to ponder
awhile; nothing requires more time, than to be brief. An
example: they say that in conversation old Bardianna dealt
in nothing but trisyllabic sentences. His talk was thunder
peals: sounding reports, but long intervals.
The devil take old Bardianna. And would that the
grave-digger had buried his Ponderings, along with his other
remains. Can none be in your company, Babbalanja, but
you must perforce make them hob-a-nob with that old prater?
A brand for the Tapparians! that is what we seek.
You shall have it, my lord. Full to the brim of
themselves
,
for that reason, the Tapparians are the emptiest of
mortals.
A good blow and well planted, Babbalanja.
In sooth, a most excellent saying; it should be carved
upon his tombstone, said Mohi, slowly withdrawing his pipe
What! would you have my epitaph read thus:
`Here lies the emptiest of mortals, who was full of himself?
At best, your words are exceedingly ambiguous, Mohi.
Now have I the philosopher, cried Yoomy, with glee.
What did some one say to me, not long since, Babbalanja,
when in the matter of that sleepy song of mine, Braid-Beard
bestowed upon me an equivocal compliment? Was I not
told to wrest commendation from it, though I tortured it to
the quick?
Take thy own pills, philosopher, said Mohi.
Then would he be a great original, said Media.
Tell me, Yoomy, said Babbalanja, are you not in
fault? Because I sometimes speak wisely, you must not
imagine that I should always act so.
I never imagined that, said Yoomy, and, if I did,
the truth would belie me. It is you who are in fault,
Babbalanja; not I, craving your pardon.
The minstrel's sides are all edges to-day, said Media.
This, then, thrice gentle Yoomy, is what I would say;
resumed Babbalanja, that since we philosophers bestow so
much wisdom upon others, it is not to be wondered at, if
now and then we find what is left in us too small for our
necessities. It is from our very abundance that we want.
And from the fool's poverty, said Media, that he is
opulent; for his very simplicity, is sometimes of more account
than the wisdom of the sage. But we were discoursing of
the Tapparians. Babbalanja: sententiously you have
acquitted
yourself to admiration; now amplify, and tell us
more of the people of Pimminee.
My lord, I might amplify forever.
Then, my worshipful lord, let him not begin, interposed
Braid-Beard.
I mean, said Babbalanja, that all subjects are
inexhaustible
,
however trivial; as the mathematical point, put
in motion, is capable of being produced into an infinite line.
But forever extending into nothing, said Media. A
very bad example to follow. Do you, Babbalanja, come to
the point, and not travel off with it, which is too much your
wont.
Since my lord insists upon it then, thus much for the
Tapparians, though but a thought or two of many in
reserve
.
They ignore the rest of Mardi, while they
themselves
are but a rumor in the isles of the East; where the
business of living and dying goes on with the same
uniformity
,
as if there were no Tapparians in existence. They
think themselves Mardi in full; whereas, by the mass, they
are stared at as prodigies; exceptions to the law, ordaining
that no Mardian shall undertake to live, unless he set out
with at least the average quantity of brains. For these
Tapparians have no brains. In lieu, they carry in one
corner of their craniums, a drop or two of attar of roses;
charily used, the supply being small. They are the victims
of two incurable maladies: stone in the heart, and
ossification
of the head. They are full of fripperies, fopperies, and
finesses; knowing not, that nature should be the model of
art. Yet, they might appear less silly than they do, were
they content to be the plain idiots which at bottom they
are. For there be grains of sense in a simpleton, so long as
he be natural. But what can be expected from them?
They are irreclaimable Tapparians; not so much fools by
contrivance of their own, as by an express, though inscrutable
decree of Oro's. For one, my lord, I can not abide them.
Nor could Taji.
In Pimminee were no hilarious running and shouting:
none of the royal good cheer of old Borabolla; none of the
mysteries of Maramma; none of the sentiment and romance
of Donjalolo; no rehearsing of old legends: no singing of old
songs; no life; no jolly commotion: in short, no men and
women; nothing but their integuments; stiff trains and
farthingales.
CHAPTER XXVIII.
BABBALANJA REGALES THE COMPANY WITH SOME SANDWICHES.
It
was night. But the moon was brilliant, far and near
illuminating the lagoon.
Over silvery billows we glided.
Come Yoomy, said Media, moonlight and music for
ayea song! a song! my bird of paradise.
And folding his arms, and watching the sparkling waters,
thus Yoomy sang:
A ray of the moon on the dancing waves
Is the step, light step of that beautiful maid:
Mardi, with music, her footfall paves,
And her voice, no voice, but a song in the glade.
Hold! cried Media, yonder is a curious rock. It
looks black as a whale's hump in blue water, when the sun
shines.
That must be the Isle of Fossils, said Mohi. Ay,
my lord, it is.
Let us land, then, said Babbalanja.
And none dissenting, the canoes were put about, and
presently we debarked.
It was a dome-like surface, here and there fringed with
ferns, sprouting from clefts. But at every tide the thin soil
seemed gradually washing into the lagoon.
Like antique tables, the smoother parts were molded in
strange devices:Luxor marks, Tadmor ciphers, Palenque
inscriptions. In long lines, as on Denderah's architraves,
were bas-reliefs of beetles, turtles, ant-eaters, armadilloes,
guanos, serpents, tongueless crocodiles:a long procession,
frosted and crystalized in stone, and silvered by the moon.
Strange sight! cried Media. Speak, antiquarian
Mohi.
But the chronicler was twitching his antiquarian beard,
nonplussed by these wondrous records. The cowled old
father, Piaggi, bending over his calcined Herculanean
manuscripts
,
looked not more at fault than he.
Said Media, Expound
you
, then, sage Babbalanja.
Muffling his face in his mantle, and his voice in sepulchral
tones, Babbalanja thus:
These are the leaves of the book of Oro. Here we
read how worlds are made; here read the rise and fall of
Nature's kingdoms. From where this old man's furthest
histories start, these unbeginning records end. These
are the secret memoirs of times past; whose evidence, at
last divulged, gives the grim lie to Mohi's gossipings, and
makes a rattling among the dry-bone relics of old
Maramma
.
Braid-Beard's old eyes flashed fire. With bristling beard,
he cried, Take back the lie you send!
Peace! everlasting foes, cried Media, interposing, with
both arms outstretched. Philosopher, probe not too deep.
All you say is very fine, but very dark. I would know
something more precise. But, prithee, ghost, unmuffle!
chatter no more! wait till you're buried for that.
Ay, death's cold ague will set us all shivering, my lord.
We'll swear our teeth are icicles.
Will you quit driving your sleet upon us? have done:
expound these rocks.
My lord, if you desire, I'll turn over these stone tablets
till they're dog-eared.
Heaven and Mardi!Go on, Babbalanja.
'Twas thus. These were tombs burst open by volcanic
throes; and hither hurled from the lowermost vaults of the
lagoon. All Mardi's rocks are one wide resurrection. But
look. Here, now, a pretty story's told. Ah, little thought
these grand old lords, that lived and roared before the flood,
that they would come to this. Here, King Media, look and
learn.
He looked; and saw a picture petrified, and plain as any
on the pediments of Petra.
It seemed a stately banquet of the dead, where lords in
skeletons were ranged around a board heaped up with fossil
fruits, and flanked with vitreous vases, grinning like empty
skulls. There they sat, exchanging rigid courtesies. One's
hand was on his stony heart; his other pledged a lord who
held a hollow beaker. Another sat, with earnest face
beneath
a mitred brow. He seemed to whisper in the ear of
one who listened trustingly. But on the chest of him who
wore the miter, an adder lay, close-coiled in flint.
At the further end, was raised a throne, its canopy
surmounted
by a crown, in which now rested the likeness of a
raven on an egg.
The throne was void. But half-concealed by drapery,
behind the goodliest lord, sideway leaned a figure diademed,
a lifted poniard in its hand:a monarch fossilized in very
act of murdering his guest.
Most high and sacred majesty! cried Babbalanja,
bowing
to his feet.
While all stood gazing on this sight, there came two
servitors
of Media's, who besought of Babbalanja to settle a
dispute, concerning certain tracings upon the islet's other
side.
Thither we followed them.
Upon a long layer of the slaty stone were marks of ripplings
of some now waveless sea; mid which were tri-toed
foot-prints
of some huge heron, or wading fowl.
Pointing to one of which, the foremost disputant thus
spoke:I maintain that these are three toes.
And I, that it is one foot, said the other.
And now decide between us, joined the twain.
Said Babbalanja, starting, Is not this the very question
concerning which they made such dire contention in
Maramma
,
whose tertiary rocks are chisseled all over with these
marks? Yes; this it is, concerning which they once shed
blood. This it is, concerning which they still divide.
Which of us is right? again demanded the impatient
twain.
Unite, and both are right; divide, and both are wrong.
Every unit is made up of parts, as well as every plurality.
Nine is three threes; a unit is as many thirds; or, if you
please, a thousand thousandths; no special need to stop at
thirds.
Away, ye foolish disputants! cried Media. Full
before you is the thing disputed.
Strolling on, many marvels did we mark; and Media
said:Babbalanja, you love all mysteries; here's a fitting
theme. You have given us the history of the rock; can
your sapience tell the origin of all the isles? how Mardi
came to be?
Ah, that once mooted point is settled. Though hard at
first, it proved a bagatelle. Start not my lord; there are
those who have measured Mardi by perch and pole, and with
their wonted lead sounded its utmost depths. Listen: it is
a pleasant story. The coral wall which circumscribes the
isles but continues upward the deep buried crater of the
primal chaos. In the first times this crucible was charged
with vapors nebulous, boiling over fires volcanic. Age by
age, the fluid thickened; dropping, at long intervals, heavy
sediment to the bottom; which layer on layer concreted,
and at length, in crusts, rose toward the surface. Then,
the vast volcano burst; rent the whole mass; upthrew the
ancient rocks; which now in divers mountain tops tell tales
of what existed ere Mardi was completely fashioned. Hence
many fossils on the hills, whose kith and kin still lurk beneath
the vales. Thus Nature works, at random warring, chaos a
crater, and this world a shell.
Mohi stroked his beard.
Yoomy yawned.
Media cried, Preposterous!
My lord, then take another theorywhich you will
the celebrated sandwich System. Nature's first condition
was a soup, wherein the agglomerating solids formed granitic
dumplings, which, wearing down, deposited the primal
stratum
made up of series, sandwiching strange shapes of
mollusks
,
and zoophytes; then snails, and periwinkles:
marmalade
to sip, and nuts to crack, ere the substantials came.
And next, my lord, we have the fine old time of the Old
Red Sandstone sandwich, clapped on the underlying layer,
and among other dainties, imbedding the first course of fish,
all quite in rule,sturgeon-forms, cephalaspis, glyptolepis,
pterichthys; and other finny things, of flavor rare, but hard
to mouth for bones. Served up with these, were sundry
greens,lichens, mosses, ferns, and fungi.
Now comes the New Red Sandstone sandwich: marly
and magnesious, spread over with old patriarchs of crocodiles
and alligators,hard carving these,and prodigious lizards,
spine-skewered, tails tied in bows, and swimming in saffron
saucers.
What next? cried Media.
The Ool, or Oily sandwich:rare gormandizing then;
for oily it was called, because of fat old joints, and hams,
and rounds, and barons of sea-beeves and walrusses, which
then crowned the stratum-board. All piled together,
glorious
profusion!fillets and briskets, rumps, and saddles,
and haunches; shoulder to shoulder, loin 'gainst sirloin, ribs
rapping knuckles, and quarter to none. And all these
sandwiched
right over all that went before. Course after course,
and course on course, my lord; no time to clear the wreck;
no stop nor let; lay on and slash; cut, thrust, and come.
Next the Chalk, or Coral sandwich; but no dry fare
for that; made up of rich side-courses,eocene, miocene,
and pliocene. The first was wild game for the delicate,
bantam larks, curlews, quails, and flying weazels; with a
slight sprinkling of pilaus,capons, pullets, plovers, and
garnished with petrels' eggs. Very savory, that, my lord.
The second side-coursemiocenewas out of course, flesh
after fowl:marine mammalia,seals, grampuses, and
whales, served up with sea-weed on their flanks, hearts and
kidneys deviled, and fins and flippers friccasied. All very
nice, my lord. The third side-course, the pliocene, was
goodliest of all:whole-roasted elephants, rhinoceroses, and
hippopotamuses, stuffed with boiled ostriches, condors,
cassowaries
,
turkeys. Also barbacued mastodons and
megatheriums
,
gallantly served up with fir-trees in their mouths,
and tails cock-billed.
Thus fared the old diluvians: arrant gormandizers and
beef-bolters. We Mardians famish on the superficial strata
of deposits; cracking our jaws on walnuts, filberts,
cocoanuts
,
and clams. My lord, I've done.
And bravely done it is. Mohi tells us, that Mardi was
made in six days; but you, Babbalanja, have built it up
from the bottom in less than six minutes.
Nothing for us geologists, my lord. At a word we turn
you out whole systems, suns, satellites, and asteroids included.
Why, my good lord, my friend Annonimo is laying out a
new Milky Way, to intersect with the old one, and
facilitate
cross-cuts among the comets.
And so saying, Babbalanja turned aside.
CHAPTER XXIX.
THEY STILL REMAIN UPON THE ROCK.
Gogle-goggle
, fugle-fi, fugle-fogle-orum, so hummed
to himself Babbalanja, slowly pacing over the fossils.
Is he crazy again? whispered Yoomy.
Are you crazy, Babbalanja? asked Media.
From my very birth have I been so, my lord; am I
not possessed by a devil?
Then I'll e'en interrogate him, cried Media.Hark
ye, sirrah;why rave you thus in this poor mortal?
'Tis he, not I. I am the mildest devil that ever
entered
man; in propria persona, no antlers do I wear; my tail
has lost its barb, as at last your Mardian lions lose their
caudal horns.
A very sing-song devil this. But, prithee, who are
you, sirrah?
The mildest devil that ever entered man; in propria
persona, no antlers do I wear; my tail has lost its barb, as
at last your Mardian lions lose their caudal horns.
A very iterating devil this. Sirrah! mock me not.
Know you aught yet unrevealed by Babbalanja?
Many things I know, not good to tell; whence they
call me Azzageddi.
A very confidential devil, this; that tells no secrets.
Azzageddi, can I drive thee out?
Only with this mortal's ghost:together we came in,
together we depart.
A very terse, and ready devil, this. Whence come
you, Azzageddi?
Whither my catechist must goa torrid clime, cut by
a hot equator.
A very keen, and witty devil, this. Azzageddi, whom
have you there?
A right down merry, jolly set, that at a roaring furnace
sit and toast their hoofs for aye; so used to flames, they poke
the fire with their horns, and light their tails for torches.
A very funny devil, this. Azzageddi, is not Mardi a
place far pleasanter, than that from whence you came?
Ah, home! sweet, sweet, home! would, would that I
were home again!
A very sentimental devil, this. Azzageddi, would you
had a hand,I'd shake it.
Not so with us; who, rear to rear, shake each other's
tails, and courteously inquire, `Pray, worthy sir, how now
stands the great thermometer?'
The very prince of devils, this.
How mad our Babbalanja is, cried Mohi. My lord,
take heed; he'll bite.
Alas! alas! sighed Yoomy.
Hark ye, Babbalanja, cried Media, enough of this:
doff your devil, and be a man.
My lord, I can not doff him; but I'll down him for a
time: Azzageddi! down, imp; down, down, down! so:
now, my lord, I'm only Babbalanja.
Shall I test his sanity, my lord? cried Mohi.
Do, old man.
Philosopher, our great reef is surrounded by an ocean;
what think you lies beyond?
Alas! sighed Yoomy, the very subject to renew his
madness.
Peace, minstrel! said Media. Answer, Babbalanja.
I will, my lord. Fear not, sweet Yoomy; you see
how calm I am. Braid-Beard, those strangers, that came
to Mondoldo prove isles afar, as a philosopher of old surmised,
but was hooted at for his surmisings. Nor is it at all
impossible
,
Braid-Beard, that beyond their land may exist other
regions, of which those strangers know not; peopled with
races something like us Mardians; but perhaps with more
exalted faculties, and organs that we lack. They may
have some better seeing sense than ours; perhaps, have fins
or wings for arms.
This seems not like sanity, muttered Mohi.
A most crazy hypothesis, truly, said Media.
And are all inductions vain? cried Babbalanja. Have
we mortals naught to rest on, but what we see with eyes?
Is no faith to be reposed in that inner microcosm, wherein
we see the charted universe in little, as the whole horizon is
mirrored in the iris of a gnat? Alas! alas! my lord, is
there no blest Odonphi? no Astrazzi?
His devil's uppermost again, my lord, cried
Braid-Beard
.
He's stark, stark mad! sighed Yoomy.
Ay, the moon's at full, said Media. Ho, paddlers!
we depart.
vol. ii.F
CHAPTER XXX.
BEHIND AND BEFORE.
It
was yet moonlight when we pushed from the islet.
But soon, the sky grew dun; the moon went into a cavern
among the clouds; and by that secret sympathy between
our hearts and the elements, the thoughts of all but Media
became overcast.
Again discourse was had of that dark intelligence from
Mondoldo,the fell murder of Taji's follower.
Said Mohi, Those specter sons of Aleema must have
been the assassins.
They harbored deadly malice, said Babbalanja.
Which poor Jarl's death must now have sated, sighed
Yoomy.
Then all the happier for Taji, said Media. But
away with gloom! because the sky is clouded, why cloud
your brows? Babbalanja, I grieve the moon is gone. Yet
start some paradox, that we may laugh. Say a woman is
a man, or you yourself a stork.
At this they smiled. When hurtling came an arrow,
which struck our stern, and quivered. Another! and
another! Grazing the canopy, they darted by, and hissing,
dived like red-hot bars beneath the waves.
Starting, we beheld a corruscating wake, tracking the
course of a low canoe, far flying for a neighboring mountain.
The next moment it was lost within the mountain's shadow
and pursuit was useless.
Let us fly! cried Yoomy
Peace! What murderers these? said Media, calmly;
whom can they seek?you, Taji?
The three avengers fly three bolts, said Babbalanja.
See if the arrow yet remain astern, cried Media.
They brought it to him.
By Oro! Taji on the barb!
Then it missed its aim. But I will not mine. And
whatever arrows follow, still will I hunt on. Nor does the
ghost, that these pale specters would avenge, at all disquiet
me. The priest I slew, but to gain her, now lost; and I
would slay again, to bring her back. Ah, Yillah! Yillah.
All started.
Then said Babbalanja, Aleema's sons raved not; 'tis
true, then, Taji, that an evil deed gained you your Yillah:
no wonder she is lost.
Said Media, unconcernedly, Perhaps better, Taji, to have
kept your secret; but tell no more; I care not to be your foe.
Ah, Taji! I had shrank from you, cried Yoomy, but
for the mark upon your brow. That undoes the tenor of your
words. But look, the stars come forth, and who are these?
A waving Iris! ay, again they come:Hautia's heralds!
They brought a black thorn, buried in withered
rosebalm
blossoms, red and blue.
Said Yoomy, For that which stings, there is no cure,
Who, who is Hautia, that she stabs me thus?
And this wild sardony mocks your misery.
Away! ye fiends.
Again a Venus car; and lo! a wreath of strawberries!
Yet fly to me, and be garlanded with joys.
Let the wild witch laugh. She moves me not. Neither
hurtling arrows nor Circe flowers appall.
Said Yoomy, They wait reply.
Tell your Hautia, that I know her not; nor care to
know. I defy her incantations; she lures in vain. Yillah!
Yillah! still I hope!
Slowly they departed; heeding not my cries no more to
follow.
Silence, and darkness fell.
CHAPTER XXXI.
BABBALANJA DISCOURSES IN THE DARK.
Next
day came and went; and still we onward sailed.
At last, by night, there fell a calm, becalming the water
of the wide lagoon, and becalming all the clouds in heaven,
vailing the constellations. But though our sails were useless,
our paddlers plied their broad stout blades. Thus sweeping
by a rent and hoar old rock, Vee-Vee, impatient of the calm,
sprang to his crow's nest in the shark's mouth, and seizing
his conch, sounded a blast which ran in and out among the
hollows, reverberating with the echoes.
Be sure, it was startling. But more so with respect to
one of our paddlers, upon whose shoulders, elevated Vee-Vee,
his balance lost, all at once came down by the run. But
the heedless little bugler himself was most injured by the
fall; his arm nearly being broken.
Some remedies applied, and the company grown composed,
Babbalanja thus:My lord Media, was there any
human
necessity for that accident?
None that I know, or care to tell, Babbalanja.
Vee-Vee, said Babbalanja, did you fall on purpose?
Not I, sobbed little Vee-Vee, slinging his ailing arm in
its mate.
Woe! woe to us all, then, cried Babbalanja; for
what direful events may be in store for us which we can not
avoid.
How now, mortal? cried Media; what now?
My lord, think of it. Minus human inducement from
without, and minus volition from within, Vee-Vee has met
with an accident, which has almost maimed him for life.
Is it not terrifying to think of? Are not all mortals exposed
to similar, nay, worse calamities, ineffably unavoidable?
Woe, woe, I say, to us Mardians! Here, take my last
breath; let me give up this beggarly ghost!
Nay, said Media; pause, Babbalanja. Turn it not
adrift prematurely. Let it house till midnight; the proper
time for you mortals to dissolve. But, philosopher, if you
harp upon Vee-Vee's mishap, know that it was owing to
nothing but his carelessness.
And what was that owing to, my lord?
To Vee-Vee himself.
Then, my lord, what brought such a careless being into
Mardi?
A long course of generations. He's some one's
great-great-grandson
,
doubtless; who was great-great-grandson to
some one else; who also had grandsires.
Many thanks then to your highness; for you establish
the doctrine of Philosophical Necessity.
No. I establish nothing; I but answer your questions.
All one, my lord: you are a Necessitarian; in other
words, you hold that every thing takes place through
absolute
necessity.
Do you take me, then, for a fool, and a Fatalist?
Pardie
!
a bad creed for a monarch, the distributor of rewards
and punishments.
Right there, my lord. But, for all that, your highness
is a Necessitarian, yet no Fatalist. Confound not the
distinct
.
Fatalism presumes express and irrevocable edicts of
heaven concerning particular events. Whereas, Necessity
holds that all events are naturally linked, and inevitably
follow
each other, without providential interposition, though by
the eternal letting of Providence.
Well, well, Babbalanja, I grant it all. Go on.
On high authority, we are told that in times past the
fall of certain nations in Mardi was prophesied of seers.
Most true, my lord, said Mohi; it is all down in the
chronicles.
Ha! ha! cried Media. Go on, philosopher.
Continued Babbalanja, Previous to the time assigned to
their fulfillment, those prophecies were bruited through
Mardi
;
hence, previous to the time assigned to their fulfillment,
full knowledge of them may have come to the nations
concerned
.
Now, my lord, was it possible for those nations,
thus forwarned, so to conduct their affairs, as at the
prophesied
time, to prove false the events revealed to be in store
for them?
However that may be, said Mohi, certain it is, those
events did assuredly come to pass:Compare the ruins of
Babbelona with book ninth, chapter tenth, of the chronicles.
Yea, yea, the owl inhabits where the seers predicted; the
jackals yell in the tombs of the kings.
Go on, Babbalanja, said Media. Of course those
nations could not have resisted their doom. Go on, then:
vault over your premises.
If it be, then, my lord, that
My very worshipful lord, interposed Mohi, is not our
philosopher getting off soundings; and may it not be
impious
to meddle with these things?
Were it so, old man, he should have known it. The
king of Odo is something more than you mortals.
But are we the great gods themselves, cried Yoomy,
that we discourse of these things.
No, minstrel, said Babbalanja; and no need have
the great gods to discourse of things perfectly comprehended
by them, and by themselves ordained. But you and I,
Yoomy, are men, and not gods; hence is it for us, and not
for them, to take these things for our themes. Nor is there
any impiety in the right use of our reason, whatever the issue.
Smote with superstition, shall we let it wither and die out,
a dead limb to a live trunk, as the mad devotee's arm held
up motionless for years? Or shall we employ it but for a
paw, to help us to our bodily needs, as the brutes use their
instinct? Is not reason subtile as quicksilverlive as
lightning
a
neighing charger to advance, but a snail to recede?
Can we starve that noble instinct in us, and hope that it
will survive? Better slay the body than the soul; and if it
be the direst of sins to be the murderers of our own bodies,
how much more to be a soul-suicide. Yoomy, we are men,
we are angels. And in his faculties, high Oro is but what
a man would be, infinitely magnified. Let us aspire to all
things. Are we babes in the woods, to be scared by the
shadows of the trees? What shall appall us? If eagles
gaze at the sun, may not men at the gods?
For one, said Media, you may gaze at me freely.
Gaze on. But talk not of my kinsmen so fluently,
Babbalanja
.
Return to your argument.
I go back then, my lord. By implication, you have
granted, that in times past the future was foreknown of Oro;
hence, in times past, the future must have been foreordained.
But in all things Oro is immutable. Wherefore our own
future is foreknown and foreordained. Now, if things
foreordained
concerning nations have in times past been revealed
to them previous to their taking place, then something
similar
may be presumable concerning individual men now
living
.
That is to say, out of all the events destined to befall
any one man, it is not impossible that previous knowledge
of some one of these events might supernaturally come to
him. Say, then, it is revealed to me, that ten days hence I
shall, of my own choice, fall upon my javelin; when the
time comes round, could I refrain from suicide? Grant the
strongest presumable motives to the act; grant that,
unforewarned
,
I would slay myself outright at the time appointed:
yet, foretold of it, and resolved to test the decree to the
uttermost, under such circumstances, I say, would it be
possible
for me not to kill myself? If possible, then
predestination
is not a thing absolute; and Heaven is wise to keep
secret from us those decrees, whose virtue consists in secrecy.
But if not possible, then that suicide would not be mine, but
Oro's. And, by consequence, not only that act, but all my
acts, are Oro's. In sum, my lord, he who believes that in
times past, prophets have prophesied, and their prophecies
have been fulfilled; when put to it, inevitably must allow
that every man now living is an irresponsible being.
In sooth, a very fine argument very finely argued, said
Media. You have done marvels, Babbalanja. But hark
ye, were I so disposed, I could deny you all over, premises
and conclusions alike. And furthermore, my cogent
philosopher
,
had you published that anarchical dogma among my
subjects in Oro, I had silenced you by my spear-headed
scepter
,
instead of my uplifted finger.
Then, all thanks and all honor to your generosity, my
lord, in granting us the immunities you did at the outset of
this voyage. But, my lord, permit me one word more. Is
not Oro omnipresentabsolutely every where?
So you mortals teach, Babbalanja.
But so do they
mean
, my lord. Often do we Mardians
stick to terms for ages, yet truly apply not their meanings.
Well, Oro is every where. What now?
Then, if that be absolutely so, Oro is not merely a
universal
on-looker, but occupies and fills all space; and no
vacancy is left for any being, or any thing but Oro. Hence,
Oro is
in
all things, and himself
is
all thingsthe time-old
creed. But since evil abounds, and Oro is all things, then
he can not be perfectly good; wherefore, Oro's omnipresence
and moral perfection seem incompatible. Furthermore, my
lord those orthodox systems which ascribe to Oro almighty and
universal attributes every way, those systems, I say, destroy
all intellectual individualities but Oro, and resolve the
universe
into him. But this is a heresy; wherefore, orthodoxy
and heresy are one. And thus is it, my lord, that upon these
matters we Mardians all agree and disagree together, and
kill each other with weapons that burst in our hands. Ah,
my lord, with what mind must blessed Oro look down upon
this scene! Think you he discriminates between the deist
and atheist? Nay; for the Searcher of the cores of all
hearts well knoweth that atheists there are none. For in
things abstract, men but differ in the sounds that come from
their mouths, and not in the wordless thoughts lying at the
bottom of their beings. The universe is all of one mind.
Though my twin-brother sware to me, by the blazing sun in
heaven at noon-day, that Oro is not; yet would he belie the
thing he intended to express. And who lives that
blasphemes
?
What jargon of human sounds so puissant as to
insult the unutterable majesty divine? Is Oro's honor in
the keeping of Mardi?Oro's conscience in man's hands?
Where our warrant, with Oro's sign-manual, to justify the
killing, burning, and destroying, or far worse, the social
persecutions
we institute in his behalf? Ah! how shall these
self-assumed attorneys and vicegerents be astounded, when
they shall see all heaven peopled with hereties and heathens,
and all hell nodding over with miters! Ah! let us Mardians
quit this insanity. Let us be content with the theology in
the grass and the flower, in seed-time and harvest. Be it
enough for us to know that Oro indubitably is. My lord!
my lord! sick with the spectacle of the madness of men, and
broken with spontaneous doubts, I sometimes see but two
things in all Mardi to believe:that I myself exist, and
that I can most happily, or least miserably exist, by the
practice of righteousness. All else is in the clouds; and
naught else may I learn, till the firmament be split from
horizon to horizon. Yet, alas! too often do I swing from
these moorings.
Alas! his fit is coming upon him again, whispered
Yoomy.
Why, Babbalanja, said Media, I almost pity you.
You are too warm, too warm. Why fever your soul with
these things? To no use you mortals wax earnest. No
thanks, but curses, will you get for your earnestness. You
yourself you harm most. Why not take creeds as they
F*
come? It is not so hard to be persuaded; never mind about
believing.
True, my lord; not very hard; no act is required; only
passiveness. Stand still and receive. Faith is to the
thoughtless, doubts to the thinker.
Then, why think at all? Is it not better for you
mortals
to clutch error as in a vice, than have your fingers meet
in your hand? And to what end your eternal inquisitions?
You have nothing to substitute. You say all is a lie; then
out with the truth. Philosopher, your devil is but a foolish
one, after all. I, a demi-god, never say nay to these things.
Yea, my lord, it would hardly answer for Oro himself,
were he to come down to Mardi, to deny men's theories
concerning
him. Did they not strike at the rash deity in
Alma?
Then, why deny those theories yourself? Babbalanja,
you almost affect my immortal serenity. Must you forever
be a sieve for good grain to run through, while you retain
but the chaff? Your tongue is forked. You speak two
languages: flat folly for yourself, and wisdom for others.
Babbalanja, if you have any belief of your own, keep it;
but, in Oro's name, keep it secret.
Ay, my lord, in these things wise men are spectators,
not actors; wise men look on, and say `ay.'
Why not say so yourself, then?
My lord, because I have often told you, that I am a
fool, and not wise.
Your Highness, said Mohi, this whole discourse
seems to have grown out of the subject of Necessity and
Free Will. Now, when a boy, I recollect hearing a sage
say, that these things were reconcilable.
Ay? said Media, what say you to that, now,
Babbalanja
?
It may be even so, my lord. Shall I tell you a story?
Azzageddi's stirring now, muttered Mohi.
Proceed, said Media.
King Normo had a fool, called Willi, whom he loved
to humor. Now, though Willi ever obeyed his lord, by the
very instinct of his servitude, he flattered himself that he
was free; and this conceit it was, that made the fool so
entertaining
to the king. One day, said Normo to his fool,
`Go, Willi, to yonder tree, and wait there till I come,'
`Your Majesty, I will,' said Willi, bowing beneath his
jingling
bells; `but I presume your Majesty has no objections
to my walking on my hands:I am free, I hope.' `
Perfectly
,'
said Normo, `hands or feet, it's all the same to me;
only do my bidding.' `I thought as much,' said Willi; so,
swinging his limber legs into the air, Willi, thumb after
thumb, essayed progression. But soon, his bottled blood so
rushed downward through his neck, that he was fain to turn
a somerset and regain his feet. Said he, `Though I am
free to do it, it's not so easy turning digits into toes; I'll
walk, by gad! which is my other option.' So he went
straight forward, and did King Normo's bidding in the
natural
way.
A curious story that, said Media; whence came it?
My lord, where every thing, but one, is to be had:
within.
You are charged to the muzzle, then, said Braid-Beard.
Yes, Mohi; and my talk is my overflowing, not my
fullness.
And what may you be so full of?
Of myself.
So it seems, said Mohi, whisking away a fly with his
beard.
Babbalanja, said Media, you did right in selecting
this ebon night for discussing the theme you did; and truly,
you mortals are but too apt to talk in the dark.
Ay, my lord, and we mortals may prate still more in
the dark, when we are dead; for methinks, that if we then
prate at all, 'twill be in our sleep. Ah! my lord, think not
that in aught I've said this night, I would assert any
wisdom
of my own. I but fight against the armed and crested
Lies of Mardi, that like a host, assail me. I am stuck full
of darts; but, tearing them from out me, gasping, I
discharge
them whence they come.
So saying, Babbalanja slowly drooped, and fell reclining;
then lay motionless as the marble Gladiator, that for
centuries
has been dying.
CHAPTER XXXII.
MY LORD MEDIA SUMMONS MOHI TO THE STAND.
While
slowly the night wore on, and the now scudding
clouds flown past, revealed again the hosts in heaven, few
words were uttered save by Media; who, when all others
were most sad and silent, seemed but little moved, or not
stirred a jot.
But that night, he filled his flagon fuller than his wont,
and drank, and drank, and pledged the stars.
Here's to thee, old Arcturus! To thee, old Aldebaran!
who ever poise your wine-red, fiery spheres on high. A
health to
thee
, my regal friend, Alphacca, in the
constellation
of the Crown: Lo! crown to crown, I pledge thee! I
drink to
ye
, too, Alphard! Markab! Denebola! Capella!
to
ye
, too, sailing Cygnus! Aquila soaring!All round, a
health to all your diadems! May they never fade! nor
mine!
At last, in the shadowy east, the Dawn, like a gray,
distant
sail before the wind, was descried; drawing nearer and
nearer, till her gilded prow was perceived.
And as in tropic gales, the winds blow fierce, and more
fierce, with the advent of the sun; so with King Media;
whose mirth now breezed up afresh. But, as at sunrise,
the sea-storm only blows harder, to settle down at last into
a steady wind; even so, in good time, my lord Media came
to be more decorous of mood. And Babbalanja abated his
reveries.
For who might withstand such a morn!
As on the night-banks of the far-rolling Ganges, the royal
bridegroom sets forth for his bride, preceded by nymphs, now
this side, now that, lighting up all the flowery flambeaux
held on high as they pass; so came the Sun, to his nuptials
with Mardi:the Hours going on before, touching all the
peaks, till they glowed rosy-red.
By reflex, the lagoon, here and there, seemed on fire;
each curling wave-crest a flame
Noon came as we sailed.
And now, citrons and bananas, cups and calabashes,
calumets and tobacco, were passed round; and we were all
very merry and mellow indeed. Smacking our lips,
chatting
,
smoking, and sipping. Now a mouthful of citron to
season a repartee; now a swallow of wine to wash down a
precept; now a fragrant whiff to puff away care. Many
things did beguile. From side to side, we turned and grazed,
like Juno's white oxen in clover meads.
Soon, we drew nigh to a charming cliff, overrun with
woodbines, on high suspended from flowering Tamarisk and
Tamarind-trees. The blossoms of the Tamarisks, in spikes
of small, red bells; the Tamarinds, wide-spreading their
golden petals, red-streaked as with streaks of the dawn.
Down sweeping to the water, the vines trailed over to the
crisp, curling waves,little pages, all eager to hold up their
trains.
Within, was a bower; going behind it, like standing
inside
the sheet of the falls of the Genesee.
In this arbor we anchored. And with their shaded
prows thrust in among the flowers, our three canoes seemed
baiting by the way, like wearied steeds in a hawthorn lane.
High midsummer noon is more silent than night. Most
sweet a siesta then. And noon dreams are day-dreams
indeed
;
born under the meridian sun. Pale Cynthia begets
pale specter shapes; and her frigid rays best illuminate
white nuns, marble monuments, icy glaciers, and cold tombs.
The sun rolled on. And starting to his feet, arms
clasped
,
and wildly staring, Yoomy exclaimedNay, nay, thou
shalt not depart, thou maid!here, here I fold thee for aye!
Flown?A dream! Then siestas henceforth while I
live. And at noon, every day will I meet thee, sweet
maid! And, oh Sun! set not; and poppies bend over us,
when next we embrace!
What ails that somnambulist? cried Media, rising.
Yoomy, I say! what ails thee?
He must have indulged over freely in those citrons,
said Mohi, sympathetically rubbing his fruitery. Ho,
Yoomy! a swallow of brine will help thee.
Alas, cried Babbalanja, do the fairies then wait on
repletion? Do our dreams come from below, and not from
the skies? Are we angels, or dogs? Oh, Man, Man,
Man! thou art harder to solve, than the Integral Calculus
yet plain as a primer; harder to find than the
philosopher's-stone
yet
ever at hand; a more cunning compound,
than an alchemist'syet a hundred weight of flesh, to a
penny weight of spirit; soul and body glued together, firm
as atom to atom, seamless as the vestment without joint,
warp or woofyet divided as by a river, spirit from flesh;
growing both ways, like a tree, and dropping thy topmost
branches to earth, like thy beard or a banian!I give thee
up, oh Man! thou art twainyet indivisible; all things
yet a poor unit at best.
Philosopher you seem puzzled to account for the riddles
of your race, cried Media, sideways reclining at his ease.
Now, do thou, old Mohi, stand up before a demi-god, and
answer for all.Draw nigh, so I can eye thee. What art
thou, mortal?
My worshipful lord, a man.
And what are men?
My lord, before thee is a specimen.
I fear me, my lord will get nothing out of that witness,
said Babbalanja. Pray you, King Media, let another
inquisitor
cross-question.
Proceed; take the divan.
A pace or two farther off, there, Mohi; so I can garner
thee all in at a glance.Attention! Rememberest thou,
fellow-being, when thou wast born?
Not I. Old Braid-Beard had no memory then.
When, then, wast thou first conscious of being?
What time I was teething: my first sensation was an
ache.
What dost thou, fellow-being, here in Mardi?
What doth Mardi here, fellow-being, under me?
Philosopher, thou gainest but little by thy questions,
cried Yoomy advancing. Let a poet endeavor.
I abdicate in your favor, then, gentle Yoomy; let me
smooth the divan for you;there: be seated.
Now, Mohi, who art thou? said Yoomy, nodding his
bird-of-paradise plume.
The sole witness, it seems, in this case.
Try again minstrel, cried Babbalanja.
Then, what art thou, Mohi?
Even what thou art, Yoomy.
He is too sharp or too blunt for us all, cried King
Media. His devil is even more subtle than yours,
Babbalanja
.
Let him go.
Shall I adjourn the court then, my lord? said
Babbalanja
.
Ay.
Oyez! Oyez! Oyez! All mortals having business at
this court, know ye, that it is adjourned till sundown of the
day, which hath no to-morrow.
CHAPTER XXXIII.
WHEREIN BABBALANJA AND YOOMY EMBRACE.
How
the isles grow and multiply around us! cried
Babbalanja, as turning the bold promontory of an
uninhabited
shore, many distant lands bluely loomed into view.
Surely, our brief voyage, may not embrace all Mardi like
its reef?
No, said Media, much must be left unseen. Nor
every where can Yillah be sought, noble Taji.
Said Yoomy, We are as birds, with pinions clipped,
that in unfathomable and endless woods, but flit from twig
to twig of one poor tree.
More isles! more isles! cried Babbalanja, erect, and
gazing abroad. And lo! round all is heaving that infinite
ocean. Ah! gods! what regions lie beyond?
But whither now? he cried, as in obedience to Media,
the paddlers suddenly altered our course.
To the bold shores of Diranda, said Media.
Ay; the land of clubs and javelins, where the lord
seigniors Hello and Piko celebrate their famous games, cried
Mohi.
Your clubs and javelins, said Media, remind me of
the great battle-chant of NarviYoomy!turning to the
minstrel, gazing abstractedly into the water;awake,
Yoomy, and give us the lines.
My lord Media, 'tis but a rude, clanging thing;
dissonant
as if the north wind blew through it. Methinks the
company will not fancy lines so inharmonious. Better sing
you, perhaps, one of my sonnets.
Better sit and sob in our ears, silly Yoomy that thou
art!no! no! none of your sentiment now; my soul is
martially inclined; I want clarion peals, not lute warblings.
So throw out your chest, Yoomy: lift high your voice; and
blow me the old battle-blast.Begin, sir minstrel.
And warning all, that he himself had not composed the
odious chant, Yoomy thus:
Our clubs! our clubs!
The thousand clubs of Narvi!
Of the living trunk of the Palm-tree made;
Skull breakers! Brain spatterers!
Wielded right, and wielded left;
Life quenchers! Death dealers!
Causing live bodies to run headless!
Our bows! our bows!
The thousand bows of Narvi!
Ribs of Tara, god of War!
Fashioned from the light Tola their arrows;
Swift messengers! Heart piercers!
Barbed with sharp pearl shells;
Winged with white tail-plumes;
To wild death-chants, strung with the hair of wild maidens!
Our spears! our spears!
The thousand spears of Narvi!
Of the thunder-riven Moo-tree made:
Tall tree, couched on the long mountain Lana!
No staves for gray-beards! no rods for fishermen!
Tempered by fierce sea-winds,
Splintered into lances by lightnings,
Long arrows! Heart seekers!
Toughened by fire their sharp black points!
Our slings! our slings!
The thousand slings of Narvi!
All tasseled, and braided, and gayly bedecked.
In peace, our girdles; in war, our war-nets;
Wherewith catch we heads as fish from the deep!
The pebbles they hurl, have been hurled before,
Hurled up on the beach by the stormy sea!
Pebbles, buried erewhile in the head of the shark:
To be buried erelong in the heads of our foes!
Home of hard blows, our pouches!
Nest of death-eggs! How quickly they hatch!
Uplift, and couch we our spears, men!
Ring hollow on the rocks our war clubs!
Bend we our bows, feel the points of our arrows:
Aloft, whirl in eddies our sling-nets;
To the fight, men of Narvi!
Sons of battle! Hunters of men!
Raise high your war-wood!
Shout Narvi! her groves in the storm!
By Oro! cried Media, but Yoomy has well nigh
stirred up all Babbalanja's devils in me. Were I a mortal,
I could fight now on a pretense. And did any man say me
nay, I would charge upon him like a spear-point. Ah,
Yoomy, thou and thy tribe have much to answer for; ye
stir up all Mardi with your lays. Your war chants make
men fight; your drinking songs, drunkards; your love
ditties
,
fools. Yet there thou sittest, Yoomy, gentle as a dove.
What art thou, minstrel, that thy soft, singing soul should
so master all mortals? Yoomy, like me, you sway a scepter.
Thou honorest my calling overmuch, said Yoomy, we
minstrels but sing our lays carelessly, my lord Media.
Ay: and the more mischief they make.
But sometimes we poets are didactic.
Didactic and dull; many of ye are but too apt to be
prosy unless mischievous.
Yet in our verses, my lord Media, but few of us purpose
harm.
But when all harmless to yourselves, ye may be
otherwise
to Mardi.
And are not foul streams often traced to pure fountains,
my lord? said Babbalanja. The essence of all good and
all evil is in us, not out of us. Neither poison nor honey
lodgeth in the flowers on which, side by side, bees and wasps
oft alight. My lord, nature is an immaculate virgin, forever
standing unrobed before us. True poets but paint the charms
which all eyes behold. The vicious would be vicious without
them.
My lord Media, impetuously resumed Yoomy, I am
sensible of a thousand sweet, merry fancies, limpid with
innocence
;
yet my enemies account them all lewd conceits.
There be those in Mardi, said Babbalanja, who
would never ascribe evil to others, did they not find it in
their own hearts; believing none can be different from
themselves
.
My lord, my lord! cried Yoomy. The air that
breathes my music from me is a mountain air! Purer than
others am I; for though not a woman, I feel in me a
woman's
soul.
Ah, have done, silly Yoomy, said Media. Thou art
becoming flighty, even as Babbalanja, when Azzageddi is
uppermost.
Thus ever: ever thus! sighed Yoomy. They
comprehend
us not.
Nor me, said Babbalanja. Yoomy: poets both, we
differ but in seeming; thy airiest conceits are as the shadows
of my deepest ponderings; though Yoomy soars, and
Babbalanja
dives, both meet at last. Not a song you sing, but I
have thought its thought; and where dull Mardi sees but
your rose, I unfold its petals, and disclose a pearl. Poets
are we, Yoomy, in that we dwell without us; we live in
grottoes, palms, and brooks; we ride the sea, we ride the
sky; poets are omnipresent.
CHAPTER XXXIV.
OF THE ISLE OF DIRANDA.
In
good time the shores of Diranda were in sight. And,
introductory to landing, Braid-Beard proceeded to give us
some little account of the island, and its rulers.
As previously hinted, those very magnificent and illustrious
lord seigniors, the lord seigniors Hello and Piko, who between
them divided Diranda, delighted in all manner of public
games, especially warlike ones; which last were celebrated
so frequently, and were so fatal in their results, that,
notwithstanding
the multiplicity of nuptials taking place in the
isle, its population remained in equilibrio. But, strange to
relate, this was the very object which the lord seigniors had
in view; the very object they sought to compass, by
instituting
their games. Though, for the most part, they wisely
kept the secret locked up.
But to tell how the lord seigniors Hello and Piko came to
join hands in this matter.
Diranda had been amicably divided between them ever
since the day they were crowned; one reigning king in the
East, the other in the West. But King Piko had been long
harassed with the thought, that the unobstructed and
indefinite
increase of his browsing subjects might eventually
denude of herbage his portion of the island. Posterity,
thought he, is marshaling her generations in squadrons,
brigades, and battalions, and ere long will be down upon my
devoted empire. Lo! her locust cavalry darken the skies;
her light-troop pismires cover the earth. Alas! my son and
successor, thou wilt inhale choke-damp for air, and have not
a private corner to say thy prayers.
By a sort of arithmetical progression, the probability, nay,
the certainty of these results, if not in some way averted,
was proved to King Piko; and he was furthermore
admonished
,
that warwar to the haft with King Hellowas the
only cure for so menacing an evil.
But so it was, that King Piko, at peace with King Hello,
and well content with the tranquillity of the times, little
relished the idea of picking a quarrel with his neighbor, and
running its risks, in order to phlebotomize his redundant
population.
Patience, most illustrious seignior, said another of his
sagacious Ahithophels, and haply a pestilence may decimate
the people.
But no pestilence came. And in every direction the
young men and maidens were recklessly rushing into
wedlock
;
and so salubrious the climate, that the old men stuck
to the outside of the turf, and refused to go under.
At last some Machiavel of a philosopher suggested, that
peradventure the object of war might be answered without
going to war; that peradventure King Hello might be
brought to acquiesce in an arrangement, whereby the men
of Diranda might be induced to kill off one another
voluntarily
,
in a peaceable manner, without troubling their rulers.
And to this end, the games before mentioned were proposed.
Egad! my wise ones, you have hit it, cried Piko;
but will Hello say ay?
Try him, most illustrious seignior, said Machiavel.
So to Hello went embassadors ordinary and extraordinary,
and ministers plenipotentiary and peculiar; and anxiously
King Piko awaited their return.
The mission was crowned with success.
Said King Hello to the ministers, in confidence:The
very thing, Dons, the very thing I have wanted. My
people are increasing too fast. They keep up the succession
too well. Tell your illustrious master it's a bargain. The
games! the games! by all means.
So, throughout the island, by proclamation, they were
forthwith established; succeeding to a charm.
And the lord seigniors, Hello and Piko, finding their
interests
the same, came together like bride and bridegroom;
lived in the same palace; dined off the same cloth; cut from
the same bread-fruit; drank from the same calabash; wore
each other's crowns; and often locking arms with a
charming
frankness, paced up and down in their dominions,
discussing
the prospect of the next harvest of heads.
In his old-fashioned way, having related all this, with
many other particulars, Mohi was interrupted by Babbalanja,
who inquired how the people of Diranda relished the games,
and how they fancied being coolly thinned out in that
manner.
To which in substance the chronicler replied, that of the
true object of the games, they had not the faintest
conception
;
but hammered away at each other, and fought and
died together, like jolly good fellows.
Right again, immortal old Bardianna! cried
Babbalanja
.
And what has the sage to the point this time? asked
Media.
Why, my lord, in his chapter on Cracked Crowns,
Bardianna, after many profound ponderings, thus concludes:
`In this cracked sphere we live in, then, cracked skulls
would seem the inevitable allotments of many. Nor will
the splintering thereof cease, till this pugnacious animal
we treat of be deprived of his natural maces: videlicet,
his arms. And right well doth man love to bruise and
batter all occiputs in his vicinity.'
Seems to me, our old friend must have been on his
stilts that time, interrupted Mohi.
No, Braid-Beard. But by way of apologizing for the
unusual rigidity of his style in that chapter, he says in
a note, that it was written upon a straight-backed settle,
when he was ill of a lumbago, and a crick in the neck.
That incorrigible Azzageddi again, said Media,
Proceed
with your quotation, Babbalanja.
Where was I, Braid-Beard?
Battering occiputs at the last accounts, said Mohi.
Ah, yes.`And right well doth man love to bruise and
batter all occiputs in his vicinity; he but follows his
instincts
;
he is but one member of a fighting world. Spiders,
vixens, and tigers all war with a relish; and on every side
is heard the howls of hyenas, the throttlings of mastiffs, the
din of belligerant beetles, the buzzing warfare of the insect
battalions: and the shrill cries of lady Tartars rending their
lords. And all this existeth of necessity. To war it is,
and other depopulators, that we are beholden for elbow-room
in Mardi, and for all our parks and gardens, wherein we
are wont to expatiate. Come on, then, plague, war, famine
and viragos! Come on, I say, for who shall stay ye?
Come on, and healthfulize the census! And more especially,
oh War! do thou march forth with thy bludgeon! Cracked
are our crowns by nature, and henceforth forever, cracked
shall they be by hard raps.
And hopelessly cracked the skull, that hatched such a
tirade of nonsense, said Mohi.
And think you not, old Bardianna knew that? asked
Babbalanja. He wrote an excellent chapter on that very
subject.
What, on the cracks in his own pate?
Precisely. And expressly asserts, that to those
identical
cracks, was he indebted for what little light he had in
his brain.
I yield, Babbalanja; your old Ponderer is older than I.
Ay, ay, Braid-Beard; his crest was a tortoise; and
this was the motto:`I bite, but am not to be bitten.'
CHAPTER XXXV.
THEY VISIT THE LORDS PIKO AND HELLO.
In
good time, we landed at Diranda. And that landing
was like landing at Greenwich among the Waterloo
pensioners
.
The people were docked right and left; some
without arms; some without legs; not one with a tail; but
to a man, all had heads, though rather the worse for wear;
covered with lumps and contusions.
Now, those very magnificent and illustrious lord seigniors,
the lord seigniors Hello and Piko, lived in a palace, round
which was a fence of the cane called Malacca, each picket
helmed with a skull, of which there were fifty, one to each
cane. Over the door was the blended arms of the high and
mighty houses of Hello and Piko: a Clavicle crossed over an
Ulna.
Escorted to the sign of the Skull-and-Cross-Bones, we
received the very best entertainment which that royal inn
could afford. We found our hosts Hello and Piko seated
together on a dais or throne, and now and then drinking
some claret-red wine from an ivory bowl, too large to have
been wrought from an elephant's tusk. They were in
glorious
good spirits, shaking ivory coins in a skull.
What says your majesty? said Piko. Heads or tails?
Oh, heads, your majesty, said Hello.
And heads say I, said Piko.
And heads it was. But it was heads on both sides, so
both were sure to win.
And thus they were used to play merrily all day long;
beheading the gourds of claret by one slicing blow with their
sickle-shaped scepters. Wide round them lay empty
calabashes
,
vol. ii.G
all feathered, red dyed, and betasseled, trickling red
wine from their necks, like the decapitated pullets in the old
baronial barn yard at Kenilworth, the night before Queen
Bess dined with my lord Leicester.
The first compliments over; and Media and Taji having
met with a reception suitable to their rank, the kings inquired,
whether there were any good javelin-flingers among us: for
if that were the case, they could furnish them plenty of
sport. Informed, however, that none of the party were
professional warriors, their majesties looked rather glum, and
by way of chasing away the blues, called for some good old
stuff that was red.
It seems, this soliciting guests, to keep their spears from
decaying, by cut and thrust play with their subjects, was a
very common thing with their illustrious majesties.
But if their visitors could not be prevailed upon to spear
a subject or so, our hospitable hosts resolved to have a few
speared, and otherwise served up for our special
entertainment
.
In a word, our arrival furnished a fine pretext for
renewing their games; though, we learned, that only ten
days previous, upward of fifty combatants had been slain
at one of these festivals.
Be that as it might, their joint majesties determined upon
another one; and also upon our tarrying to behold it.
We objected, saying we must depart.
But we were kindly assured, that our canoes had been
dragged out of the water, and buried in a wood; there to
remain till the games were over.
The day fixed upon, was the third subsequent to our
arrival
;
the interval being devoted to preparations;
summoning
from their villages and valleys the warriors of the land;
and publishing the royal proclamations, whereby the
unbounded
hospitality of the kings' household was freely offered
to all heroes whatsoever, who for the love of arms, and the
honor of broken heads, desired to cross battle-clubs, hurl
spears, or die game in the royal valley of Deddo.
Meantime, the whole island was in a state of uproarious
commotion, and strangers were daily arriving.
The spot set apart for the festival, was a spacious down,
mantled with white asters; which, waving in windrows, lay
upon the land, like the cream-surf surging the milk of young
heifers. But that whiteness, here and there, was spotted
with strawberries; tracking the plain, as if wounded
creatures
had been dragging themselves bleeding from some
deadly encounter. All round the down, waved scarlet
thickets of sumach, moaning in the wind, like the gory
ghosts environing Pharsalia the night after the battle;
scaring away the peasants, who with bushel-baskets came
to the jewel-harvest of the rings of Pompey's knights.
Beneath the heaped turf of this down, lay thousands of
glorious corpses of anonymous heroes, who here had died
glorious deaths.
Whence, in the florid language of Diranda, they called
this field The Field of Glory.
CHAPTER XXXVI.
THEY ATTEND THE GAMES.
At
last the third day dawned; and facing us upon
entering
the plain, was a throne of red log-wood, canopied by the
foliage of a red-dyed Pandannus. Upon this throne,
purple-robed
,
reclined those very magnificent and illustrious lords
seigniors, the lord seigniors Hello and Piko. Before them,
were many gourds of wine; and crosswise, staked in the
sod, their own royal spears.
In the middle of the down, as if by a furrow, a long, oval
space was margined off, about which, a crowd of spectators
were seated. Opposite the throne, was reserved a clear
passage to the arena, defined by air-lines, indefinitely
produced
from the leveled points of two spears, so poised by a
brace of warriors.
Drawing near, our party was courteously received, and
assigned a commodious lounge.
The first encounter was a club-fight between two
warriors
.
Nor casque of steel, nor skull of Congo could have
resisted their blows, had they fallen upon the mark; for
they seemed bent upon driving each other, as stakes, into
the earth. Presently, one of them faltered; but his
adversary
rushing in to cleave him down, slipped against a
guavarind
;
when the falterer, with one lucky blow, high into the
air sent the stumbler's club, which descended upon the crown
of a spectator, who was borne from the plain.
All one, muttered Piko.
As good dead as another, muttered Hello.
The second encounter was a hugging-match; wherein
two warriors, masked in Grisly-bear skins, hugged each
other to death.
The third encounter was a bumping-match between a fat
warrior and a dwarf. Standing erect, his paunch like a
bass-drum before a drummer, the fat man was run at,
heada-tilt
by the dwarf, and sent spinning round on his axis.
The fourth encounter was a tussle between two-score
warriors, who all in a mass, writhed like the limbs in
Sebastioni's
painting of Hades. After obscuring themselves in a
cloud of dust, these combatants, uninjured, but hugely
blowing
,
drew off; and separately going among the spectators,
rehearsed their experience of the fray.
Braggarts! mumbled Piko.
Poltroons! growled Hello.
While the crowd were applauding, a sober-sided observer,
trying to rub the dust out of his eyes, inquired of an
enthusiastic
neighbor, Pray, what was all that about?
Fool! saw you not the dust?
That I did, said Sober-Sides, again rubbing his eyes;
But I can raise a dust myself.
The fifth encounter was a fight of single sticks between
one hundred warriors, fifty on a side.
In a line, the first fifty emerged from the sumachs, their
weapons interlocked in a sort of wicker-work. In advance
marched a priest, bearing an idol with a cracked cocoanut
for a head,Krako, the god of Trepans. Preceded by
damsels
flinging flowers, now came on the second fifty, gayly
appareled, weapons poised, and their feet nimbly moving in
a martial measure.
Midway meeting, both parties touched poles, then
retreated
.
Very courteous, this; but tantamount to bowing each
other out of Mardi; for upon Piko's tossing a javelin, they
rushed in, and each striking his man, all fell to the ground.
Well done! cried Piko.
Brave fellows! cried Hello.
But up and at it again, my heroes! joined both. Lo!
we kings look on, and there stand the bards!
These bards were a row of lean, sallow, old men, in
thread-bare robes, and chaplets of dead leaves.
Strike up! cried Piko.
A stave! cried Hello.
Whereupon, the old croakers, each with a quinsy, sang
thus in cracked strains:
Quack! Quack! Quack!
With a toorooloo whack;
Hack away, merry men, hack away.
Who would not die brave,
His ear smote by a stave?
Thwack away, merry men, thwack away!
'Tis glory that calls,
To each hero that falls,
Hack away, merry men, hack away!
Quack! Quack! Quack!
Quack! Quack!
Quack!
Thus it tapered away.
Ha, ha! cried Piko, how they prick their ears at
that!
Hark ye, my invincibles! cried Hello. That pean
is for the slain. So all ye who have lives left, spring to it!
Die and be glorified! Now's the time!Strike up again,
my ducklings!
Thus incited, the survivors staggered to their feet; and
hammering away at each others' sconces, till they rung like
a chime of bells going off with a triple-bob-major, they finally
succeeded in immortalizing themselves by quenching their
mortalities all round; the bards still singing.
Never mind your music now, cried Piko.
It's all over, said Hello.
What valiant fellows we have for subjects, cried Piko.
Ho! grave-diggers, clear the field, cried Hello.
Who else is for glory? cried Piko.
There stand the bards! cried Hello.
But now there rushed among the crowd a haggard figure,
trickling with blood, and wearing a robe, whose edges were
burned and blacked by fire. Wielding a club, it ran to and
fro, with loud yells menacing all.
A noted warrior this; who, distracted at the death of five
sons slain in recent games, wandered from valley to valley,
wrestling and fighting.
With wild cries of The Despairer! The Despairer!
the appalled multitude fled; leaving the two kings frozen
on their throne, quaking and quailing, their teeth rattling
like dice.
The Despairer strode toward them; when, recovering
their senses, they ran; for a time pursued through the woods
by the phantom.
CHAPTER XXXVII.
TAJI STILL HUNTED, AND BECKONED.
Previous
to the kings' flight, we had plunged into the
neighboring woods; and from thence emerging, entered
brakes of cane, sprouting from morasses. Soon we heard a
whirring, as if three startled partridges had taken wing; it
proved three feathered arrows, from three unseen hands.
Grazing us, two buried in the ground, but from Taji's
arm, the third drew blood.
On all sides round we turned; but none were seen.
Still the avengers follow, said Babbalanja.
Lo! the damsels three! cried Yoomy. Look where
they come!
We joined them by the sumach-wood's red skirts; and
there, they waved their cherry stalks, and heavy bloated
cactus leaves, their crimson blossoms armed with nettles;
and before us flung shining, yellow, tiger-flowers spotted red.
Blood! cried Yoomy, starting, and leopards on your
track!
And now the syrens blew through long reeds, tasseled
with their pannicles, and waving verdant scarfs of vines,
came dancing toward us, proffering clustering grapes.
For all now yours, Taji; and all that yet may come,
cried Yoomy, fly to me! I will dance away your gloom,
and drown it in inebriation.
Away! woe is its own wine. What may be mine,
that will I endure, in its own essence to the quick. Let
me feel the poniard if it stabs.
They vanished in the wood; and hurrying on, we soon
gained sun-light, and the open glade.
CHAPTER XXXVIII.
THEY EMBARK FROM DIRANDA.
Arrived
at the Sign of the Skulls, we found the
illustrious
lord seigniors at rest from their flight, and once more
quaffing their claret, all thoughts of the specter departed.
Instead of rattling their own ivory in the heads on their
shoulders, they were rattling their dice in the skulls in their
hands. And still Heads, was the cry, and Heads,
was the throw.
That evening they made known to my lord Media that
an interval of two days must elapse ere the games were
renewed
,
in order to reward the victors, bury their dead, and
provide for the execution of an Islander, who under the
provocation
of a blow, had killed a stranger.
As this suspension of the festivities had been wholly
unforeseen
,
our hosts were induced to withdraw the embargo
laid upon our canoes. Nevertheless, they pressed us to
remain
;
saying, that what was to come would far exceed in
interest, what had already taken place. The games in
prospect being of a naval description, embracing certain
handto-hand
contests in the water between shoals of web-footed
warriors.
However, we decided to embark on the morrow.
It was in the cool of the early morning, at that hour
when a man's face can be known, that we set sail from
Diranda; and in the ghostly twilight, our thoughts reverted
to the phantom that so suddenly had cleared the plain.
With interest we hearkened to the recitals of Mohi; who
discoursing of the sad end of many brave chieftains in Mardi,
made allusion to the youthful Adondo, one of the most famous
G*
of the chiefs of the chronicles. In a canoe-fight, after
performing
prodigies of valor, he was wounded in the head, and
sunk to the bottom of the lagoon.
There is a noble monody upon the death of Adondo,
said Yoomy. Shall I sing it, my lord? It is very
beautiful
;
nor could I ever repeat it without a tear.
We will dispense with your tears, minstrel, said Media,
but sing it, if you will.
And Yoomy sang:
Departed the pride, and the glory of Mardi:
The vaunt of her isles sleeps deep in the sea,
That rolls o'er his corse with a hush.
His warriors bend over their spears,
His sisters gaze upward and mourn.
Weep, weep, for Adondo is dead!
The sun has gone down in a shower;
Buried in clouds the face of the moon;
Tears stand in the eyes of the starry skies,
And stand in the eyes of the flowers;
And streams of tears are the trickling brooks,
Coursing adown the mountains.
Departed the pride, and the glory of Mardi:
The vaunt of her isles sleeps deep in the sea.
Fast falls the small rain on its bosom that sobs,
Not showers of rain, but the tears of Oro.
A dismal time it must have been, yawned Media, not
a dry brook then in Mardi, not a lake that was not moist.
Lachrymose rivulets, and inconsolable lagoons! Call you this
poetry, minstrel?
Mohi has something like a tear in his eye, said Yoomy.
False! cried Mohi, brushing it aside.
Who composed that monody? said Babbalanja. I
have often heard it before.
None know, Babbalanja; but the poet must be still
singing to himself; his songs bursting through the turf, in
the flowers over his grave.
But gentle Yoomy, Adondo is a legendary hero,
indefinitely
dating back. May not his monody, then, be a
spontaneous
melody, that has been with us since Mardi began?
What bard composed the soft verses that our palm boughs
sing at even? Nay, Yoomy, that monody was not written
by man.
Ah! Would that I had been the poet, Babbalanja; for
then had I been famous indeed; those lines are chanted
through all the isles, by prince and peasant. Yes, Adondo's
monody will pervade the ages, like the low under-tone you
hear, when many singers do sing.
My lord, my lord, cried Babbalanja, but this were to
be truly immortal;to be perpetuated in our works, and
not in our names. Let me, oh Oro! be anonymously
known!
CHAPTER XXXIX.
WHEREIN BABBALANJA DISCOURSES OF HIMSELF.
An
interval of silence was at last broken by Babbalanja.
Pointing to the sun, just gaining the horizon, he
exclaimed
,
As old Bardianna saysshut your eyes, and believe.
And what may Bardianna have to do with yonder
orb? said Media.
This much, my lord, the astronomers maintain that
Mardi moves round the sun; which I, who never formally
investigated the matter for myself, can by no means credit;
unless, plainly seeing one thing, I blindly believe another.
Yet even thus blindly does all Mardi subscribe to an
astronomical
system, which not one in fifty thousand can
astronomically
prove. And not many centuries back, my lord,
all Mardi did equally subscribe to an astronomical system,
precisely the reverse of that which they now believe. But
the mass of Mardians have not as much reason to believe
the first system, as the exploded one; for all who have eyes
must assuredly see, that the sun seems to move, and that
Mardi seems a fixture, eternally
here
. But doubtless there
are theories which may be true, though the face of things
belie them. Hence, in such cases, to the ignorant, disbelief
would seem more natural than faith; though they too often
reject the testimony of their own senses, for what to them,
is a mere hypothesis. And thus, my lord, is it, that the
mass of Mardians do not believe because they know, but
because they know
not
. And they are as ready to receive
one thing as another, if it comes from a canonical source.
My lord, Mardi is as an ostrich, which will swallow aught
you offer, even a bar of iron, if placed endwise. And though
the iron be indigestible, yet it serves to fill: in feeding, the
end proposed. For Mardi must have something to exercise
its digestion, though that something be forever indigestible.
And as fishermen for sport, throw two lumps of bait, united
by a cord, to albatrosses floating on the sea; which are
greedily attempted to be swallowed, one lump by this fowl,
the other by that; but forever are kept reciprocally going
up and down in them, by means of the cord; even so, my
lord, do I sometimes fancy, that our theorists divert
themselves
with the greediness of Mardians to believe.
Ha, ha, cried Media, methinks this must be
Azzageddi
who speaks.
No, my lord; not long since, Azzageddi received a
furlough to go home and warm himself for a while. But
this leaves me not alone.
How?
My lord,for the present putting Azzageddi entirely
aside,though I have now been upon terms of close
companionship
with myself for nigh five hundred moons, I have
not yet been able to decide who or what I am. To you,
perhaps
,
I seem Babbalanja; but to myself, I seem not myself.
All I am sure of, is a sort of prickly sensation all over me,
which they call life; and, occasionally, a headache or a
queer conceit admonishes me, that there is something astir
in my attic. But how know I, that these sensations are
identical with myself? For aught I know, I may be
somebody else. At any rate, I keep an eye on myself, as
I would on a stranger. There is something going on in
me, that is independent of me. Many a time, have I willed
to do one thing, and another has been done. I will not say
by myself, for I was not consulted about it; it was done
instinctively. My most virtuous thoughts are not born of
my musings, but spring up in me, like bright fancies to the
poet; unsought, spontaneous. Whence they come I know
not. I am a blind man pushed from behind; in vain, I
turn about to see what propels me. As vanity, I regard
the praises of my friends; for what they commend pertains
not to me, Babbalanja; but to this unknown something that
forces me to it. But why am I, a middle aged Mardian,
less prone to excesses than when a youth? The same
inducements and allurements are around me. But no; my
more ardent passions are burned out; those which are
strongest when we are least able to resist them. Thus,
then, my lord, it is not so much outer temptations that
prevail
over us mortals; but inward instincts.
A very curious speculation, said Media.But
Babbalanja
,
have you mortals no moral sense, as they call it?
We have. But the thing you speak of is but an
afterbirth
;
we eat and drink many months before we are
conscious
of thoughts. And though some adults would seem to
refer all their actions to this moral sense, yet, in reality, it
is not so; for, dominant in them, their moral sense bridles
their instinctive passions; wherefore, they do not govern
themselves, but are governed by their very natures. Thus,
some men in youth are constitutionally as staid as I am
now. But shall we pronounce them pious and worthy
youths for this? Does he abstain, who is not incited?
And on the other hand, if the instinctive passions through
life naturally have the supremacy over the moral sense, as
in extreme cases we see it developed in irreclaimable
malefactors
,shall
we pronounce such, criminal and detestable
wretches? My lord, it is easier for some men to be saints,
than for others not to be sinners.
That will do, Babbalanja; you are on the verge, take
not the leap! Go back whence you set out, and tell us of
that other, and still more mysterious Azzageddi; him whom
you hinted to have palmed himself off on you for you yourself.
Well, then, my lord,Azzageddi still set aside,upon
that self-same inscrutable stranger, I charge all those past
actions of mine, which in the retrospect appear to me such
eminent folly, that I am confident, it was not I, Babbalanja,
now speaking, that committed them. Nevertheless, my
lord, this very day I may do some act, which at a future
period may seem equally senseless; for in one life-time we live
a hundred lives. By the incomprehensible stranger in me,
I say, this body of mine has been rented out scores of times,
though always one dark chamber in me is retained by the
old mystery.
Will you never come to the mark, Babbalanja? Tell
me something direct of the stranger. Who, what is he?
Introduce him.
My lord, I can not. He is locked up in me. In a
mask, he dodges me. He prowls about in me, hither and
thither; he peers, and I stare. This is he who talks in my
sleep, revealing my secrets; and takes me to unheard of
realms, beyond the skies of Mardi. So present is he always,
that I seem not so much to live of myself, as to be a mere
apprehension of the unaccountable being that is in me. Yet
all the time, this being is I, myself.
Babbalanja, said Media, you have fairly turned
yourself inside out.
Yes, my lord, said Mohi, and he has so unsettled me,
that I begin to think all Mardi a square circle.
How is that, Babbalanja, said Media, is a circle
square?
No, my lord, but ever since Mardi began, we Mardians
have been essaying our best to square it.
Cleverly retorted. Now, Babbalanja, do you not
imagine
,
that you may do harm by disseminating these
sophisms
of yours; which like your devil theory, would seem to
relieve all Mardi from moral accountability?
My lord, at bottom, men wear no bonds that other men
can strike off; and have no immunities, of which other men
can deprive them. Tell a good man that he is free to
commit
murder,will he murder? Tell a murderer that at
the peril of his soul he indulges in murderous thoughts,
will that make him a saint?
Again on the verge, Babbalanja? Take not the leap,
I say.
I can leap no more, my lord. Already I am down,
down, down.
Philosopher, said Media, what with Azzageddi, and
the mysterious indweller you darkly hint of, I marvel not
that you are puzzled to decide upon your identity. But
when do you seem most yourself?
When I sleep, and dream not, my lord.
Indeed?
Why then, a fool's cap might be put on you, and you
would not know it.
The very turban he ought to wear, muttered Mohi.
Yet, my lord, I live while consciousness is not mine,
while to all appearances I am a clod. And may not this
same state of being, though but alternate with me, be
continually
that of many dumb, passive objects we so carelessly
regard? Trust me, there are more things alive than those
that crawl, or fly, or swim. Think you, my lord, there is
no sensation in being a tree? feeling the sap in one's boughs,
the breeze in one's foliage? think you it is nothing to be a
world? one of a herd, bison-like, wending its way across
boundless meadows of ether? In the sight of a fowl, that
sees not our souls, what are our own tokens of animation?
That we move, make a noise, have organs, pulses, and are
compounded of fluids and solids. And all these are in this
Mardi as a unit. Daily the slow, majestic throbbings of its
heart are perceptible on the surface in the tides of the
lagoon
.
Its rivers are its veins; when agonized, earthquakes
are its throes; it shouts in the thunder, and weeps in the
shower; and as the body of a bison is covered with hair, so
Mardi is covered with grasses and vegetation, among which,
we parasitical things do but crawl, vexing and tormenting
the patient creature to which we cling. Nor yet, hath it
recovered from the pain of the first foundation that was laid.
Mardi is alive to its axis. When you pour water, does it
not gurgle? When you strike a pearl shell, does it not
ring? Think you there is no sensation in being a rock?
To exist, is to be; to be, is to be something: to be
something
,
is
Go on, said Media.
And what is it, to be something? said Yoomy artlessly.
Bethink yourself of what went before, said Media.
Lose not the thread, said Mohi.
It has snapped, said Babbalanja.
I breathe again, said Mohi.
But what a stepping-off place you came to then,
philosopher
,
said Media. By the way, is it not old Bardianna
who says, that no Mardian should undertake to walk,
without
keeping one foot foremost?
To return to the vagueness of the notion I have of
myself, said Babbalanja.
An appropriate theme, said Media, proceed.
My lord, murmured Mohi, Is not this philosopher
like a centipede? Cut off his head, and still he crawls.
There are times when I fancy myself a lunatic,
resumed
Babbalanja.
Ah, now he's beginning to talk sense, whispered Mohi.
Surely you forget, Babbalanja, said Media. Howmany
more theories have you? First, you are possessed by a
devil; then rent yourself out to the indweller; and now
turn yourself into a mad-house. You are inconsistent.
And for that very reason, my lord,
not
inconsistent; for
the sum of my inconsistencies makes up my consistency.
And to be consistent to one's self, is often to be inconsistent
to Mardi. Common consistency implies unchangeableness;
but much of the wisdom here below lives in a state of
transition
.
Ah! murmured Mohi, my head goes round again.
Azzageddi aside, then, my lord, and also, for the nonce,
the mysterious indweller, I come now to treat of myself as
a lunatic. But this last conceit is not so much based upon
the madness of particular actions, as upon the whole drift
of my ordinary and hourly ones; those, in which I most
resemble all other Mardians. It seems like going through
with some nonsensical whim-whams, destitute of fixed
purpose
.
For though many of my actions seem to have objects,
and all of them somehow run into each other; yet, where
is the grand result? To what final purpose, do I walk
about, eat, think, dream? To what great end, does Mohi
there, now stroke his beard?
But I was doing it unconsciously, said Mohi, dropping
his hand, and lifting his head.
Just what I would be at, old man. `What we do,
we do blindly,' says old Bardianna. Many things we do,
we do without knowing,as with you and your beard,
Mohi. And many others we know not, in their true
bearing
at least, till they are past. Are not half our lives spent
in reproaches for foregone actions, of the true nature and
consequences of which, we were wholly ignorant at the
time? Says old Bardianna, `Did I not so often feel an
appetite
for my yams, I should think every thing a dream;'
so puzzling to him, seemed the things of this Mardi. But
Alla-Malolla goes further. Says he, `Let us club together,
fellow-riddles:Kings, clowns, and intermediates. We
are bundles of comical sensations; we bejuggle ourselves
into strange phantasies: we are air, wind, breath, bubbles;
our being is told in a tick.'
Now, then, Babbalanja, said Media, what have you
come to in all this rhapsody? You everlastingly travel in a
circle.
And so does the sun in heaven, my lord; like me, it
goes round, and gives light as it goes. Old Bardianna, too,
revolved. He says so himself. In his roundabout chapter
on Cycles and Epicycles, with Notes on the Ecliptic, he
thus discourseth:`All things revolve upon some center, to
them, fixed; for the centripetal is ever too much for the
centrifugal. Wherefore, it is a perpetual cycling with us,
without progression; and we fly round, whether we will or
no. To stop, were to sink into space. So, over and over
we go, and round and round; double-shuffle, on our axis, and
round the sun.' In an another place, he says:`There is
neither apogee nor perigee, north nor south, right nor left;
what to-night is our zenith, to-morrow is our nadir; stand
as we will, we stand on our heads; essay to spring into the
air, and down we come; here we stick; our very bones
make glue.'
Enough, enough, Babbalanja, cried Media. You
are a very wise Mardian; but the wisest Mardians make
the most consummate fools.
So they do, my lord; but I was interrupted. I was
about to say, that there is no place but the universe; no
limit but the limitless; no bottom but the bottomless.
CHAPTER XL.
OF THE SORCERERS IN THE ISLE OF MINDA.
Tiffin
! tiffin! cried Media; time for tiffin! Up,
comrades! and while the mat is being spread, walk we to
the bow, and inhale the breeze for an appetite. Hark ye,
Vee-Vee! forget not that calabash with the sea-blue seal,
and a round ring for a brand. Rare old stuff, that, Mohi;
older than you: the circumnavigator, I call it. My sire
had a canoe launched for the express purpose of carrying it
thrice round Mardi for a flavor. It was many moons on
the voyage; the mariners never sailed faster than three
knots. Ten would spoil the best wine ever floated.
Tiffin over, and the blue-sealed calabash all but hid in the
great cloud raised by our pipes, Media proposed to board it
in the smoke. So, goblet in hand, we all gallantly charged,
and came off victorious from the fray.
Then seated again, and serenely puffing in a circle, the
circumnavigator meanwhile pleasantly going the rounds,
Media called upon Mohi for something entertaining.
Now, of all the old gossips in Mardi, surely our delightful
old Diodorus was furnished with the greatest possible variety
of histories, chronicles, anecdotes, memoirs, legends,
traditions
,
and biographies. There was no end to the library
he carried. In himself, he was the whole history of Mardi,
amplified, not abridged, in one volume.
In obedience, then, to King Media's command, Mohi
regaled
the company with a narrative, in substance as
follows
:
In a certain quarter of the Archipelago was an island
called Minda; and in Minda were many sorcerers, employed
in the social differences and animosities of the people of that
unfortunate land. If a Mindarian deemed himself aggrieved
or insulted by a countryman, he forthwith repaired to one of
these sorcerers; who, for an adequate consideration, set to
work with his spells, keeping himself in the dark, and
directing
them against the obnoxious individual. And full soon, by
certain peculiar sensations, this individual, discovering what
was going on, would straightway hie to his own professor of
the sable art, who, being well feed, in due time brought
about certain counter-charms, so that in the end it
sometimes
fell out that neither party was gainer or loser, save by
the sum of his fees.
But the worst of it was, that in some cases all knowledge
of these spells were at the outset hidden from the victim;
who, hearing too late of the mischief brewing, almost always
fell a prey to his foe; which calamity was held the height
of the art. But as the great body of sorcerers were about
matched in point of skill, it followed that the parties
employing
them were so likewise. Hence arose those
interminable
contests, in which many moons were spent, both parties
toiling after their common destruction.
Indeed, to say nothing of the obstinacy evinced by their
employers, it was marvelous, the pertinacity of the sorcerers
themselves. To the very last tooth in their employer's
pouches, they would stick to their spells; never giving over
till he was financially or physically defunct.
But much as they were vilified, no people in Minda were
half so disinterested as they. Certain indispensable
conditions
secured, some of them were as ready to undertake
the perdition of one man as another; good, bad, or
indifferent
,
it made little matter.
What wonder, then, that such abominable mercenaries
should cause a mighty deal of mischief in Minda; privately
going about, inciting peaceable folks to enmities with their
neighbors; and with marvelous alacrity, proposing
themselves
as the very sorcerers to rid them of the annoyances
suggested as existing.
Indeed, it even happened that a sorcerer would be
secretly
retained to work spells upon a victim, who, from his
bodily sensations, suspecting something wrong, but knowing
not what, would repair to that self-same sorcerer, engaging
him to counteract any mischief that might be brewing. And
this worthy would at once undertake the business; when,
having both parties in his hands, he kept them forever in
suspense; meanwhile seeing to it well, that they failed not
in handsomely remunerating him for his pains.
At one time, there was a prodigious excitement about
these sorcerers, growing out of some alarming revelations
concerning their practices. In several villages of Minda,
they were sought to be put down. But fruitless the
attempt
;
it was soon discovered that already their spells were
so spread abroad, and they themselves so mixed up with the
every-day affairs of the isle, that it was better to let their
vocation alone, than, by endeavoring to suppress it, breed
additional troubles. Ah! they were a knowing and a
cunning
set, those sorcerers; very hard to overcome, cajole, or
circumvent.
But in the name of the Magi, what were these spells of
theirs, so potent and occult? On all hands it was agreed,
that they derived their greatest virtue from the fumes of
certain compounds, whose ingredientshorrible to tell
were mostly obtained from the human heart; and that by
variously mixing these ingredients, they adapted their
multifarious
enchantments.
They were a vain and arrogant race. Upon the strength
of their dealing in the dark, they affected even more mystery
than belonged to them; when interrogated concerning their
science, would confound the inquirer by answers couched in
an extraordinary jargon, employing words almost as long as
anacondas. But all this greatly prevailed with the common
people.
Nor was it one of the least remarkable things, that
oftentimes
two sorcerers, contrarily employed upon a Mindarian,
one to attack, the other to defend,would nevertheless
be upon the most friendly terms with each other; which
curious circumstance never begat the slightest suspicions in
the mind of the victim.
Another phenomenon: If from any cause, two sorcerers
fell out, they seldom exercised their spells upon each other;
ascribable to this, perhaps,that both being versed in the
art, neither could hope to get the advantage.
But for all the opprobrium cast upon these sorcerers,
part of which they deserved, the evils imputed to them
were mainly, though indirectly, ascribable to the very
persons who abused them; nay, to the very persons who
employed them; the latter being by far the loudest in their
vilifyings; for which, indeed, they had excellent reason.
Nor was it to be denied, that in certain respects, the
sorcerers
were productive of considerable good. The nature of
their pursuits leading them deep into the arcana of mind, they
often lighted upon important discoveries; along with much
that was cumbersome, accumulated valuable examples
concerning
the inner working of the hearts of the Mindarians;
and often waxed eloquent in elucidating the mysteries of
iniquity.
Yet was all this their lore graven upon so uncouth,
outlandish
,
and antiquated tablets, that it was all but lost to
the mass of their countrymen; and some old sachem of a
wise man is quoted as having said, that their treasures were
locked up after such a fashion, that for old iron, the key
was worth more than the chest and its contents.
CHAPTER XLI.
CHIEFLY OF KING BELLO.
Now
Taji, said Media, with old Bello of the Hump
whose island of Dominora is before us, I am at variance.
Ah! How so?
A dull recital, but you shall have it.
And forthwith his Highness began.
This princely quarrel originated, it seems, in a slight
jostling concerning the proprietorship of a barren islet in a
very remote quarter of the lagoon. At the outset the
matter might have been easily adjusted, had the parties but
exchanged a few amicable words. But each disdaining to
visit the other, to discuss so trivial an affair, the business of
negotiating an understanding was committed to certain
plenipos, men with lengthy tongues, who scorned to utter a
word short of a polysyllable.
Now, the more these worthies penetrated into the
difficulty
,
the wider became the breach; till what was at first
a mere gap, became a yawning gulf.
But that which had perhaps tended more than any thing
else to deepen the variance of the kings, was hump-backed
Bello's dispatching to Odo, as his thirtieth plenipo, a
diminutive
little negotiator, who all by himself, in a solitary canoe,
sailed over to have audience of Media; into whose presence
he was immediately ushered.
Darting one glance at him, the king turned to his
chieftains
,
and said:By much straining of your eyes, my
lords, can you perceive this insignificant manikin? What!
are there no tall men in Dominora, that King Bello must
needs send this dwarf hither?
And charging his attendents to feed the embassador
extraordinary with the soft pap of the cocoanut, and
provide
nurses during his stay, the monarch retired from the
arbor of audience.
As I am a man, shouted the despised plenipo, raising
himself on his toes, my royal master will resent this affront!
A dwarf, forsooth!Thank Oro, I am no long-drawn
giant! There is as much stuff in me, as in others; what
is spread out in their clumsy carcasses, in me is condensed.
I am much in little! And that much, thou shalt know
full soon, disdainful King of Odo!
Speak not against our lord the king, cried the
attendants
.
And speak not ye to me, ye headless spear poles!
And so saying, under sufferance of being small, the plenipo
was permitted to depart unmolested; for all his bravadoes,
fobbing his credentials and affronts.
Apprized of his servant's ignoble reception, the choleric
Bello burst forth in a storm of passion; issuing orders for
one thousand conch shells to be blown, and his warriors to
assemble by land and by sea.
But bethinking him of the hostilities that might ensue,
the sagacious Media hit upon an honorable expedient to ward
off an event for which he was then unprepared. With all
haste he dispatched to the hump-backed king a little dwarf
of his own; who voyaging over to Dominora in a canoe,
sorry and solitary as that of Bello's plenipo, in like manner,
received the same insults. The effect whereof, was, to
strike a balance of affronts; upon the principle, that a blow
given, heals one received.
Nevertheless, these proceedings but amounted to a
postponement
of hostilities; for soon after, nothing prevented the
two kings from plunging into war, but the following
judicious
considerations. First: Media was almost afraid of
being beaten. Second: Bello was almost afraid to conquer.
Media, because he was inferior in men and arms; Bello,
because
vol. ii.H
his aggrandizement was already a subject of warlike
comment among the neighboring kings.
Indeed, did the old chronicler Braid-Beard speak truth,
there were some tribes in Mardi, that accounted this king
of Dominora a testy, quarrelsome, rapacious old monarch;
the indefatigable breeder of contentions and wars; the elder
brother of this household of nations, perpetually essaying to
lord it over the juveniles; and though his patrimonial
dominions
were situated to the north of the lagoon, not the
slightest misunderstanding took place between the rulers of
the most distant islands, than this doughty old cavalier on a
throne, forthwith thrust his insolent spear into the matter,
though it in no wise concerned him, and fell to irritating all
parties by his gratuitous interference.
Especially was he officious in the concerns of Porpheero,
a neighboring island, very large and famous, whose
numerous
broad valleys were divided among many rival kings:
the king of Franko, a small-framed, poodle-haired, fine, fiery
gallant; finical in his tatooing; much given to the dance
and glory;the king of Ibeereea, a tall and stately cavalier,
proud, generous, punctilious, temperate in wine; one hand
forever on his javelin, the other, in superstitions homage,
lifted to his gods; his limbs all over marks of stakes and
crosses;the king of Luzianna; a slender, dark-browed
chief; at times wrapped in a moody robe, beneath which he
fumbled something, as if it were a dagger; but otherwise a
sprightly troubadour, given to serenades and moonlight;
the many chiefs of sunny Latianna; minstrel monarchs, full
of song and sentiment; fiercer in love than war; glorious
bards of freedom; but rendering tribute while they sang;
the priest-king of Vatikanna; his chest marked over with
antique tatooings; his crown, a cowl; his rusted scepter
swaying over falling towers, and crumbling mounds; full of
the superstitious past; askance, eyeing the suspicious time
to come;the king of Hapzaboro; portly, pleasant; a lover
of wild boar's meat; a frequent quaffer from the can; in
his better moods, much fancying solid comfort;the
eight-and-thirty
banded kings, chieftains, seigniors, and oligarchies
of the broad hill and dale of Tutoni; clubbing together their
domains, that none might wrest his neighbor's; an earnest
race; deep thinkers, deeper drinkers; long pipes, long heads;
their wise ones given to mystic cogitations, and consultations
with the devil;the twin kings of Zandinavia; hardy,
frugal
mountaineers; upright of spine and heart; clad in skins
of bears;the king of Jutlanda; much like their Highnesses
of Zandinavia; a seal-skin cap his crown; a fearless sailor
of his frigid seas;the king of Muzkovi; a shaggy, icicled
White-bear of a despot in the north; said to reign over
millions of acres of glaciers; had vast provinces of
snowdrifts
,
and many flourishing colonies among the floating
ice-bergs
.
Absolute in his rule as Predestination in
metaphysics
,
did he command all his people to give up the ghost, it
would be held treason to die last. Very precise and foppish
in his imperial tastes was this monarch. Disgusted with
the want of uniformity in the stature of his subjects, he was
said to nourish thoughts of killing off all those below his
prescribed standardsix feet, long measure. Immortal
souls were of no account in his fatal wars; since, in some
of his serf-breeding estates, they were daily manufactured to
order.
Now, to all the above-mentioned monarchs, old Bello
would frequently dispatch heralds; announcing, for
example
,
his unalterable resolution, to espouse the cause of this
king, against that; at the very time, perhaps, that their
Serene Superfluities, instead of crossing spears, were
touching
flagons. And upon these occasions, the kings would
often send back word to old Bello, that instead of troubling
himself with their concerns, he might far better attend to
his own; which, they hinted, were in a sad way, and much
needed reform.
The royal old warrior's pretext for these and all similar
proceedings, was the proper adjustment in Porpheero, of
what he facetiously styled the Equipoise of Calabashes;
which he stoutly swore was essential to the security of the
various tribes in that country.
But who put the balance into thy hands, King Bello?
cried the indignant nations.
Oro! shouted the hump-backed king, shaking his
javelin.
Superadded to the paternal interest which Bello betrayed
in the concerns of the kings of Porpheero, according to our
chronicler, he also manifested no less interest in those of the
remotest islands. Indeed, where he found a rich country,
inhabited by a people, deemed by him barbarous and
incapable
of wise legislation, he sometimes relieved them from
their political anxieties, by assuming the dictatorship over
them. And if incensed at his conduct, they flew to their
spears, they were accounted rebels, and treated accordingly.
But as old Mohi very truly observed,herein, Bello was
not alone; for throughout Mardi, all strong nations, as well
as all strong men, loved to govern the weak. And those
who most taunted King Bello for his political rapacity, were
open to the very same charge. So with Vivenza, a distant
island, at times very loud in denunciations of Bello, as a
great national brigand. Not yet wholly extinct in Vivenza,
were its aboriginal people, a race of wild Nimrods and
hunters, who year by year were driven further and further
into remoteness, till as one of their sad warriors said, after
continual removes along the log, his race was on the point
of being remorselessly pushed off the end.
Now, Bello was a great geographer, and land surveyor,
and gauger of the seas. Terraqueous Mardi, he was
continually
exploring in quest of strange empires. Much he
loved to take the altitude of lofty mountains, the depth of
deep rivers, the breadth of broad isles. Upon the highest
pinnacles of commanding capes and promontories, he loved
to hoist his flag. He circled Mardi with his watch-towers:
and the distant voyager passing wild rocks in the remotest
waters, was startled by hearing the tattoo, or the reveille,
beating from hump-backed Bello's omnipresent drum.
Among Antartic glaciers, his shrill bugle calls mingled with
the scream of the gulls; and so impressed seemed universal
nature with the sense of his dominion, that the very clouds
in heaven never sailed over Dominora without rendering the
tribute of a shower; whence the air of Dominora was more
moist than that of any other clime.
In all his grand undertakings, King Bello was marvelously
assisted by his numerous fleets of war-canoes; his navy
being the largest in Mardi. Hence his logicians swore that
the entire Lagoon was his; and that all prowling whales,
prowling keels, and prowling sharks were invaders. And
with this fine conceit to inspire them, his poets-laureat
composed
some glorious old salt-water odes, enough to make your
very soul sing to hear them.
But though the rest of Mardi much delighted to list
to such noble ministrelsy, they agreed not with Bello's
poets in deeming the lagoon their old monarch's hereditary
domain.
Once upon a time, the paddlers of the hump-backed king,
meeting upon the broad lagoon certain canoes belonging to
the before-mentioned island of Vivenza; these paddlers
seized upon several of their occupants; and feeling their
pulses, declared them born men of Dominora; and therefore,
not free to go whithersoever they would; for, unless they
could somehow get themselves born over again, they must
forever remain subject to Bello. Shed your hair; nay, your
skin, if you will, but shed your allegiance you can not;
while you have bones, they are Bello's. So, spite of all
expostulations and attempts to prove alibis, these luckless
paddlers were dragged into the canoes of Dominora, and
commanded to paddle home their captors.
Whereof hearing, the men of Vivenza were thrown into
a great ferment; and after a mighty pow-wow over their
council fire, fitting out several double-keeled canoes, they
sallied out to sea, in quest of those, whom they styled the
wholesale corsairs of Dominora.
But lucky perhaps it was, that at this juncture, in all
parts of Mardi, the fleets of the hump-backed king, were
fighting, gunwale and gunwale, alongside of numerous foes;
else there had borne down upon the canoes of the men of
Vivenza so tremendous an armada, that the very swell
under its thousand prows might have flooded their scattered
proas forever out of sight.
As it was, Bello dispatched a few of his smaller craft to
seek out, and incidentally run down the enemy; and
without
returning home, straightway proceed upon more
important
enterprises.
But it so chanced, that Bello's crafts, one by one meeting
the foe, in most cases found the canoes of Vivenza much
larger than their own; and manned by more men, with
hearts bold as theirs; whence, in the ship-duels that
ensued
,
they were worsted; and the canoes of Vivenza,
locking
their yard-arms into those of the vanquished, very
courteously
gallanted them into their coral harbors.
Solely imputing these victories to their superior intrepidity
and skill, the people of Vivenza were exceedingly boisterous
in their triumph; raising such obstreperous peans, that they
gave themselves hoarse throats; insomuch, that according to
Mohi, some of the present generation are fain to speak
through their noses.
CHAPTER XLII.
DOMINORA AND VIVENZA.
The
three canoes still gliding on, some further particulars
were narrated concerning Dominora; and incidentally, of
other isles.
It seems that his love of wide dominion sometimes led
the otherwise sagacious Bello into the most extravagant
actions
.
If the chance accumulation of soil and drift-wood
about any detached shelf of coral in the lagoon held forth
the remotest possibility of the eventual existence of an islet
there, with all haste he dispatched canoes to the spot, to
take prospective possession of the as yet nearly sub-marine
territory; and if possible, eject the zoophytes.
During an unusually low tide, here and there baring the
outer reef of the Archipelago, Bello caused his royal spear to
be planted upon every place thus exposed, in token of his
supreme claim thereto.
Another anecdote was this: that to Dominora there came
a rumor, that in a distant island dwelt a man with an
uncommonly
large nose; of most portentous dimensions, indeed;
by the soothsayers supposed to foreshadow some dreadful
calamity. But disregarding these superstitious conceits,
Bello forthwith dispatched an agent, to discover whether
this huge promontory of a nose was geographically
available
;
if so, to secure the same, by bringing the proprietor
back.
Now, by sapient old Mohi, it was esteemed a very
happy thing for Mardi at large, that the subjects whom
Bello sent to populate his foreign acquisitions, were but too
apt to throw off their vassalage, so soon as they deemed
themselves able to cope with him.
Indeed, a fine country in the western part of Mardi, in
this very manner, became a sovereignnay, a republican
state. It was the nation to which Mohi had previously
alludedVivenza. But in the flush and pride of having
recently attained their national majority, the men of Vivenza
were perhaps too much inclined to carry a vauntful crest.
And because intrenched in their fastnesses, after much
protracted
fighting, they had eventually succeeded in repelling
the warriors dispatched by Bello to crush their insurrection,
they were unanimous in the opinion, that the hump-backed
king had never before been so signally chastised. Whereas,
they had not so much vanquished Bello, as defended their
shores; even as a young lion will protect its den against
legions of unicorns, though, away from home, he might be
torn to pieces. In truth, Braid-Beard declared, that at the
time of this war, Dominora couched ten long spears for
every short javelin Vivenza could dart; though the javelins
were stoutly hurled as the spears.
But, superior in men and arms, why, at last, gave over
King Bello the hope of reducing those truculent men of
Vivenza
?
One reason was, as Mohi said, that many of his
fighting men were abundantly occupied in other quarters of
Mardi; nor was he long in discovering, that fight he never
so valiantly, Vivenzanot yet its inhabitantswas wholly
unconquerable. Thought Bello, Mountains are sturdy foes;
fate hard to dam.
Yet, the men of Vivenza were no dastards; not to lie,
coming from lion-like loins, they were a lion-loined race.
Did not their bards pronounce them a fresh start in the
Mardian species; requiring a new world for their full
development
?
For be it known, that the great land of Kolumbo,
no inconsiderable part of which was embraced by Vivenza,
was the last island discovered in the Archipelago.
In good round truth, and as if an impartialist from
Arcturus
spoke it, Vivenza was a noble land. Like a young
tropic tree she stood, laden down with greenness, myriad
blossoms, and the ripened fruit thick-hanging from one
bough. She was promising as the morning.
Or Vivenza might be likened to St. John, feeding on
locusts
and wild honey, and with prophetic voice, crying to
the nations from the wilderness. Or, child-like, standing
among the old robed kings and emperors of the Archipelago,
Vivenza seemed a young Messiah, to whose discourse the
bearded Rabbis bowed.
So seemed Vivenza in its better aspect. Nevertheless,
Vivenza was a braggadocio in Mardi; the only brave one
ever known. As an army of spurred and crested roosters,
her people chanticleered at the resplendent rising of their
sun. For shame, Vivenza! Whence thy undoubted valor?
Did ye not bring it with ye from the bold old shores of
Dominora, where there is a fullness of it left? What isle
but Dominora could have supplied thee with that stiff spine
of thine?That heart of boldest beat? Oh, Vivenza!
know that true grandeur is too big for a boast; and nations,
as well as men, may be too clever to be great.
But what more of King Bello? Notwithstanding his
territorial acquisitiveness, and aversion to relinquishing stolen
nations, he was yet a glorious old king; rather cholerica
word and a blowbut of a right royal heart. Rail at him
as they might, at bottom, all the isles were proud of him.
And almost in spite of his rapacity, upon the whole, perhaps,
they were the better for his deeds. For if sometimes he did
evil with no very virtuous intentions, he had fifty ways of
accomplishing good with the best; and a thousand ways of
doing good without meaning it. According to an ancient
oracle, the hump-backed monarch was but one of the most
conspicuous pieces on a board, where the gods played for
their own entertainment.
But here it must not be omitted, that of late, King Bello
had somewhat abated his efforts to extend his dominions.
H*
Various causes were assigned. Some thought it arose from
the fact that already he found his territories too extensive for
one scepter to rule; that his more remote colonies largely
contributed to his tribulations, without correspondingly
contributing
to his revenues. Others affirmed that his hump
was getting too mighty for him to carry; others still, that
the nations were waxing too strong for him. With prophetic
solemnity, head-shaking sages averred that he was growing
older and older; had passed his grand climacteric; and
though it was a hale old age with him, yet it was not his
lusty youth; that though he was daily getting rounder, and
rounder in girth, and more florid of face, that these,
how-beit
,
were rather the symptoms of a morbid obesity, than of
a healthful robustness. These wise ones predicted that very
soon poor Bello would go off in an apoplexy.
But in Vivenza there were certain blusterers, who often
thus prated: The Hump-back's hour is come; at last the
old teamster will be gored by the nations he's yoked; his
game is done,let him show his hand and throw up his
scepter; he cumbers Mardi,let him be cut down and
burned; he stands in the way of his betters,let him sheer
to one side; he has shut up many eyes, and now himself
grows blind; he hath committed horrible atrocities during
his long career, the old sinner!now, let him quickly say
his prayers and be beheaded.
Howbeit, Bello lived on; enjoying his dinners, and taking
his jorums as of yore. Ah, I have yet a jolly long lease
of life, thought he over his wine; and like unto some
obstinate
old uncle, he persisted in flourishing, in spite of the
prognostications of the nephew nations, which at his demise,
perhaps hoped to fall heir to odd parts of his possessions:
Three streaks of fat valleys to one of lean mountains!
CHAPTER XLIII.
THEY LAND AT DOMINORA.
As
erewhile recounted, not being on the best terms in
Mardi with the King of Dominora, Media saw fit to draw
nigh unto his dominions in haughty state; he (Media) being
upon excellent terms with himself. Our sails were set, our
paddles paddling, streamers streaming, and Vee-Vee in the
shark's mouth, clamorous with his conch. The din was
soon heard; and sweeping into a fine broad bay we beheld
its margin seemingly pebbled in the distance with heads;
so populous the land.
Winding through a noble valley, we presently came to
Bello's palace, couchant and bristling in a grove. The
upright canes composing its front projected above the eaves
in a long row of spear-heads fluttering with scarlet pennons;
while below, from the intervals of the canes, were slantingly
thrust three tiers of decorated lances. A warlike aspect!
The entire structure looking like the broadside of the
Macedonian
phalanx, advancing to the charge, helmeted with a roof.
Ah, Bello, said Media, thou dwellest among thy
quills like the porcupine.
I feel a prickly heat coming over me, cried Mohi,
my lord Media, let us enter.
Ay, said Babbalanja, safer the center of peril, than
the circumference.
Passing under an arch, formed by two pikes crossed, we
found ourselves targets in prospective, for certain flingers of
javelins, with poised weapons, occupying the angles of the
palace.
Fronting us, stood a portly old warrior, spear in hand,
hump on back, and fire in eye.
Is it war? he cried, pointing his pike, or peace?
reversing it.
Peace, said Media.
Whereupon advancing, King Bello courteously welcomed
us.
He was an arsenal to behold: Upon his head the
hereditary
crown of Dominora,a helmet of the sea-porcupine's
hide, bristling all over with spikes, in front displaying a
river-horse's horn, leveled to the charge; thrust through his
ears were barbed arrows; and from his dyed shark-skin
girdle, depended a kilt of strung javelins.
The broad chest of Bello was the chart of Mardi.
Tattooed
in sea-blue were all the groups and clusters of the
Archipelago; and every time he breathed, rose and fell the
isles, as by a tide: Dominora full upon his heart.
His sturdy thighs were his triumphal arch; whereon in
numerous medallions, crests, and shields, were blazoned all
his victories by sea and land.
His strong right arm was Dominora's scroll of Fame,
where all her heroes saw their names recorded.An endless
roll!
Our chronicler avouched, that on the sole of Bello's
dexter
foot was stamped the crest of Franko's king, his
hereditary
foe. Thus, thus, cried Bello, stamping, thus I
hourly crush him.
In stature, Bello was a mountaineer; but, as over some
tall tower impends the hill-side cliff, so Bello's Athos hump
hung over him. Could it be, as many of his nobles held,
that the old monarch's hump was his sensorium and source
of strength; full of nerves, muscles, ganglions and tendons?
Yet, year by year it grew, ringed like the bole of his palms.
The toils of war increased it. But another skirmish with
the isles, said the wiseacres of Porpheero, and Bello's mount
will crush him.
Against which calamity to guard, his medicos and
Sangredos
sought the hump's reduction. But down it would not
come. Then by divers mystic rites, his magi tried.
Making
a deep pit, many teeth they dropped therein. But they
could not fill it. Hence, they called it the Sinking Pit, for
bottom it had none. Nevertheless, the magi said, when this
pit is filled, Bello's hump you'll see no more. Then,
hurrah
for the hump! cried the nobles, for he will never hurl
it off. Long life to the hump! By the hump we will
rally and die! Cheer up, King Bello! Stand up, old
king!
But these were they, who when their sovereign went
abroad, with that Athos on his back, followed idly in its
shade; while Bello leaned heavily upon his people,
staggering
as they went.
Ay, sorely did Bello's goodly stature lean; but though
many swore he soon must fall; nevertheless, like Pisa's
Leaning Tower, he may long lean over, yet never nod.
Visiting Dominora in a friendly way, in good time, we
found King Bello very affable; in hospitality, almost
exceeding
portly Borabolla: October-plenty reigned
throughout
his palace borders.
Our first reception over, a sumptuous repast was served,
at which much lively talk was had.
Of Taji, Bello sought to know, whether his solar Majesty
had yet made a province of the moon; whether the Astral
hosts were of much account as territories, or mere Motoos,
as the little tufts of verdure are denominated, here and there
clinging to Mardi's circle reef; whether the people in the
sun vilified him (Bello) as they did in Mardi; and what
they thought of an event, so ominous to the liberties of
the universe, as the addition to his navy of three large
canoes.
Ere long, so fused in social love we grew, that Bello,
filling
high his can, and clasping Media's palm, drank
everlasting
amity with Odo.
So over their red cups, the two kings forgot their
differences
,
and concerning the disputed islet nothing more was
ever heard; especially, as it so turned out, that while they
were most hot about it, it had suddenly gone out of sight,
being of volcanic origin.
CHAPTER XLIV.
THROUGH DOMINORA, THEY WANDER AFTER YILLAH.
At
last, withdrawing from the presence of King Bello,
we went forth, still intent on our search.
Many brave sights we saw. Fair fields; the whole
island a garden; green hedges all round; neat lodges, thick
as white mice in the landscape; old oak woods, hale and
hearty as ever; old temples buried in ivy; old shrines of
old heroes, deep buried in broad groves of bay trees; old
rivers laden down with heavy-freighted canoes; humped
hills, like droves of camels, piled up with harvests; every
sign and token of a glorious abundance, every sign and token
of generations of renown. Rare sight! fine sight! none
rarer, none finer in Mardi.
But roving on through this ravishing region, we passed
through a corn-field in full beard, where a haggard old
reaper laid down his hook, beseeching charity for the sake
of the gods.Bread, bread! or I die mid these sheaves!
Thrash out your grain, and want not.
Alas, masters, this grain is not mine; I plough, I sow,
I reap, I bind, I stack,Lord Primo garners.
Rambling on, we came to a hamlet, hidden in a hollow;
and beneath weeping willows saw many mournful maidens
seated on a bank; beside each, a wheel that was broken.
Lo, we starve, they cried, our distaffs are snapped; no
more may we weave and spin!
Then forth issued from vaults clamorous crowds of men,
hands tied to their backs.Bread! Bread! they cried.
The magician hath turned us out from our glen, where we
labored of yore in the days of the merry Green Queen. He
has pinioned us hip and arm that we starve. Like sheep
we die off with the rot.Curse on the magician. A curse
on his spell.
Bending our steps toward the glen, roaring down the
rocks we descried a stream from the mountains. But ere
those waters gained the sea, vassal tribute they rendered.
Conducted through culverts and moats, they turned great
wheels, giving life to ten thousand fangs and fingers, whose
gripe no power could withstand, yet whose touch was soft
as the velvet paw of a kitten. With brute force, they
heaved down great weights, then daintily wove and spun;
like the trunk of the elephant, which lays lifeless a
river-horse
,
and counts the pulses of a moth. On all sides, the
place seemed alive with its spindles. Round and round,
round and round; throwing off wondrous births at every
revolving; ceaseless as the cycles that circle in heaven.
Loud hummed the loom, flew the shuttle like lightning, red
roared the grim forge, rung anvil and sledge; yet no mortal
was seen.
What ho, magician! Come forth from thy cave!
But all deaf were the spindles, as the mutes, that mutely
wait on the Sultan.
Since we are born, we will live! so we read on a
crimson banner, flouting the crimson clouds, in the van of a
riotous red-bonneted mob, racing by us as we came from
the glen. Many more followed: black, or blood-stained:
Mardi is man's!
Down with landholders!
Our turn now!
Up rights! Down wrongs!
Bread! Bread!
Take the tide, ere it turns!
Waving their banners, and flourishing aloft clubs,
hammers
,
and sickles, with fierce yells the crowd ran on toward
the palace of Bello. Foremost, and inciting the rest by mad
outcries and gestures, were six masks; This way! This
way! they cried,by the wood; by the dark wood!
Whereupon all darted into the groves; when of a sudden,
the masks leaped forward, clearing a long covered trench,
into which fell many of those they led. But on raced the
masks; and gaining Bello's palace, and raising the alarm,
there sallied from thence a woodland of spears, which
charged upon the disordered ranks in the grove. A crash
as of icicles against icebergs round Zembla, and down went
the hammers and sickles. The host fled, hotly pursued.
Meanwhile brave heralds from Bello advanced, and with
chaplets crowned the six masks.Welcome, heroes!
worthy and valiant! they cried. Thus our lord Bello
rewards all those, who to do him a service, for hire betray
their kith and their kin.
Still pursuing our quest, wide we wandered through all
the sun and shade of Dominora; but nowhere was Yillah
found.
CHAPTER XLV.
THEY BEHOLD KING BELLO'S STATE CANOE.
At
last, bidding adieu to King Bello; and in the midst
of the lowing of oxen, breaking away from his many
hospitalities
,
we departed for the beach. But ere embarking, we
paused to gaze at an object, which long fixed our attention.
Now, as all bold cavaliers have ever delighted in special
chargers, gayly caparisoned, whereon upon grand occasions
to sally forth upon the plains: even so have maritime
potentates
ever prided themselves upon some holiday galley,
splendidly equipped, wherein to sail over the sea.
When of old, glory-seeking Jason, attended by his
promising
young lieutenants, Castor and Pollux, embarked on
that hardy adventure to Colchis, the brave planks of the
good ship Argos he trod, its model a swan to behold.
And when Trojan neas wandered West, and discovered
the pleasant land of Latium, it was in the fine craft Bis
Taurus that he sailed: its stern gloriously emblazoned, its
prow a leveled spear.
And to the sound of sackbut and psaltery, gliding down
the Nile, in the pleasant shade of its pyramids to welcome
mad Mark, Cleopatra was throned on the cedar quarter-deck
of a glorious gondola, silk and satin hung; its silver plated
oars, musical as flutes. So, too, Queen Bess was wont to
disport on old Thames.
And tough Torf-Egill, the Danish Sea-king, reckoned in
his stud, a slender yacht; its masts young Zetland firs; its
prow a seal, dog-like holding a sword-fish blade. He called
it the Grayhound, so swift was its keel; the Sea-hawk, so
blood-stained its beak.
And groping down his palace stairs, the blind old Doge
Dandolo, oft embarked in his gilded barge, like the
lord-mayor
setting forth in civic state from Guildhall in his
chariot
.
But from another sort of prow leaped Dandolo, when
at Constantinople, he foremost sprang ashore, and with a
right arm ninety years old, planted the standard of St. Mark
full among the long chin-pennons of the long-bearded Turks.
And Kumbo Sama, Emperor of Japan, had a
dragon-beaked
junk, a floating Juggernaut, wherein he burnt incense
to the sea-gods.
And Kannakoko, King of New Zealand; and the first
Tahitian
Pomaree; and the Pelew potentate, each possessed
long state canoes; sea-snakes, all; carved over like Chinese
card-cases, and manned with such scores of warriors, that
dipping their paddles in the sea, they made a commotion
like shoals of herring.
What wonder then, that Bello of the Hump, the old
sea-king
of Mardi, should sport a brave ocean-chariot?
In a broad arbor by the water-side, it was housed like
Alp Arslan's war-horse, or the charger Caligula deified;
upon its stern a wilderness of sculpture:shell-work,
medallions
,
masques, griffins, gulls, ogres, finned-lions, winged
walruses; all manner of sea-cavalry, crusading centaurs,
crocodiles, and sharks; and mermen, and mermaids, and
Neptune only knows all.
And in this craft, Doge-like, yearly did King Bello stand
up and wed with the Lagoon. But the custom originated
not in the manner of the Doge's, which was as follows; so,
at least, saith Ghibelli, who tells all about it:
When, in a stout sea-fight, Ziani defeated Barbarossa's
son Otho, sending his feluccas all flying, like frightened
water-fowl from a lake, then did his Holiness, the Pope,
present
unto him a ring; saying, Take this, oh Ziani, and
with it, the sea for thy bride; and every year wed her
again.
So the Doge's tradition; thus Bello's:
Ages ago, Dominora was circled by a reef, which expanding
in proportion to the extension of the isle's naval dominion, in
due time embraced the entire lagoon; and this marriage ring
zoned all the world.
But if the sea was King Bello's bride, an Adriatic
Tartar
he wedded; who, in her mad gales of passions, often
boxed about his canoes, and led his navies a very boisterous
life indeed.
And hostile prognosticators opined, that ere long she would
desert her old lord, and marry again. Already, they held,
she had made advances in the direction of Vivenza.
But truly, should she abandon old Bello, he would
straightway
after her with all his fleets; and never rest till his
queen was regained.
Now, old sea-king! look well to thy barge of state: for,
peradventure, the dry-rot may be eating into its keel; and
the wood-worms exploring into its spars.
Without heedful tending, any craft will decay; yet,
forever
may its first, fine model be preserved, though its prow
be renewed every spring, like the horns of the deer, if, in
repairing, plank be put for plank, rib for rib, in exactest
similitude. Even so, then, oh Bello! do thou with thy
barge.
CHAPTER XLVI.
WHEREIN BABBALANJA BOWS THRICE.
The
next morning's twilight found us once more afloat;
and yielding to that almost sullen feeling, but too apt to
prevail with some mortals at that hour, all but Media long
remained silent.
But now, a bright mustering is seen among the myriad
white Tartar tents in the Orient; like lines of spears defiling
upon some upland plain, the sunbeams thwart the sky.
And see! amid the blaze of banners, and the pawings of
ten thousand thousand golden hoofs, day's mounted Sultan,
Xerxes-like, moves on: the Dawn his standard, East and
West his cymbals.
Oh, morning life! cried Yoomy, with a Persian air;
would that all time were a sunrise, and all life a youth.
Ah! but these striplings whimper of youth, said Mohi,
caressing his braids, as if they wore this beard.
But natural, old man, said Babbalanja. We
Mardians
never seem young to ourselves; childhood is to youth
what manhood is to age:something to be looked back
upon, with sorrow that it is past. But childhood recks of
no future, and knows no past; hence, its present passes in a
vapor.
Mohi, how's your appetite this morning? said Media.
Thus, thus, ye gods, sighed Yoomy, is feeling ever
scouted. Yet, what might seem feeling in me, I can not
express.
A good commentary on old Bardianna, Yoomy, said
Babbalanja, who somewhere says, that no Mardian can
out with his heart, for his unyielding ribs are in the way.
And indeed, pride, or something akin thereto, often holds
check on sentiment. My lord, there are those who like not
to be detected in the possession of a heart.
Very true, Babbalanja; and I suppose that pride was
at the bottom of your old Ponderer's heartless, unsentimental,
bald-pated style.
Craving pardon, my lord is deceived. Bardianna was
not at all proud; though he had a queer way of showing
the absence of pride. In his essay, entitled,On the
Tendency to curl in Upper Lips, he thus discourses.
We hear much of pride and its sinfulness in this Mardi
wherein we dwell: whereas, I glory in being brimmed with
it;my sort of pride. In the presence of kings, lords,
palm-trees, and all those who deem themselves taller than
myself, I stand stiff as a pike, and will abate not one vertebra
of my stature. But accounting no Mardian my superior, I
account none my inferior; hence, with the social, I am ever
ready to be sociable.
An agrarian! said Media; no doubt he would have
made the headsman the minister of equality.
At bottom we are already equal, my honored lord, said
Babbalanja, profoundly bowingOne way we all come
into Mardi, and one way we withdraw. Wanting his yams
a king will starve, quick as a clown; and smote on the hip,
saith old Bardianna, he will roar as loud as the next one.
Roughly worded, that, Babbalanja.Vee-Vee! my
crown!So; now, Babbalanja, try if you can not polish
Bardianna's style in that last saying you father upon him.
I will, my ever honorable lord, said Babbalanja,
salaming. Thus we'll word it, then: In their merely
Mardian nature, the sublimest demi-gods are subject to
infirmities
;
for struck by some keen shaft, even a king ofttimes
dons his crown, fearful of future darts.
Ha, ha!well done, Babbalanja; but I bade you
polish, not sharpen the arrow.
All one, my thrice honored lord;to polish is not to
blunt.
CHAPTER XLVII.
BABBALANJA PHILOSOPHIZES, AND MY LORD MEDIA PASSES
ROUND THE CALABASHES.
An
interval of silence passed; when Media cried, Out
upon thee, Yoomy! curtail that long face of thine.
How can he, my lord, said Mohi, when he is
thinking
of furlongs?
Fathoms you mean, Mohi; see you not he is musing
over the gunwale? And now, minstrel, a banana for thy
thoughts. Come, tell me how you poets spend so many
hours in meditation.
My lord, it is because, that when we think, we think
so little of ourselves.
I thought as much, said Mohi, for no sooner do I
undertake to be sociable with myself, than I am
straightway
forced to beat a retreat.
Ay, old man, said Babbalanja, many of us
Mardians
are but sorry hosts to ourselves. Some hearts are
hermits.
If not of yourself, then, Yoomy, of whom else do you
think? asked Media.
My lord, I seldom think, said Yoomy, I but give ear
to the voices in my calm.
Did Babbalanja speak? said Media. But no more
of your reveries; and so saying Media gradually sunk into
a reverie himself.
The rest did likewise; and soon, with eyes enchanted, all
reclined: gazing at each other, witless of what we did.
It was Media who broke the spell; calling for Vee-Vee
our page, his calabashes and cups, and nectarines for all.
Eyeing his goblet, Media at length threw himself back,
and said: Babbalanja, not ten minutes since, we were all
absent-minded; now, how would you like to step out of
your body, in reality; and, as a spirit, haunt some shadowy
grove?
But our lungs are not wholly superfluous, my lord,
said Babbalanja, speaking loud.
No, nor our lips, said Mohi, smacking his over his
wine.
But could you really be disembodied here in Mardi,
Babbalanja, how would you fancy it? said Media.
My lord, said Babbalanja, speaking through half of a
nectarine, defer putting that question, I beseech, till after
my appetite is satisfied; for, trust me, no hungry mortal
would forfeit his palate, to be resolved into the impalpable.
Yet pure spirits we must all become at last, Babbalanja,
said Yoomy, even the most ignoble.
Yes, so they say, Yoomy; but if all boors be the
immortal
sires of endless dynasties of immortals, how little do
our pious patricians bear in mind their magnificent destiny,
when hourly they scorn their companionship. And if here in
Mardi they can not abide an equality with plebeians, even
at the altar; how shall they endure them, side by side,
throughout eternity? But since the prophet Alma asserts,
that Paradise is almost entirely made up of the poor and
despised, no wonder that many aristocrats of our isles
pursue a career, which, according to some theologies, must
forever preserve the social distinctions so sedulously
maintained
in Mardi. And though some say, that at death
every thing earthy is removed from the spirit, so that clowns
and lords both stand on a footing; yet, according to the
popular legends, it has ever been observed of the ghosts of
boors when revisiting Mardi, that invariably they rise in
their smocks. And regarding our intellectual equality
hereafter
,
how unjust, my lord, that after whole years of days
and nights consecrated to the hard gaining of wisdom, the
wisest Mardian of us all should in the end find the whole
sum of his attainments, at one leap outstripped by the
veriest dunce, suddenly inspired by light divine. And
though some hold, that all Mardian lore is vain, and that
at death all mysteries will be revealed; yet, none the less,
do they toil and ponder now. Thus, their tongues have
one mind, and their understanding another.
My lord, said Mohi, we have come to the lees; your
pardon, Babbalanja.
Then, Vee-Vee, another calabash! Fill up, Mohi;
wash down wine with wine. Your cup, Babbalanja; any
lees?
Plenty, my lord; we philosophers come to the lees very
soon.
Flood them over, then; but cease not discoursing;
thanks be to the gods, your mortal palates and tongues can
both wag together; fill up, I say, Babbalanja; you are no
philosopher, if you stop at the tenth cup; endurance is the
test of philosophy all Mardi over; drink, I say, and make us
wise by precept and example.Proceed, Yoomy, you look
as if you had something to say.
Thanks, my lord. Just now, Babbalanja, you flew
from the subject;you spoke of boors; but has not the
lowliest
peasant an eye that can take in the vast horizon at a
sweep: mountains, vales, plains, and oceans? Is such a
being nothing?
But can that eye see itself, Yoomy? said Babbalanja,
winking. Taken out of its socket, will it see at all? Its
connection with the body imparts to it its virtue.
He questions every thing, cried Mohi. Philosopher,
have you a head?
I have, said Babbalanja, feeling for it; I am finished
off at the helm very much as other Mardians, Mohi.
My lord, the first yea that ever came from him.
Ah, Mohi, said Media, the discourse waxes heavy.
I fear me we have again come to the lees. Ho, Vee-Vee, a
vol. ii.I
fresh calabash; and with it we will change the subject.
Now, Babbalanja, I have this cup to drink, and then a
question to propound. Ah, Mohi, rare old wine this; it
smacks of the cork. But attention, Philosopher.
Supposing
you had a wifewhich, by the way, you have not
would you deem it sensible in her to imagine you no more,
because you happened to stroll out of her sight?
However that might be, murmured Yoomy, young
Nina bewailed herself a widow, whenever Arhinoo, her lord,
was absent from her side.
My lord Media, said Babbalanja, During my
absence
,
my wife would have more reason to conclude that I
was not living, than that I was. To the former supposition,
every thing tangible around her would tend; to the latter,
nothing but her own fond fancies. It is this imagination of
ours, my lord, that is at the bottom of these things. When
I am in one place, there exists no other. Yet am I but too
apt to fancy the reverse. Nevertheless, when I am in Odo,
talk not to me of Ohonoo. To me it is not, except when I
am there. If it be, prove it. To prove it, you carry me
thither; but you only prove, that to its substantive existence,
as cognizant to me, my presence is indispensable. I say
that, to me, all Mardi exists by virtue of my sovereign
pleasure; and when I die, the universe will perish with
me.
Come you of a long-lived race, said Mohi, one free
from apoplexies? I have many little things to accomplish yet,
and would not be left in the lurch.
Heed him not, Babbalanja, said Media. Dip your
beak again, my eagle, and soar.
Let us be eagles, then, indeed, my lord: eagle-like, let
us look at this red wine without blinking; let us grow
solemn
,
not boisterous, with good cheer.
Then, lifting his cup, My lord, serenely do I pity all
such who are stirred one jot from their centers by ever so
much drinking of this fluid. Ply him hard as you will,
through the live-long polar night, a wise man can not be
made drunk. Though, toward sunrise, his body may reel,
it will reel round its center; and though he make many
tacks in going home, he reaches it at last; while scores of
over-plied fools are foundering by the way. My lord, when
wild with much thought, 'tis to wine I fly, to sober me; its
magic fumes breathe over me like the Indian summer, which
steeps all nature in repose. To me, wine is no vulgar fire,
no fosterer of base passions; my heart, ever open, is opened
still wider; and glorious visions are born in my brain; it is
then that I have all Mardi under my feet, and the
constellations
of the firmament in my soul.
Superb! cried Yoomy.
Pooh, pooh! said Mohi, who does not see stars at
such times? I see the Great Bear now, and the little one,
its cub; and Andromeda, and Perseus' chain-armor, and
Cassiopea in her golden chair, and the bright, scaly Dragon,
and the glittering Lyre, and all the jewels in Orion's
sword-hilt
.
Ay, cried Media, the study of astronomy is
wonderfully
facilitated by wine. Fill up, old Ptolemy, and tell us
should you discover a new planet. Methinks this fluid
needs stirring. Ho, Vee-Vee, my scepter! be we sociable.
But come, Babbalanja, my gold-headed aquila, return to
your theme;the imagination, if you please.
Well, then, my lord, I was about to say, that the
imagination
is the Voli-Donzini; or, to speak plainer, the unical,
rudimental, and all-comprehending abstracted essence of the
infinite remoteness of things. Without it, we were
grass-hoppers
.
And with it, you mortals are little else; do you not
chirp all over, Mohi? By my demi-god soul, were I
not what I am, this wine would almost get the better of
me.
Without it continued Babbalanja.
Without what? demanded Media, starting to his feet.
This wine? Traitor, I'll stand by this to the last gasp;
you are inebriated, Babbalanja.
Perhaps so, my lord; but I was treating of the
imagination
,
may it please you.
My lord, added Mohi, of the unical, and rudimental
fundament of things, you remember.
Ah! there's none of them sober; proceed, proceed,
Azzageddi!
My lord waves his hand like a banner, murmured
Yoomy.
Without imagination, I say, an armless man, born,
blind, could not be made to believe, that he had a head of
hair, since he could neither see it, nor feel it, nor has hair
any feeling of itself.
Methinks though, said Mohi, if the cripple had a
Tartar for a wife, he would not remain skeptical long.
You all fly off at tangents, cried Media, but no
wonder: your mortal brains can not endure much quaffing.
Return to your subject, Babbalanja. Assume now,
Babbalanja
,assume,
my dear princeassume it, assume it, I
say!Why don't you?
I am willing to assume any thing you please, my lord:
what is it?
Ah! yes!Assume thatthat upon returning home,
you should find your wife had newly wedded, under the
thethe metaphysical presumption, that being no longer
visible, you
you
Azzageddi, had departed this life; in other
words, out of sight, out of mind; what then, my dear
prince?
Why then, my lord, I would demolish my rival in a
trice.
Would you?thenthen so much for your
metaphysics
,
BabBabbalanja.
Babbalanja rose to his feet, muttering to himselfIs
this assumed, or real?Can a demi-god be mastered by
wine? Yet, the old mythologies make bacchanals of the
gods. But he was wondrous keen! He felled me, ere he
fell himself.
Yoomy, my lord Media is in a very merry mood to-day,
whispered Mohi, but his counterfeit was not well done.
No, no, a bacchanal is not used to be so logical in his
cups.
CHAPTER XLVIII.
THEY SAIL ROUND AN ISLAND WITHOUT LANDING; AND TALK
ROUND A SUBJECT WITHOUT GETTING AT IT.
Purposing
a visit to Kaleedoni, a country integrally
united to Dominora, our course now lay northward along
the western white cliffs of the isle. But finding the wind
ahead, and the current too strong for our paddlers, we were
fain to forego our destination; Babbalanja observing, that
since in Dominora we had not found Yillah, then in
Kaleedoni
the maiden could not be lurking.
And now, some conversation ensued concerning the country
we were prevented from visiting. Our chronicler narrated
many fine things of its people; extolling their bravery in
war, their amiability in peace, their devotion in religion,
their penetration in philosophy, their simplicity and
sweetness
in song, their loving-kindness and frugality in all things
domestic:running over a long catalogue of heroes,
metaphysicians
,
bards, and good men.
But as all virtues are convertible into vices, so in some
cases did the best traits of these people degenerate. Their
frugality too often became parsimony; their devotion grim
bigotry; and all this in a greater degree perhaps than could
be predicated of the more immediate subjects of King Bello.
In Kaleedoni was much to awaken the fervor of its bards.
Upland and lowland were full of the picturesque; and many
unsung lyrics yet lurked in her glens. Among her blue,
heathy hills, lingered many tribes, who in their wild and
tattooed attire, still preserved the garb of the mightiest
nation of old times. They bared the knee, in token that it
was honorable as the face, since it had never been bent.
While Braid-Beard was recounting these things, the
currents
were sweeping us over a strait, toward a deep green
island, bewitching to behold.
Not greener that midmost terrace of the Andes, which
under a torrid meridian steeps fair Quito in the dews of a
perpetual spring;not greener the nine thousand feet of
Pirohitee's tall peak, which, rising from out the warm bosom
of Tahiti, carries all summer with it into the clouds;nay,
not greener the famed gardens of Cyrus,than the vernal
lawn, the knoll, the dale of beautiful Verdanna.
Alas, sweet isle! Thy desolation is overrun with
vines, sighed Yoomy, gazing.
Land of caitiff curs! cried Media.
Isle, whose future is in its past. Hearth-stone, from
which its children run, said Babbalanja.
I can not read thy chronicles for blood, Verdanna,
murmured Mohi.
Gliding near, we would have landed, but the rolling surf
forbade. Then thrice we circumnavigated the isle for a
smooth, clear beach; but it was not found.
Meanwhile all still conversed.
My lord, said Yoomy, while we tarried with King
Bello, I heard much of the feud between Dominora and this
unhappy shore. Yet is not Verdanna as a child of King
Bello's?
Yes, minstrel, a step-child, said Mohi.
By way of enlarging his family circle, said Babbalanja,
an old lion once introduced a deserted young stag to his
den; but the stag never became domesticated, and would
still charge upon his foster-brothers.Verdanna is not of
the flesh and blood of Dominora, whence, in good part, these
dissensions.
But Babbalanja, is there no way of reconciling these
foes?
But one way, Yoomy:By filling up this strait with
dry land; for, divided by water, we Mardians must ever
remain more or less divided at heart. Though Kaleedoni
was united to Dominora long previous to the union of
Verdanna, yet Kaleedoni occasions Bello no disquiet; for,
geographically one, the two populations insensibly blend at
the point of junction. No hostile strait flows between the
arms, that to embrace must touch.
But, Babbalanja, said Yoomy, what asks Verdanna
of Dominora, that Verdanna so clamors at the denial?
They are arrant cannibals, Yoomy, said Media, and
desire the privilege of eating each other up.
King Bello's idea, said Babbalanja; but, in these
things, my lord, you demi-gods are ever unanimous. But,
whatever be Verdanna's demands, Bello persists in rejecting
them.
Why not grant every thing she asks, even to renouncing
all claim upon the isle, said Mohi; for thus, Bello would
rid himself of many perplexities.
And think you, old man, said Media, that, bane or
blessing, Bello will yield his birthright? Will a tri-crowned
king resign his triple diadem? And even did Bello what
you propose, he would only breed still greater perplexities.
For if granted, full soon would Verdanna be glad to
surrender
many things she demands. And all she now asks,
she has had in times past; but without turning it to
advantage
:and
is she wiser now?
Does she not demand her harvests, my lord? said
Yoomy, and has not the reaper a right to his sheaf?
Cant! cant! Yoomy. If you reap for me, the sheaf
is mine.
But if the reaper reaps on his own harvest-field, whose
then the sheaf, my lord? said Babbalanja.
His for whom he reapshis lord's!
Then let the reaper go with sickle and with sword,
said Yoomy, with one hand, cut down the bearded grain;
and with the other, smite his bearded lords.
Thou growest fierce, in thy lyric moods, my warlike
dove, said Media, blandly. But for thee, philosopher,
know thou, that Verdanna's men are of blood and brain
inferior to Bello's native race; and the better Mardian
must ever rule.
Verdanna inferior to Dominora, my lord!Has she
produced no bards, no orators, no wits, no patriots? Mohi,
unroll thy chronicles! Tell me, if Verdanna may not claim
full many a star along King Bello's tattooed arm of Fame?
Even so, said Mohi. Many chapters bear you
out.
But my lord, said Babbalanja, as truth, omnipresent,
lurks in all things, even in lies: so, does some germ of it
lurk in the calumnies heaped on the people of this land.
For though they justly boast of many lustrous names, these
jewels gem no splendid robe. And though like a bower of
grapes, Verdanna is full of gushing juices, spouting out in
bright sallies of wit, yet not all her grapes make wine; and
here and there, hang goodly clusters mildewed; or half
devoured
by worms, bred in their own tendrils.
Drop, drop your grapes and metaphors! cried Media.
Bring forth your thoughts like men; let them come
naked into Mardi.What do you mean, Babbalanja?
This, my lord, Verdanna's worst evils are her own, not
of another's giving. Her own hand is her own undoer.
She stabs herself with bigotry, superstition, divided councils,
domestic feuds, ignorance, temerity; she wills, but does not;
her East is one black storm-cloud, that never bursts; her
utmost fight is a defiance; she showers reproaches, where
she should rain down blows. She stands a mastiff baying
at the moon.
Tropes on tropes! said Media. Let me tell the
tale,straight-forward like a line. Verdanna is a
lunatic
A trope! my lord, cried Babbalanja.
My tropes are not tropes, said Media, but yours are.
Verdanna is a lunatic, that after vainly striving to cut
I*
another's throat, grimaces before a standing pool and
threatens
to cut his own. And is such a madman to be intrusted
with himself? No; let another govern him, who is
ungovernable
to himself. Ay, and tight hold the rein; and
curb, and rasp the bit. Do I exaggerate?Mohi, tell me,
if, save one lucid interval, Verdanna, while independent of
Dominora, ever discreetly conducted her affairs? Was she
not always full of fights and factions? And what first
brought her under the sway of Bello's scepter? Did not
her own Chief Dermoddi fly to Bello's ancestor for protection
against his own seditious subjects? And thereby did not
her own king unking himself? What wonder, then, and
where the wrong, if Henro, Bello's conquering sire, seized
the diadem?
What my lord cites is true, said Mohi, but cite no
more, I pray; lest, you harm your cause.
Yet for all this, Babbalanja, said Media, Bello but
holds lunatic Verdanna's lands in trust.
And may the guardian of an estate also hold custody
of the ward, my lord?
Ay, if he can. What
can
be done, may be: that's the
creed of demi-gods.
Alas, alas! cried Yoomy, why war with words over
this poor, suffering land. See! for all her bloom, her people
starve; perish her yams, ere taken from the soil; the
blight of heaven seems upon them.
Not so, said Media. Heaven sends no blights.
Verdanna will not learn. And if from one season's
rottenness
,
rottenness they sow again, rottenness must they reap.
But Yoomy, you seem earnest in this matter;come: on all
hands it is granted that evils exist in Verdanna; now sweet
sympathizer, what must the royal Bello do to mend them?
I am no sage, said Yoomy, what would my lord
Media do?
What would
you
do, Babbalanja, said Media.
Mohi, what you? asked the philosopher.
And what would the company do? added Mohi.
Now, though these evils pose us all, said Babbalanja,
there lately died in Verdanna, one, who set about curing
them in a humane and peaceable way, waving war and
bloodshed. That man was Konno. Under a huge
caldron
,
he kept a roaring fire.
Well, Azzageddi, how could that answer his purpose?
asked Media.
Nothing better, my lord. His fire boiled his bread-fruit;
and so convinced were his countrymen, that he was well
employed, that they almost stripped their scanty orchards to
fill his caldron.
Konno was a knave, said Mohi.
Your pardon, old man, but that is only known to his
ghost, not to us. At any rate he was a great man; for
even assuming he cajoled his country, no common man could
have done it.
Babbalanja, said Mohi, my lord has been pleased to
pronounce Verdanna crazy; now, may not her craziness
arise from the irritating, tantalizing practices of Dominora?
Doubtless, Braid-Beard, many of the extravagances of
Verdanna, are in good part to be ascribed to the cause you
mention; but, to be impartial, none the less does Verdanna
essay to taunt and provoke Dominora; yet not with the like
result. Perceive you, Braid-Beard, that the trade-wind
blows dead across this strait from Dominora, and not from
Verdanna? Hence, when King Bello's men fling gibes
and insults, every missile hits; but those of Verdanna are
blown back in its teeth: her enemies jeering her again and
again.
King Bello's men are dastards for that, cried Yoomy.
It shows neither sense, nor spirit, nor humanity, said
Babbalanja.
All wide of the mark, cried Media. What is to be
done for Verdanna?
What will she do for herself? said Babbalanja.
Philosopher, you are an extraordinary sage; and since
sages should be seers, reveal Verdanna's future.
My lord, you will ever find true prophets, prudent;
nor will any prophet risk his reputation upon predicting
aught concerning this land. The isles are Oro's.
Nevertheless
,
he who doctors Verdanna aright, will first medicine
King Bello; who in some things is, himself a patient, though
he would fain be a physician. However, my lord, there is
a demon of a doctor in Mardi, who at last deals with these
desperate cases. He employs only pills, picked off the
Conroupta
Quiancensis tree.
And what sort of a vegetable is that? asked Mohi.
Consult the botanists, said Babbalanja.
CHAPTER XLIX.
THEY DRAW NIGH TO PORPHEERO; WHERE THEY BEHOLD
A TERRIFIC ERUPTION.
Gliding
away from Verdanna at the turn of the tide, we
cleared the strait, and gaining the more open lagoon,
pointed our prows for Porpheero, from whose magnificent
monarchs my lord Media promised himself a glorious
reception
.
They are one and all demi-gods, he cried, and have
the old demi-god feeling. We have seen no great valleys
like theirs:their scepters are long as our spears; to their
sumptuous palaces, Donjalolo's are but inns:their
banquetting
halls are as vistas; no generations run parallel to
theirs:their pedigrees reach back into chaos.
Babbalanja! here you will find food for philosophy:
the whole land checkered with nations, side by side
contrasting
in costume, manners, and mind. Here you will find
science and sages; manuscripts in miles; bards singing in
choirs.
Mohi! here you will flag over your page; in Porpheero
the ages have hived all their treasures: like a pyramid, the
past shadows over the land.
Yoomy! here you will find stuff for your songs:blue
rivers flowing through forest arches, and vineyards; velvet
meads, soft as ottomans: bright maidens braiding the
golden locks of the harvest; and a background of
mountains
,
that seem the end of the world. Or if nature will not
content you, then turn to the landscapes of art. See!
mosaic walls, tattooed like our faces; paintings, vast as
horizons; and into which, you feel you could rush: See!
statues to which you could off turban; cities of columns
standing thick as mankind; and firmanent domes forever
shedding their sunsets of gilding: See! spire behind spire,
as if the land were the ocean, and all Bello's great navy
were riding at anchor.
Noble Taji! you seek for your Yillah;give over
despair! Porpheero's such a scene of enchantment, that
there, the lost maiden must lurk.
A glorious picture! cried Babbalanja, but turn the
medal, my lord;what says the reverse?
Cynic! have done.But bravo! we'll ere long be in
Franko, the goodliest vale of them all; how I long to take
her old king by the hand!
The sun was now setting behind us, lighting up the white
cliffs of Dominora, and the green capes of Verdanna; while
in deep shade lay before us the long winding shores of
Porpheero.
It was a sunset serene.
How the winds lowly warble in the dying day's ear,
murmured Yoomy.
A mild, bright night, we'll have, said Media.
See you not those clouds over Franko, my lord, said
Mohi, shaking his head.
Ah, aged and weather-wise as ever, sir chronicler;I
predict a fair night, and many to follow.
Patience needs no prophet, said Babbalanja. The
night is at hand.
Hitherto the lagoon had been smooth: but anon, it grew
black, and stirred; and out of the thick darkness came
clamorous sounds. Soon, there shot into the air a vivid
meteor, which bursting at the zenith, radiated down the
firmament in fiery showers, leaving treble darkness behind.
Then, as all held their breath, from Franko there spouted
an eruption, which seemed to plant all Mardi in the
foreground
.
As when Vesuvius lights her torch, and in the blaze, the
storm-swept surges in Naples' bay rear and plunge toward
it; so now, showed Franko's multitudes, as they stormed
the summit where their monarch's palace blazed, fast by the
burning mountain.
By my eternal throne! cried Media, starting, the
old volcano has burst forth again!
But a new vent, my lord, said Babbalanja.
More fierce this, than the eruption which happened in my
youth, said Mohimethinks that Franko's end has come.
You look pale, my lord, said Babbalanja, while all
other faces glow;Yoomy, doff that halo in the presence
of a king.
Over the waters came a rumbling sound, mixed with the
din of warfare, and thwarted by showers of embers that fell
not, for the whirling blasts.
Off shore! off shore! cried Media; and with all haste
we gained a place of safety.
Down the valley now poured Rhines and Rhones of lava,
a fire-freshet, flooding the forests from their fastnesses, and
leaping with them into the seething sea.
The shore was lined with multitudes pushing off wildly
in canoes.
Meantime, the fiery storm from Franko, kindled new
flames in the distant valleys of Porpheero; while driven
over from Verdanna came frantic shouts, and direful
jubilees
.
Upon Dominora a baleful glare was resting.
Thrice cursed flames! cried Media. Is Mardi to
be one conflagration? How it crackles, forks, and roars!
Is this our funeral pyre?
Recline, recline, my lord, said Babbalanja. Fierce
flames are ever briefa song, sweet Yoomy! Your pipe,
old Mohi! Greater fires than this have ere now blazed in
Mardi. Let us be calm;the isles were made to burn;
Braid-Beard! hereafter, in some quiet cell, of this whole
scene you will but make one chapter;come, digest it now.
My face is scorched, cried Media.
The last, last day! cried Mohi.
Not so, old man, said Babbalanja, when that day
dawns, 'twill dawn serene. Be calm, be calm, my potent
lord.
Talk not of calm brows in storm-time! cried Media
fiercely. See! how the flames blow over upon Dominora!
Yet the fires they kindle there are soon extinguished,
said Babbalanja. No, no; Dominora ne'er can burn
with Franko's fires; only those of her own kindling may
consume her.
Away! Away! cried Media. We may not touch
Porpheero now.Up sails! and westward be our course.
So dead before the blast, we scudded.
Morning broke, showing no sign of land.
Hard must it go with Franko's king, said Media,
when his people rise against him with the red volcanoes.
Oh, for a foot to crush them! Hard, too, with all who rule
in broad Porpheero. And may she we seek, survive this
conflagration!
My lord, said Babbalanja, where'ere she hide, ne'er
yet did Yillah lurk in this Porpheero; nor have we missed
the maiden, noble Taji! in not touching at its shores.
This fire must make a desert of the land, said Mohi;
burn up and bury all her tilth.
Yet, Mohi, vineyards flourish over buried villages,
murmured Yoomy.
True, minstrel, said Babbalanja, and prairies are
purified by fire. Ashes breed loam. Nor can any skill
make the same surface forever fruitful. In all times past,
things have been overlaid; and though the first fruits of the
marl are wild and poisonous, the palms at last spring forth;
and once again the tribes repose in shade. My lord, if
calms breed storms, so storms calms; and all this dire
commotion must eventuate in peace. It may be, that
Porpheero's
future has been cheaply won.
CHAPTER L.
WHEREIN KING MEDIA CELEBRATES THE GLORIES OF AUTUMN;
THE MINSTREL, THE PROMISE OF SPRING.
Ho, now! cried Media, across the wide waters, for
that New Mardi, Vivenza! Let us indeed see, whether she
who eludes us elsewhere, be at last found in Vivenza's vales.
There or nowhere, noble Taji, said Yoomy.
Be not too sanguine, gentle Yoomy, said Babbalanja.
Does Yillah choose rather to bower in the wild
wilderness
of Vivenza, than in the old vineyards of Porpheero?
said Braid-Beard.
Sang Yoomy:
Her bower is not of the vine,
But the wild, wild eglantine!
Not climbing a moldering arch,
But upheld by the fir-green larch.
Old ruins she flies:
To new valleys she hies;
Not the hoar, moss-wood,
Ivied trees each a rood
Not in Maramma she dwells,
Hollow with hermit cells.
'Tis a new, new isle!
An infant's its smile,
Soft-rocked by the sea.
Its bloom all in bud;
No tide at its flood,
In that fresh-born sea!
Spring! Spring! where she dwells,
In her sycamore dells,
Where Mardi is young and new:
Its verdure all eyes with dew.
There, there! in the bright, balmy morns,
The young deer sprout their horns,
Deep-tangled in new-branching groves,
Where the Red-Rover Robin roves,
Stooping his crest,
To his molting breast
Rekindling the flambeau there!
Spring! Spring! where she dwells,
In her sycamore dells:
Where, fulfilling their fates,
All creatures seek mates
The thrush, the doe, and the hare!
Thou art most musical, sweet Yoomy, said Media.
concerning this spring-land Vivenza. But are not the old
autumnal valleys of Porpheero more glorious than those of
vernal Vivenza? Vivenza shows no trophies of the summer
time, but Dominora's full-blown rose hangs blushing on her
garden walls; her autumn groves are glory-dyed.
My lord, autumn soon merges in winter, but the spring
has all the seasons before. The full-blown rose is nearer
withering than the bud. The faint morn is a blossom: the
crimson sunset the flower.
CHAPTER LI.
IN WHICH AZZAGEDDI SEEMS TO USE BABBALANJA FOR A
MOUTH-PIECE.
Porpheero
far astern, the spirits of the company rose.
Once again, old Mohi serenely unbraided, and rebraided his
beard; and sitting Turk-wise on his mat, my lord Media
smoking his gonfalon, diverted himself with the wild songs
of Yoomy, the wild chronicles of Mohi, or the still wilder
speculations of Babbalanja; now and then, as from pitcher
to pitcher, pouring royal old wine down his soul.
Among other things, Media, who at times turned over
Babbalanja for an encyclopdia, however unreliable,
demanded
information upon the subject of neap tides and their
alleged slavish vassalage to the moon.
When true to his cyclopdiatic nature, Babbalanja quoted
from a still older and better authority than himself; in
brief, from no other than eternal Bardianna. It seems that
that worthy essayist had discussed the whole matter in a
chapter thus headed: On Seeing into Mysteries through
Mill-Stones; and throughout his disquisitions he evinced
such a profundity of research, though delivered in a style
somewhat equivocal, that the company were much struck
by the erudition displayed.
Babbalanja, that Bardianna of yours must have been a
wonderful student, said Media after a pause, no doubt he
consumed whole thickets of rush-lights.
Not so, my lord.`Patience, patience, philosophers,' said
Bardianna; `blow out your tapers, bolt not your dinners,
take time, wisdom will be plenty soon.'
A notable hint! Why not follow it, Babbalanja?
Because, my lord, I have overtaken it, and passed on.
True to your nature, Babbalanja; you stay nowhere.
Ay, keep moving is my motto; but speaking of hard
students, did my lord ever hear of Midni the ontologist and
entomologist?
No.
Then, my lord, you shall hear of him now. Midni
was of opinion that day-light was vulgar; good enough for
taro-planting and traveling; but wholly unadapted to the
sublime ends of study. He toiled by night; from sunset to
sunrise poring over the works of the old logicans. Like
most philosophers, Midni was an amiable man; but one
thing invariably put him out. He read in the woods by
glow-worm light; insect in hand, tracing over his pages,
line by line. But glow-worms burn not long: and in the
midst of some calm intricate thought, at some imminent
comma, the insect often expired, and Midni groped for a
meaning. Upon such an occasion, `Ho, Ho,' he cried; `but
for one instant of sun-light to see my way to a period!' But
sun-light there was none; so Midni sprang to his feet, and
parchment under arm, raced about among the sloughs and
bogs for another glow-worm. Often, making a rapid descent
with his turban, he thought he had caged a prize; but nay.
Again he tried; yet with no better success. Nevertheless,
at last he secured one; but hardly had he read three lines
by its light, when out it went. Again and again this
occurred. And thus he forever went halting and
stumbling
through his studies, and plunging through his
quagmires
after a glim.
At this ridiculous tale, one of our silliest paddlers burst
into uncontrollable mirth. Offended at which breach of
decorum, Media sharply rebuked him.
But he protested he could not help laughing.
Again Media was about to reprimand him, when
Babbalanja
begged leave to interfere.
My lord, he is not to blame. Mark how earnestly he
struggles to suppress his mirth; but he can not. It has
often been the same with myself. And many a time have
I not only vainly sought to check my laughter, but at some
recitals I have both laughed and cried. But can opposite
emotions be simultaneous in one being? No. I wanted to
weep; but my body wanted to smile; and between us we
almost choked. My lord Media, this man's body laughs; not
the man himself.
But his body is his own, Babbalanja; and he should
have it under better control.
The common error, my lord. Our souls belong to our
bodies, not our bodies to our souls. For which has the care
of the other? which keeps house? which looks after the
replenishing of the aorta and auricles, and stores away the
secretions? Which toils and ticks while the other sleeps?
Which is ever giving timely hints, and elderly warnings?
Which is the most authoritative?Our bodies, surely. At
a hint, you must move; at a notice to quit, you depart.
Simpletons show us, that a body can get along almost
without
a soul; but of a soul getting along without a body,
we have no tangible and indisputable proof. My lord, the
wisest of us breathe involuntarily. And how many millions
there are who live from day to day by the incessant
operation
of subtle processes in them, of which they know nothing,
and care less? Little ween they, of vessels lacteal and
lymphatic, of arteries femoral and temporal; of pericranium
or pericardium; lymph, chyle, fibrin, albumen, iron in the
blood, and pudding in the head; they live by the charity
of their bodies, to which they are but butlers. I say, my
lord, our bodies are our betters. A soul so simple, that it
prefers evil to good, is lodged in a frame, whose minutest
action is full of unsearchable wisdom. Knowing this
superiority
of theirs, our bodies are inclined to be willful: our
beards grow in spite of us; and as every one knows, they
sometimes grow on dead men.
You mortals are alive, then, when you are dead,
Babbalanja
.
No, my lord; but our beards survive us.
An ingenious distinction; go on, philosopher.
Without bodies, my lord, we Mardians would be minus
our strongest motive-passions, those which, in some way or
other, root under our every action. Hence, without bodies,
we must be something else than we essentially are.
Wherefore
,
that saying imputed to Alma, and which, by his very
followers, is deemed the most hard to believe of all his
instructions
,
and the most at variance with all preconceived
notions of immortality, I Babbalanja, account the most
reasonable
of his doctrinal teachings. It is this;that at the
last day, every man shall rise in the flesh.
Pray, Babbalanja, talk not of resurrections to a demi-god.
Then let me rehearse a story, my lord. You will find
it in the `Very Merry Marvelings' of the Improvisitor Quiddi;
and a quaint book it is. Fugle-fi is its finis:fugle-fi, fugle-fo,
fugle-fogle-orum!
That wild look in his eye again, murmured Yoomy.
Proceed, Azzageddi, said Media.
The philosopher Grando had a sovereign contempt for
his carcass. Often he picked a quarrel with it; and always
was flying out in its disparagement. `Out upon you, you
beggarly body! you clog, drug, drag! You keep me from
flying; I could get along better without you. Out upon
you, I say, you vile pantry, cellar, sink, sewer; abominable
body! what vile thing are you not? And think you, beggar!
to have the upper hand of me? Make a leg to that man
if you dare, without my permission. This smell is
intolerable
;
but turn from it, if you can, unless I give the word.
Bolt this yam!it is done. Carry me across yon field!
off we go. Stop!it's a dead halt. There, I've trained
you enough for to-day; now, sirrah, crouch down in the
shade, and be quiet.I'm rested. So, here's for a stroll,
and a reverie homeward:Up, carcass, and march.' So
the carcass demurely rose and paced, and the philosopher
meditated. He was intent upon squaring the circle; but
bump he came against a bough. `How now, clodhopping
bumpkin! you would take advantage of my reveries, would
you? But I'll be even with you;' and seizing a cudgel,
he laid across his shoulders with right good will. But one
of his backhanded thwacks injured his spinal cord; the
philosopher dropped; but presently came to. `Adzooks!
I'll bend or break you! Up, up, and I'll run you home for
this.' But wonderful to tell, his legs refused to budge; all
sensation had left them. But a huge wasp happening to
sting his foot, not him, for he felt it not, the leg incontinently
sprang into the air, and of itself, cut all manner of capers.
`Be still! Down with you!' But the leg refused. `My
arms are still loyal,' thought Grando; and with them he at
last managed to confine his refractory member. But all
commands, volitions, and persuasions, were as naught to
induce his limbs to carry him home. It was a solitary
place; and five days after, Grando the philosopher was found
dead under a tree.
Ha, ha! laughed Media, Azzageddi is full as merry
as ever.
But, my lord, continued Babbalanja, some creatures
have still more perverse bodies than Grando's. In the fables
of Ridendiabola, this is to be found. `A fresh-water Polyp,
despising its marine existence, longed to live upon air. But
all it could do, its tentacles or arms still continued to cram
its stomach. By a sudden preternatural impulse, however,
the Polyp at last turned itself inside out; supposing that
after such a proceeding it would have no gastronomic
interior
.
But its body proved ventricle outside as well as in.
Again its arms went to work; food was tossed in, and
digestion continued.'
Is the literal part of that a fact? asked Mohi.
True as truth, said Babbalanja; the Polyp will live
turned inside out.
Somewhat curious, certainly, said Media.But
methinks
,
Babbalanja, that somewhere I have heard something
about organic functions, so called; which may account for
the phenomena you mention; and I have heard too,
methinks
,
of what are called reflex actions of the nerves, which,
duly considered, might deprive of its strangeness that story
of yours concerning Grando and his body.
Mere substitutions of sounds for inexplicable meanings,
my lord. In some things science cajoles us. Now, what
is undeniable of the Polyp some physiologists analogically
maintain with regard to us Mardians; that forasmuch, as
the lining of our interiors is nothing more than a
continuation
of the epidermis, or scarf-skin, therefore, that in a
remote age, we too must have been turned wrong side out:
an hypothesis, which, indirectly might account for our moral
perversities: and also, for that otherwise nonsensical term
`the coat of the stomach;' for originally it must have
been a surtout, instead of an inner garment.
Pray, Azzageddi, said Media, are you not a fool?
One of a jolly company, my lord; but some creatures
besides wearing their surtouts within, sport their skeletons
without: witness the lobster and turtle, who alive, study
their own anatomies.
Azzageddi, you are a zany.
Pardon, my lord, said Mohi, I think him more of a
lobster; it's hard telling his jaws from his claws.
Yes, Braid-Beard, I am a lobster, a mackerel, any thing
you please; but my ancestors were kangaroos, not monkeys,
as old Boddo erroneously opined. My idea is more
susceptible
of demonstration than his. Among the deepest
discovered
land fossils, the relics of kangaroos are discernible, but
no relics of men. Hence, there were no giants in those days;
but on the contrary, kangaroos; and those kangaroos formed
the first edition of mankind, since revised and corrected.
What has become of our finises, or tails, then? asked
Mohi, wriggling in his seat.
The old question, Mohi. But where are the tails of
the tadpoles, after their gradual metamorphosis into frogs?
Have frogs any tails, old man? Our tails, Mohi, were
worn off by the process of civilization; especially at the
period when our fathers began to adopt the sitting posture:
the fundamental evidence of all civilization, for neither apes,
nor savages, can be said to sit; invariably, they squat on their
hams. Among barbarous tribes benches and settles are
unknown. But, my lord Media, as your liege and loving
subject I can not sufficiently deplore the deprivation of your
royal tail. That stiff and vertebrated member, as we find it
in those rustic kinsmen we have disowned, would have been
useful as a supplement to your royal legs; and whereas my
good lord is now fain to totter on two stanchions, were he
only a kangaroo, like the monarchs of old, the majesty of
Odo would be dignified, by standing firm on a tripod.
A very witty conceit! But have a care, Azzageddi;
your theory applies not to me.
Babbalanja, said Mohi, you must be the last of the
kangaroos.
I am, Mohi.
But the old fashioned pouch or purse of your grandams?
hinted Media.
My lord, I take it, that must have been transferred;
nowadays our sex carries the purse.
Ha, ha!
My lord, why this mirth? Let us be serious. Although
man is no longer a kangaroo, he may be said to be an
inferior species of plant. Plants proper are perhaps insensible
of the circulation of their sap: we mortals are physically
unconscious of the circulation of the blood; and for many
ages were not even aware of the fact. Plants know nothing
of their interiors:three score years and ten we trundle
about ours, and never get a peep at them; plants stand on
their stalks:we stalk on our legs; no plant flourishes over
its dead root:dead in the grave, man lives no longer above
vol. ii.K
ground; plants die without food:so we. And now for
the difference. Plants elegantly inhale nourishment,
without
looking it up: like lords, they stand still and are served;
and though green, never suffer from the colic:whereas,
we mortals must forage all round for our food: we cram our
insides; and are loaded down with odious sacks and
intestines
.
Plants make love and multiply; but excel us in all
amorous enticements, wooing and winning by soft pollens
and essences. Plants abide in one place, and live: we
must travel or die. Plants flourish without us: we must
perish without them.
Enough Azzageddi! cried Media. Open not thy
lips till to-morrow.
CHAPTER LII.
THE CHARMING YOOMY SINGS.
The
morrow came; and three abreast, with snorting
prows, we raced along; our mat-sails panting to the breeze.
All present partook of the life of the air; and unanimously
Yoomy was called upon for a song. The canoes were
passing
a long, white reef, sparkling with shells, like a jeweler's
case: and thus Yoomy sang in the same old strain as of
yore; beginning aloud, where he had left off in his soul:
Her sweet, sweet mouth!
The peach-pearl shell:
Red edged its lips,
That softly swell,
Just oped to speak,
With blushing cheek,
That fisherman
With lonely spear
On the reef ken,
And lift to ear
Its voice to hear,
Soft sighing South!
Like this, like this,
The rosy kiss!
That maiden's mouth.
A shell! a shell!
A vocal shell!
Song-dreaming,
In its inmost dell!
Her bosom! Two buds half blown, they tell;
A little valley between perfuming;
That roves away,
Deserting the day,
The day of her eyes illuming;
That roves away, o'er slope and fell,
Till a soft, soft meadow becomes the dell.
Thus far, old Mohi had been wriggling about in his seat,
twitching his beard, and at every couplet looking up
expectantly
,
as if he desired the company to think, that he
was counting upon that line as the last; But now, starting
to his feet, he exclaimed, Hold, minstrel! thy muse's
drapery
is becoming disordered: no more!
Then no more it shall be, said Yoomy, But you have
lost a glorious sequel.
CHAPTER LIII.
THEY DRAW NIGH UNTO LAND.
In
good time, after many days sailing, we snuffed the
land from afar, and came to a great country, full of inland
mountains, north and south stretching far out of sight.
All hail, Kolumbo! cried Yoomy.
Coasting by a portion of it, which Mohi called Kanneeda,
a province of King Bello's, we perceived the groves rocking
in the wind; their flexible boughs bending like bows; and
the leaves flying forth, and darkening the landscape, like
flocks of pigeons.
Those groves must soon fall, said Mohi.
Not so, said Babbalanja. My lord, as these violent
gusts are formed by the hostile meeting of two currents, one
from over the lagoon, the other from land; they may be
taken as significant of the occasional variances between
Kanneeda and Dominora.
Ay, said Media, and as Mohi hints, the breeze from
Dominora must soon overthrow the groves of Kanneeda.
Not if the land-breeze holds, my lord;one breeze oft
blows another home.Stand up, and gaze! From cape to
cape, this whole main we see, is young and froward. And
far southward, past this Kanneeda and Vivenza, are haughty,
overbearing streams, which at their mouths dam back the
ocean, and long refuse to mix their freshness with the foreign
brine:so bold, so strong, so bent on hurling off aggression
is this brave main, Kolumbo;last sought, last found,
Mardi's estate, so long kept back;pray Oro, it be not
squandered foolishly. Here lie plantations, held in fee by
stout hearts and arms; and boundless fields, that may be
had for seeing. Here, your foes are forests, struck down
with bloodless maces.Ho! Mardi's Poor, and Mardi's
Strong! ye, who starve or beg; seventh-sons who slave for
earth's first-bornhere is your home; predestinated yours;
Come over, Empire-founders! fathers of the wedded tribes
to come!abject now, illustrious evermore:Ho: Sinew,
Brawn, and Thigh!
A very fine invocation, said Media, now Babbalanja,
be seated; and tell us whether Dominora and the kings of
Porpheero do not own some small portion of this great
continent
,
which just now you poetically pronounced as the
spoil of any vagabonds who may choose to settle therein?
Is not Kanneeda, Dominora's?
And was not Vivenza once Dominora's also? And
what Vivenza now is, Kanneeda soon must be. I speak
not, my lord, as wishful of what I say, but simply as
fore-knowing
it. The thing must come. Vain for Dominora to
claim allegiance from all the progeny she spawns. As well
might the old patriarch of the flood reappear, and claim the
right of rule over all mankind, as descended from the loins
of his three roving sons.
'Tis the old law:the East peoples the West, the
West the East; flux and reflux. And time may come,
after the rise and fall of nations yet unborn, that, risen from
its future ashes, Porpheero shall be the promised land, and
from her surplus hordes Kolumbo people it.
Still coasting on, next day, we came to Vivenza; and as
Media desired to land first at a point midway between its
extremities, in order to behold the convocation of chiefs
supposed
to be assembled at this season, we held on our way,
till we gained a lofty ridge, jutting out into the lagoon, a
bastion to the neighboring land. It terminated in a lofty
natural arch of solid trap. Billows beat against its base.
But above, waved an inviting copse, wherein was revealed
an open temple of canes, containing one only image, that of
a helmeted female, the tutelar deity of Vivenza.
The canoes drew near.
Lo! what inscription is that? cried Media, there,
chiseled over the arch?
Studying those immense hieroglyphics awhile, antiquarian
Mohi still eyeing them, said slowly:
In-this-re-publi-can-land-all-men-are-born-free-and-equal.
False! said Media.
And how long stay they so? said Babbalanja.
But look lower, old man, cried Media, methinks
there's a small hieroglyphic or two hidden away in yonder
angle.Interpret them, old man.
After much screwing of his eyes, for those characters
were very minute, Champollion Mohi thus spoke
Exceptthe-tribe-of-Hamo
.
That nullifies the other, cried Media. Ah, ye
republicans
!
It seems to have been added for a postscript, rejoined
Braid-Beard, screwing his eyes again.
Perhaps so, said Babbalanja, but some wag must
have done it.
Shooting through the arch, we rapidly gained the beach.
CHAPTER LIV.
THEY VISIT THE GREAT CENTRAL TEMPLE OF VIVENZA.
The
throng that greeted us upon landing were
exceedingly
boisterous.
Whence came ye? they cried. Whither bound?
Saw ye ever such a land as this? Is it not a great and
extensive republic? Pray, observe how tall we are; just
feel of our thighs; Are we not a glorious people? Here,
feel of our beards. Look round; look round; be not afraid;
Behold those palms; swear now, that this land surpasses all
others. Old Bello's mountains are mole-hills to ours; his
rivers, rills; his empires, villages; his palm-trees, shrubs.
True, said Babbalanja. But great Oro must have
had some hand in making your mountains and streams.
Would ye have been as great in a desert?
Where is your king? asked Media, drawing himself
up in his robe, and cocking his crown.
Ha, ha, my fine fellow! We are all kings here;
royalty
breathes in the common air. But come on, come on.
Let us show you our great Temple of Freedom.
And so saying, irreverently grasping his sacred arm, they
conducted us toward a lofty structure, planted upon a bold
hill, and supported by thirty pillars of palm; four quite
green; as if recently added; and beyond these, an almost
interminable vacancy, as if all the palms in Mardi, were at
some future time, to aid in upholding that fabric.
Upon the summit of the temple was a staff; and as we
drew nigh, a man with a collar round his neck, and the red
marks of stripes upon his back, was just in the act of
hoisting
a tappa standardcorrespondingly striped. Other
collared
menials were going in and out of the temple.
Near the porch, stood an image like that on the top of
the arch we had seen. Upon its pedestal, were pasted
certain
hieroglyphical notices; according to Mohi, offering
rewards
for missing men, so many hands high.
Entering the temple, we beheld an amphitheatrical space,
in the middle of which, a great fire was burning. Around
it, were many chiefs, robed in long togas, and presenting
strange contrasts in their style of tattooing.
Some were sociably laughing, and chatting; others
diligently
making excavations between their teeth with slivers
of bamboo; or turning their heads into mills, were grinding
up leaves and ejecting their juices. Some were busily
inserting
the down of a thistle into their ears. Several stood
erect, intent upon maintaining striking attitudes; their
javelins
tragically crossed upon their chests. They would have
looked very imposing, were it not, that in rear their vesture
was sadly disordered. Others, with swelling fronts, seemed
chiefly indebted to their dinners for their dignity. Many
were nodding and napping. And, here and there, were
sundry indefatigable worthies, making a great show of
imperious
and indispensable business; sedulously folding
banana
leaves into scrolls, and recklessly placing them into the
hands of little boys, in gay turbans and trim little girdles,
who thereupon fled as if with salvation for the dying.
It was a crowded scene; the dusky chiefs, here and
there, grouped together, and their fantastic tattooings
showing
like the carved work on quaint old chimney-stacks, seen
from afar. But one of their number overtopped all the
rest. As when, drawing nigh unto old Rome, amid the
crowd of sculptured columns and gables, St. Peter's grand
dome soars far aloft, serene in the upper air; so, showed
one calm grand forehead among those of this mob of
chieftains
.
That head was Saturnina's. Gall and Spurzheim!
saw you ever such a brow?poised like an avalanche,
under
K*
the shadow of a forest! woe betide the devoted valleys
below! Lavatar! behold those lips,like mystic scrolls!
Those eyes,like panthers' caves at the base of
Popocatepetl
!
By my right hand, Saturnina, cried Babbalanja, but
thou wert made in the image of thy Maker! Yet, have I
beheld men, to the eye as commanding as thou; and
surmounted
by heads globe-like as thine, who never had thy
caliber. We must measure brains, not heads, my lord;
else, the sperm-whale, with his tun of an occiput, would
transcend us all.
Near by, were arched ways, leading to subterranean
places, whence issued a savory steam, and an extraordinary
clattering of calabashes, and smacking of lips, as if
something
were being eaten down there by the fattest of fat
fellows, with the heartiest of appetites, and the most
irresistible
of relishes. It was a quaffing, guzzling, gobbling
noise. Peeping down, we beheld a company, breasted up
against a board, groaning under numerous viands. In the
middle of all, was a mighty great gourd, yellow as gold,
and jolly round like a pumpkin in October, and so big it
must have grown in the sun. Thence flowed a tide of red
wine. And before it, stood plenty of paunches being filled
therewith like portly stone jars at a fountain. Melancholy
to tell, before that fine flood of old wine, and among those
portly old topers, was a lean man; who occasionally ducked
in his bill. He looked like an ibis standing in the Nile at
flood tide, among a tongue-lapping herd of hippopotami.
They were jolly as the jolliest; and laughed so
uproariously
,
that their hemispheres all quivered and shook, like
vast provinces in an earthquake. Ha! ha! ha! how they
laughed, and they roared. A deaf man might have heard
them; and no milk could have soured within a
forty-two-pounder
ball shot of that place.
Now, the smell of good things is no very bad thing in
itself. It is the savor of good things beyond; proof positive
of a glorious good meal. So snuffing up those zephyrs from
Araby the blest, those boisterous gales, blowing from out the
mouths of baked boars, stuffed with bread-fruit, bananas,
and sage, we would fain have gone down and partaken.
But this could not be; for we were told that those
worthies below, were a club in secret conclave; very busy
in settling certain weighty state affairs upon a solid basis,
They were all chiefs of immense capacity:how many
gallons, there was no finding out.
Be sure, now, a most riotous noise came up from those
catacombs, which seemed full of the ghosts of fat Lamberts;
and this uproar it was, that heightened the din
above-ground
.
But heedless of all, in the midst of the amphitheater,
stood a tall, gaunt warrior, ferociously tattooed, with a beak
like a buzzard; long dusty locks; and his hands full of
headless arrows. He was laboring under violent paroxysms;
three benevolent individuals essaying to hold him. But
repeatedly breaking loose, he burst anew into his delirium;
while with an absence of sympathy, distressing to behold,
the rest of the assembly seemed wholly engrossed with
themselves
;
nor did they appear to care how soon the unfortunate
lunatic might demolish himself by his frantic proceedings.
Toward one side of the amphitheatrical space, perched
high upon an elevated dais, sat a white-headed old man
with a tomahawk in his hand: earnestly engaged in
overseeing
the tumult; though not a word did he say.
Occasionally
,
however, he was regarded by those present with a
mysterious sort of deference; and when they chanced to
pass between him and the crazy man, they invariably did
so in a stooping position; probably to elude the
atmospheric
grape and cannister, continually flying from the mouth
of the lunatic.
What mob is this? cried Media.
'Tis the grand council of Vivenza, cried a bystander.
Hear ye not Alanno? and he pointed to the lunatic.
Now coming close to Alanno, we found, that with
incredible
volubility, he was addressing the assembly upon some
all-absorbing subject connected with King Bello, and his
presumed encroachments toward the northwest of Vivenza.
One hand smiting his hip, and the other his head, the
lunatic thus proceeded; roaring like a wild beast, and
beating
the air like a windmill:
I have said it! the thunder is flashing, the lightning is
crashing! already there's an earthquake in Dominora! Full
soon will old Bello discover that his diabolical machinations
against this ineffable land must soon come to naught. Who
dare not declare, that we are not invincible? I repeat it,
we are. Ha! ha! Audacious Bello must bite the dust!
Hair by hair, we will trail his gory gray beard at the end
of our spears! Ha, ha! I grow hoarse; but would mine
were a voice like the wild bulls of Bullorom, that I might
be heard from one end of this great and gorgeous land to its
farthest zenith; ay, to the uttermost diameter of its
circumference
.
Awake! oh Vivenza. The signs of the times are
portentous; nay, extraordinary; I hesitate not to add,
peculiar
!
Up! up! Let us not descend to the bathos, when
we should soar to the climax! Does not all Mardi wink
and look on? Is the great sun itself a frigid spectator?
Then let us double up our mandibles to the deadly encounter.
Methinks I see it now. Old Bello is crafty, and his oath is
recorded to obliterate us! Across this wide lagoon he casts
his serpent eyes; whets his insatiate bill; mumbles his
barbarous
tusks; licks his forked tongues; and who knows when
we shall have the shark in our midst? Yet be not deceived;
for though as yet, Bello has forborn molesting us openly, his
emissaries are at work; his infernal sappers, and miners,
and wet-nurses, and midwives, and grave-diggers are busy!
His canoe-yards are all in commotion! In navies his forests
are being launched upon the wave; and ere long typhoons,
zephyrs, white-squalls, balmy breezes, hurricanes, and besoms
will be raging round us!
His philippic concluded, Alanno was conducted from the
place; and being now quite exhausted, cold cobble-stones
were applied to his temples, and he was treated to a bath
in a stream.
This chieftain, it seems, was from a distant western
valley, called Hio-Hio, one of the largest and most fertile in
Vivenza, though but recently settled. Its inhabitants, and
those of the vales adjoining,a right sturdy set of fellows,
were accounted the most dogmatically democratic and ultra
of all the tribes in Vivenza; ever seeking to push on their
brethren to the uttermost; and especially were they bitter
against Bello. But they were a fine young tribe,
nevertheless
.
Like strong new wine they worked violently in
becoming clear. Time, perhaps, would make them all
right.
An interval of greater uproar than ever now ensued;
during which, with his tomahawk, the white-headed old
man repeatedly thumped and pounded the seat where he
sat, apparently to augment the din, though he looked anxious
to suppress it.
At last, tiring of his posture, he whispered in the ear
of a chief, his friend; who, approaching a portly warrior
present, prevailed upon him to rise and address the assembly.
And no sooner did this one do so, than the whole
convocation
dispersed, as if to their yams; and with a grin, the
little old man leaped from his seat, and stretched his legs on
a mat.
The fire was now extinguished, and the temple deserted.
CHAPTER LV.
WHEREIN BABBALANJA COMMENTS UPON THE SPEECH OF
ALANNO.
As
we lingered in the precincts of the temple after all
others had departed, sundry comments were made upon
what we had seen; and having remarked the hostility of
the lunatic orator toward Dominora, Babbalanja thus
addressed
Media:
My lord, I am constrained to believe, that all Vivenza
can not be of the same mind with the grandiloquent chief
from Hio-Hio. Nevertheless, I imagine, that between
Dominora
and this land, there exists at bottom a feeling akin to
animosity, which is not yet wholly extinguished; though but
the smoldering embers of a once raging fire. My lord, you
may call it poetry if you will, but there are nations in Mardi,
that to others stand in the relation of sons to sires. Thus
with Dominora and Vivenza. And though, its majority
attained, Vivenza is now its own master, yet should it not
fail in a reverential respect for its parent. In man or nation,
old age is honorable; and a boy, however tall, should never
take his sire by the beard. And though Dominora did
indeed ill merit Vivenza's esteem, yet by abstaining from
criminations, Vivenza should ever merit its own. And if in
time to come, which Oro forbid, Vivenza must needs go to
battle with King Bello, let Vivenza first cross the old veteran's
spear with all possible courtesy. On the other hand, my
lord, King Bello should never forget, that whatever be
glorious
in Vivenza, redounds to himself. And as some gallant
old lord proudly measures the brawn and stature of his son;
and joys to view in his noble young lineaments the likeness
of his own; bethinking him, that when at last laid in his
tomb, he will yet survive in the long, strong life of his child,
the worthy inheritor of his valor and renown; even so,
should King Bello regard the generous promise of this young
Vivenza of his own lusty begetting. My lord, behold these
two states! Of all nations in the Archipelago, they alone
are one in blood. Dominora is the last and greatest Anak
of Old Times; Vivenza, the foremost and goodliest stripling
of the Present. One is full of the past; the other brims
with the future. Ah! did this sire's old heart but beat to free
thoughts, and back his bold son, all Mardi would go down
before them. And high Oro may have ordained for them
a career, little divined by the mass. Methinks, that as
Vivenza will never cause old Bello to weep for his son; so,
Vivenza will not, this many a long year, be called to weep
over the grave of its sire. And though King Bello may yet
lay aside his old-fashioned cocked hat of a crown, and comply
with the plain costume of the times; yet will his frame
remain sturdy as of yore, and equally grace any habiliments
he may don. And those who say, Dominora is old and
worn out, may very possibly err. For if, as a nation,
Dominora
be oldher present generation is full as young as the
youths in any land under the sun. Then, Ho! worthy
twain! Each worthy the other, join hands on the instant,
and weld them together. Lo! the past is a prophet. Be
the future, its prophecy fulfilled.
CHAPTER LVI.
A SCENE IN THE LAND OF WARWICKS, OR KING-MAKERS.
Wending
our way from the temple, we were accompanied
by a fluent, obstreporous wight, one Znobbi, a runaway native
of Porpheero, but now an enthusiastic inhabitant of Vivenza.
Here comes our great chief! he cried. Behold him!
It was
I
that had a hand in making him what he is!
And so saying, he pointed out a personage, no way
distinguished
,
except by the tattooing on his foreheadstars,
thirty in number; and an uncommonly long spear in his
hand. Freely he mingled with the crowd.
Behold, how familiar I am with him! cried Znobbi,
approaching, and pitcher-wise taking him by the handle of
his face.
Friend, said the dignitary, thy salute is peculiar, but
welcome. I reverence the enlightened people of this land.
Mean-spirited hound! muttered Media, were I him,
I had impaled that audacious plebeian.
There's a Head-Chief for you, now, my fine fellow!
cried Znobbi. Hurrah! Three cheers! Ay, ay! All
kings hereall equal. Every thing's in common.
Here, a bystander, feeling something grazing his side,
looked down; and perceived Znobbi's hand in clandestine
vicinity to the pouch at his girdle-end.
Whereupon the crowd shouted, A thief! a thief! And
with a loud voice the starred chief criedSeize him,
people, and tie him to yonder tree.
And they seized, and tied him on the spot.
Ah, said Media, this chief has something to say, after
all; he pinions a king at a word, though a plebeian takes
him by the nose. Beshrew me, I doubt not, that spear of
his, though without a tassel, is longer and sharper than mine.
There's not so much freedom here as these freemen
think, said Babbalanja, turning; I laugh and admire.
CHAPTER LVII.
THEY HEARKEN UNTO A VOICE FROM THE GODS.
Next
day we retraced our voyage northward, to visit that
section of Vivenza.
In due time we landed.
To look round was refreshing. Of all the lands we had
seen, none looked more promising. The groves stood tall
and green; the fields spread flush and broad; the dew of
the first morning seemed hardly vanished from the grass.
On all sides was heard the fall of waters, the swarming of
bees, and the rejoicing hum of a thriving population.
Ha, ha! laughed Yoomy, Labor laughs in this land;
and claps his hands in the jubilee groves! methinks that
Yillah will yet be found.
Generously entertained, we tarried in this land; till at
length, from over the Lagoon, came full tidings of the
eruption
we had witnessed in Franko, with many details. The
conflagration had spread through Porpheero; and the kings
were to and fro hunted, like malefactors by blood-hounds;
all that part of Mardi was heaving with throes.
With the utmost delight, these tidings were welcomed
by many; yet others heard them with boding concern.
Those, too, there were, who rejoiced that the kings were
cast down; but mourned that the people themselves stood
not firmer. A victory, turned to no wise and enduring
account, said they, is no victory at all. Some victories
revert to the vanquished.
But day by day great crowds ran down to the beach, in
wait for canoes periodically bringing further intelligence.
Every hour new cries startled the air. Hurrah! another,
kingdom is burnt down to the earth's edge; another
demi-god
is unhelmed; another republic is dawning. Shake
hands, freemen, shake hands! Soon will we hear of
Dominora
down in the dust; of hapless Verdanna free as
ourselves
;
all Porpheero's volcanoes are bursting! Who may
withstand the people? The times tell terrible tales to
tyrants! Ere we die, freemen, all Mardi will be free.
Overhearing these shouts, Babbalanja thus addressed
Media
:My
lord, I can not but believe, that these men, are
far more excited than those with whom they so ardently
sympathize. But no wonder. The single discharges which
are heard in Porpheero; here come condensed in one
tremendous
report. Every arrival is a firing off of events by
platoons.
Now, during this tumultuous interval, King Media very
prudently kept himself exceedingly quiet. He doffed his
regalia; and in all things carried himself with a dignified
discretion. And many hours he absented himself; none
knowing whither he went, or what his employment.
So also with Babbalanja. But still pursuing our search,
at last we all journeyed into a great valley, whose
inhabitants
were more than commonly inflated with the ardor of
the times.
Rambling on, we espied a clamorous crowd gathered
about a conspicuous palm, against which, a scroll was fixed.
The people were violently agitated; storming out
maledictions
against the insolent knave, who, over night must
have fixed there, that scandalous document. But whoever
he may have been, certain it was, he had contrived to hood
himself effectually.
After much vehement discussion, during which sundry
inflammatory harangues were made from the stumps of trees
near by, it was proposed, that the scroll should be read aloud,
so that all might give ear.
Seizing it, a fiery youth mounted upon the bowed
shoulders
of an old man, his sire; and with a shrill voice, ever
and anon interrupted by outcries, read as follows:
Sovereign-kings of Vivenza! it is fit you should hearken
to wisdom. But well aware, that you give ear to little
wisdom except of your own; and that as freemen, you are
free to hunt down him who dissents from your majesties; I
deem it proper to address you anonymously.
And if it please you, you may ascribe this voice to the
gods: for never will you trace it to man.
It is not unknown, sovereign-kings! that in these
boisterous
days, the lessons of history are almost discarded, as
superseded
by present experiences. And that while all Mardi's
Present has grown out of its Past, it is becoming obsolete
to refer to what has been. Yet, peradventure, the Past is
an apostle.
The grand error of this age, sovereign-kings! is the
general
supposition, that the very special Diabolus is abroad;
whereas, the very special Diabolus has been abroad ever
since Mardi began.
And the grand error of your nation, sovereign-kings!
seems this:The conceit that Mardi is now in the last
scene of the last act of her drama; and that all preceding
events were ordained, to bring about the catastrophe you
believe to be at hand,a universal and permanent
Republic
.
May it please you, those who hold to these things are
fools, and not wise.
Time is made up of various ages; and each thinks its
own a novelty. But imbedded in the walls of the pyramids,
which outrun all chronologies, sculptured stones are found,
belonging to yet older fabrics. And as in the
moundbuilding
period of yore, so every age thinks its erections will
forever endure. But as your forests grow apace,
sovereign-kings
!
overrunning the tumuli in your western vales; so,
while deriving their substance from the past, succeeding
generations overgrow it; but in time, themselves decay.
Oro decrees these vicissitudes.
In chronicles of old, you read, sovereign kings! that an
eagle from the clouds presaged royalty to the fugitive
Taquinoo; and a king, Taquinoo reigned; No end to my
dynasty, thought he.
But another omen descended, foreshadowing the fall of
Zooperbi, his son; and Zooperbi returning from his camp,
found his country a fortress against him. No more kings
would she have. And for five hundred twelve-moons the
Regifugium or King's-flight, was annually celebrated like
your own jubilee day. And rampant young orators stormed
out detestation of kings; and augurs swore that their birds
presaged immortality to freedom.
Then, Romara's free eagles flew over all Mardi, and
perched on the topmost diadems of the east.
Ever thus must it be.
For, mostly, monarchs are as gemmed bridles upon the
world, checking the plungings of a steed from the Pampas.
And republics are as vast reservoirs, draining down all
streams to one level; and so, breeding a fullness which can
not remain full, without overflowing. And thus, Romara
flooded all Mardi, till scarce an Ararat was left of the lofty
kingdoms which had been.
Thus, also, did Franko, fifty twelve-moons ago. Thus
may she do again. And though not yet, have you,
sovereign-kings
!
in any large degree done likewise, it is because you
overflow your redundancies within your own mighty borders;
having a wild western waste, which many shepherds with
their flocks could not overrun in a day. Yet overrun at
last it will be; and then, the recoil must come.
And, may it please you, that thus far your chronicles
had narrated a very different story, had your population
been pressed and packed, like that of your old sire-land
Dominora. Then, your great experiment might have proved
an explosion; like the chemist's who, stirring his mixture,
was blown by it into the air.
For though crossed, and recrossed by many brave
quarterings
,
and boasting the great Bull in your pedigree; yet,
sovereign-kings! you are not meditative philosophers like
the people of a small republic of old; nor enduring stoics,
like their neighbors. Pent up, like them, may it please
you, your thirteen original tribes had proved more turbulent,
than so many mutinous legions. Free horses need wide
prairies; and fortunate for you, sovereign-kings! that you
have room enough, wherein to be free.
And, may it please you, you are free, partly, because you
are young. Your nation is like a fine, florid youth, full of
fiery impulses, and hard to restrain; his strong hand nobly
championing his heart. On all sides, freely he gives, and
still seeks to acquire. The breath of his nostrils is like
smoke in spring air; every tendon is electric with generous
resolves. The oppressor he defies to his beard; the high
walls of old opinions he scales with a bound. In the future
he sees all the domes of the East.
But years elapse, and this bold boy is transformed. His
eyes open not as of yore; his heart is shut up as a vice. He
yields not a groat; and seeking no more acquisitions, is only
bent on preserving his hoard. The maxims once trampled
under foot, are now printed on his front; and he who hated
oppressors, is become an oppressor himself.
Thus, often, with men; thus, often, with nations. Then
marvel not, sovereign-kings! that old states are different
from yours; and think not, your own must forever remain
liberal as now.
Each age thinks its own is eternal. But though for five
hundred twelve-moons, all Romara, by courtesy of history,
was republican; yet, at last, her terrible king-tigers came,
and spotted themselves with gore.
And time was, when Dominora was republican, down to
her sturdy back-bone. The son of an absolute monarch
became the man Karolus; and his crown and head, both
rolled in the dust. And Dominora had her patriots by
thousands
;
and lusty Defenses, and glorious Areopagiticas were
written, not since surpassed; and no turban was doffed save
in homage of Oro.
Yet, may it please you, to the sound of pipe and tabor,
the second King Karolus returned in good time; and was
hailed gracious majesty by high and low.
Throughout all eternity, the parts of the past are but
parts of the future reversed. In the old foot-prints, up and
down, you mortals go, eternally traveling your Sierras. And
not more infallible the ponderings of the Calculating Machine
than the deductions from the decimals of history.
In nations, sovereign-kings! there is a transmigration of
souls; in you, is a marvelous destiny. The eagle of
Romara
revives in your own mountain bird, and once more is
plumed for her flight. Her screams are answered by the
vauntful cries of a hawk; his red comb yet reeking with
slaughter. And one East, one West, those bold birds may
fly, till they lock pinions in the midmost beyond.
But, soaring in the sky over the nations that shall gather
their broods under their wings, that bloody hawk may
hereafter
be taken for the eagle.
And though crimson republics may rise in constellations,
like fiery Aldebarans, speeding to their culminations; yet,
down must they sink at last, and leave the old sultan-sun
in the sky; in time, again to be deposed.
For little longer, may it please you, can republics subsist
now, than in days gone by. For, assuming that Mardi is
wiser than of old; nevertheless, though all men approached
sages in intelligence, some would yet be more wise than
others; and so, the old degrees be preserved. And no
exemption
would an equality of knowledge furnish, from the
inbred servility of mortal to mortal; from all the organic
causes, which inevitably divide mankind into brigades and
battalions, with captains at their head.
Civilization has not ever been the brother of equality.
Freedom was born among the wild eyries in the mountains
and barbarous tribes have sheltered under her wings, when
the enlightened people of the plain have nestled under
different
pinions.
Though, thus far, for you, sovereign-kings! your republic
has been fruitful of blessings; yet, in themselves, monarchies
are not utterly evil. For many nations, they are better
than republics; for many, they will ever so remain. And
better, on all hands, that peace should rule with a scepter,
than than the tribunes of the people should brandish their
broadswords. Better be the subject of a king, upright and
just; than a freeman in Franko, with the executioner's ax
at every corner.
It is not the prime end, and chief blessing, to be politically
free. And freedom is only good as a means; is no end in
itself. Nor, did man fight it out against his masters to the
haft, not then, would he uncollar his neck from the yoke.
A born thrall to the last, yelping out his liberty, he still
remains a slave unto Oro; and well is it for the universe,
that Oro's scepter is absolute.
World-old the saying, that it is easier to govern others,
than oneself. And that all men should govern themselves
as nations, needs that all men be better, and wiser, than the
wisest of one-man rulers. But in no stable democracy do all
men govern themselves. Though an army be all
volunteers
,
martial law must prevail. Delegate your power, you
leagued mortals must. The hazard you must stand. And
though unlike King Bello of Dominora, your great chieftain,
sovereign-kings! may not declare war of himself;
nevertheless
,
has he done a still more imperial thing:gone to war
without declaring intentions. You yourselves were
precipitated
upon a neighboring nation, ere you knew your spears
were in your hands.
But, as in stars you have written it on the welkin,
sovereign-kings
!
you are a great and glorious people. And
verily, yours is the best and happiest land under the sun.
But not wholly, because you, in your wisdom, decreed it:
your origin and geography necessitated it. Nor, in their
germ, are all your blessings to be ascribed to the noble sires,
who of yore fought in your behalf, sovereign-kings! Your
nation enjoyed no little independence before your Declaration
declared it. Your ancient pilgrims fathered your liberty;
and your wild woods harbored the nursling. For the state
that to-day is made up of slaves, can not to-morrow
transmute
her bond into free; though lawlessness may transform
them into brutes. Freedom is the name for a thing that is
not
freedom; this, a lesson never learned in an hour or an
age. By some tribes it will never be learned.
Yet, if it please you, there may be such a thing as being
free under Csar. Ages ago, there were as many vital
freemen, as breathe vital air to-day.
Names make not distinctions; some despots rule without
swaying scepters. Though King Bello's palace was not put
together by yoked men; your federal temple of freedom,
sovereign-kings! was the handiwork of slaves.
It is not gildings, and gold maces, and crown-jewels alone,
that make a people servile. There is much bowing and
cringing among you yourselves, sovereign-kings! Poverty is
abased before riches, all Mardi over; any where, it is hard
to be a debtor; any where, the wise will lord it over fools;
every where, suffering is found.
Thus, freedom is more social than political. And its
real felicity is not to be shared.
That
is of a man's own
individual getting and holding. It is not, who rules the
state, but who rules me. Better be secure under one king,
than exposed to violence from twenty millions of monarchs,
though oneself be of the number.
But superstitious notions you harbor, sovereign kings!
Did you visit Dominora, you would not be marched straight
into a dungeon. And though you would behold sundry sights
displeasing, you would start to inhale such liberal breezes;
and hear crowds boasting of their privileges; as you, of yours.
Nor has the wine of Dominora, a monarchical flavor.
vol. ii.L
Now, though far and wide, to keep equal pace with the
times, great reforms, of a verity, be needed; nowhere are
bloody revolutions required. Though it be the most certain
of remedies, no prudent invalid opens his veins, to let out
his disease with his life. And though all evils may be
assuaged
;
all evils can not be done away. For evil is the
chronic malady of the universe; and checked in one place,
breaks forth in another.
Of late, on this head, some wild dreams have departed.
There are many, who erewhile believed that the age of
pikes and javelins was passed; that after a heady and
blustering
youth, old Mardi was at last settling down into a
serene old age; and that the Indian summer, first
discovered
in your land, sovereign kings! was the hazy vapor
emitted from its tranquil pipe. But it has not so proved.
Mardi's peaces are but truces. Long absent, at last the red
comets have returned. And return they must, though their
periods be ages. And should Mardi endure till mountain
melt into mountain, and all the isles form one table-land;
yet, would it but expand the old battle-plain.
Students of history are horror-struck at the massacres
of old; but in the shambles, men are being murdered to-day.
Could time be reversed, and the future change places with
the past, the past would cry out against us, and our future,
full as loudly, as we against the ages foregone. All the
Ages are his children, calling each other names.
Hark ye, sovereign-kings! cheer not on the yelping
pack too furiously. Hunters have been torn by their hounds.
Be advised; wash your hands. Hold aloof. Oro has poured
out an ocean for an everlasting barrier between you and
the worst folly which other republics have perpetrated.
That barrier hold sacred. And swear never to cross over to
Porpheero, by manifesto or army, unless you traverse dry
land.
And be not too grasping, nearer home. It is not freedom
to filch. Expand not your area too widely, now. Seek you
proselytes? Neighboring nations may be free, without coming
under your banner. And if you can not lay your ambition,
know this: that it is best served, by waiting events.
Time, but Time only, may enable you to cross the
equator
;
and give you the Arctic Circles for your boundaries.
So read the anonymous scroll; which straightway, was
torn into shreds.
Old tory, and monarchist! they shouted, Preaching
over his benighted sermons in these enlightened times! Fool!
does he not know that all the Past and its graves are being
dug over?
They were furious; so wildly rolling their eyes after
victims, that well was it for King Media, he wore not his
crown; and in silence, we moved unnoted from out the
crowd.
My lord, I am amazed at the indiscretion of a
demi-god
,
said Babbalanja, as we passed on our way; I
recognized your sultanic style the very first sentence. This,
then, is the result of your hours of seclusion.
Philosopher! I am astounded at your effrontery. I
detected your philosophy the very first maxim. Who posted
that parchment for you?
So, each charged the other with its authorship: and
there was no finding out, whether, indeed, either knew
aught of its origin.
Now, could it have been Babbalanja? Hardly. For,
philosophic as the document was, it seemed too dogmatic
and conservative for him. King Media? But though
imperially absolute in his political sentiments, Media
delivered
not himself so boldly, when actually beholding the
eruption in Franko.
Indeed, the settlement of this question must be left to the
commentators on Mardi, some four or five hundred centuries
hence.
CHAPTER LVIII.
THEY VISIT THE EXTREME SOUTH OF VIVENZA.
We
penetrated further and further into the valleys around;
but, though, as elsewhere, at times we heard whisperings
that promised an end to our wanderings;we still
wandered
on; and once again, even Yoomy abated his sanguine
hopes.
And now, we prepared to embark for the extreme south
of the land.
But we were warned by the people, that in that portion
of Vivenza, whither we were going, much would be seen
repulsive to strangers. Such things, however, indulgent
visitors overlooked. For themselves, they were well aware
of those evils. Northern Vivenza had done all it could to
assuage them; but in vain; the inhabitants of those
southern
valleys were a fiery, and intractable race; heeding
neither expostulations, nor entreaties. They were wedded
to their ways. Nay, they swore, that if the northern tribes
persisted in intermeddlings, they would dissolve the common
alliance, and establish a distinct confederacy among
themselves
.
Our coasting voyage at an end, our keels grated the
beach among many prostrate palms, decaying, and washed
by the billows. Though part and parcel of the shore we
had left, this region seemed another land. Fewer thriving
things were seen; fewer cheerful sounds were heard
Here labor has lost his laugh! cried Yoomy.
It was a great plain where we landed; and there, under
a burning sun, hundreds of collared men were toiling in
trenches, filled with the taro plant; a root most flourishing
in that soil. Standing grimly over these, were men unlike
them; armed with long thongs, which descended upon the
toilers, and made wounds. Blood and sweat mixed; and
in great drops, fell.
Who eat these plants thus nourished? cried Yoomy.
Are these men? asked Babbalanja.
Which mean you? said Mohi.
Heeding him not, Babbalanja advanced toward the
foremost
of those with the thongs,one Nulli: a cadaverous,
ghost-like man; with a low ridge of forehead; hair, steel-gray;
and wondrous eyes;bright, nimble, as the twin Corposant
balls, playing about the ends of ships' royal-yards in gales.
The sun passed under a cloud; and Nulli, darting at
Babbalanja those wondrous eyes, there fell upon him a
baleful glare.
Have they souls? he asked, pointing to the serfs.
No, said Nulli, their ancestors may have had; but
their souls have been bred out of their descendants; as the
instinct of scent is killed in pointers.
Approaching one of the serfs, Media took him by the
hand, and felt of it long; and looked into his eyes; and
placed his ear to his side; and exclaimed, Surely this
being has flesh that is warm; he has Oro in his eye; and
a heart in him that beats. I swear he is a man.
Is this our lord the king? cried Mohi, starting.
What art thou, said Babbalanja to the serf. Dost
ever feel in thee a sense of right and wrong? Art ever
glad or sad?They tell us thou art not a man:speak,
then, for thyself; say, whether thou beliest thy Maker.
Speak not of my Maker to me. Under the lash, I
believe
my masters, and account myself a brute; but in my
dreams, bethink myself an angel. But I am bond; and my
little ones;their mother's milk is gall.
Just Oro! cried Yoomy, do no thunders roll,no
lightnings flash in this accursed land!
Asylum for all Mardi's thralls! cried Media.
Incendiaries! cried he with the wondrous eyes, come
ye, firebrands, to light the flame of revolt? Know ye not,
that here are many serfs, who, incited to obtain their
liberty
,
might wreak some dreadful vengeance? Avaunt, thou
king!
thou
horrified at this? Go back to Odo, and right
her wrongs! These serfs are happier than thine; though
thine, no collars wear; more happy as they are, than if free.
Are they not fed, clothed, and cared for? Thy serfs pine
for food: never yet did these; who have no thoughts, no
cares.
Thoughts and cares are life, and liberty, and
immortality
!
cried Babbalanja; and are their souls, then, blown
out as candles?
Ranter! they are content, cried Nulli. They shed
no tears.
Frost never weeps, said Babbalanja; and tears are
frozen in those frigid eyes.
Oh fettered sons of fettered mothers, conceived and born
in manacles, cried Yoomy; dragging them through life;
and falling with them, clanking in the grave:oh, beings
as ourselves, how my stiff arm shivers to avenge you!
'Twere absolution for the matricide, to strike one rivet from
your chains. My heart outswells its home!
Oro! Art thou? cried Babbalanja; and doth this
thing exist? It shakes my little faith. Then, turning
upon Nulli, How can ye abide to sway this curs'd
dominion
?
Peace, fanatic! Who else may till unwholesome fields,
but these? And as these beings are, so shall they remain;
'tis right and righteous! Maramma champions it!
I
swear it! The first blow struck for them, dissolves the
union of Vivenza's vales. The northern tribes well know
it; and know me.
Said Media, Yet if
No more! another word, and, king as thou art, thou
shalt be dungeoned:here, there is such a law; thou art
not among the northern tribes.
And this is freedom! murmured Media; when
heaven's
own voice is throttled. And were these serfs to rise,
and fight for it; like dogs, they would be hunted down by
her pretended sons!
Pray, heaven! cried Yoomy, they may yet find a
way to loose their bonds without one drop of blood. But
hear me, Oro! were there no other way, and should their
masters not relent, all honest hearts must cheer this tribe of
Hamo on; though they cut their chains with blades thrice
edged, and gory to the haft! 'Tis right to fight for
freedom
,
whoever be the thrall.
These South savannahs may yet prove battle-fields,
said Mohi, gloomily, as we retraced our steps.
Be it, said Yoomy. Oro will van the right.
Not always has it proved so, said Babbalanja.
Ofttimes
,
the right fights single-handed against the world; and
Oro champions none. In all things, man's own battles, man
himself must fight. Yoomy: so far as feeling goes, your
sympathies are not more hot than mine; but for these serfs
you would cross spears; yet, I would not. Better present
woes for some, than future woes for all.
No need to fight, cried Yoomy, to liberate that tribe
of Hamo instantly; a way may be found, and no
irretrievable
evil ensue.
Point it out, and be blessed, Yoomy.
That is for Vivenza; but the head is dull, where the heart is cold.
My lord, said Babbalanja, you have startled us by
your kingly sympathy for suffering;say thou, then, in what
wise manner it shall be relieved.
That is for Vivenza, said Media.
Mohi, you are old: speak thou.
Let Vivenza speak, said Mohi.
Thus, then, we all agree; and weeping, all but echo
hard-hearted Nulli. Tears are not swords; and wrongs
seem almost natural as rights. For the righteous to
suppress
an evil, is sometimes harder than for others to uphold
it. Humanity cries out against this vast enormity:not
one man knows a prudent remedy. Blame not, then, the
North; and wisely judge the South. Ere, as a nation, they
became responsible, this thing was planted in their midst.
Such roots strike deep. Place to-day those serfs in
Dominora
;
and with them, all Vivenza's Past;and serfs, for
many years, in Dominora, they would be. Easy is it to
stand afar and rail. All men are censors who have lungs.
We can say, the stars are wrongly marshaled. Blind men
say the sun is blind. A thousand muscles wag our tongues;
though our tongues were housed, that they might have a
home. Whoso is free from crime, let him cross himself
but hold his cross upon his lips. That he is not bad, is not
of him. Potters' clay and wax are all, molded by hands
invisible. The soil decides the man. And, ere birth, man
wills not to be born here or there. These southern tribes
have grown up with this thing; bond-women were their
nurses, and bondmen serve them still. Nor are all their
serfs such wretches as those we saw. Some seem happy:
yet not as men. Unmanned, they know not what they are.
And though, of all the south, Nulli must stand almost alone
in his insensate creed; yet, to all wrong-doers, custom backs
the sense of wrong. And if to every Mardian, conscience
be the awarder of its own doom; then, of these tribes, many
shall be found exempted from the least penalty of this sin.
But sin it is, no less;a blot, foul as the crater-pool of
hell; it puts out the sun at noon; it parches all fertility;
and, conscience or no conscienceere he dielet every
master who wrenches bond-babe from mother, that the
nipple
tear; unwreathes the arms of sisters; or cuts the holy
unity in twain; till apart fall man and wife, like one
bleeding
body cleft:let that master thrice shrive his soul; take
every sacrament; on his bended knees give up the ghost;
yet shall he die despairing; and live again, to die forever
damned. The future is all hieroglyphics. Who may read?
But, methinks the great laggard Time must now march up
apace, and somehow befriend these thralls. It can not be,
that misery is perpetually entailed; though, in a land
proscribing
primogeniture, the first-born and last of Hamo's
tribe must still succeed to all their sires' wrongs. Yes:
Timeall-healing TimeTime, great Philanthropist!
Time must befriend these thralls!
Oro grant it! cried Yoomy and let Mardi say,
amen!
Amen! amen! amen! cried echoes echoing echoes.
We traversed many of these southern vales; but as in
Dominora,so, throughout Vivenza, North and South,
Yillah harbored not.
L*
CHAPTER LIX.
THEY CONVERSE OF THE MOLLUSCA, KINGS, TOAD-STOOLS
AND OTHER MATTERS.
Once
more embarking, we gained Vivenza's southwestern
side; and there, beheld vast swarms of laborers discharging
from canoes, great loads of earth; which they tossed upon
the beach.
It is true, then, said Media that these freemen are
engaged in digging down other lands, and adding them to
their own, piece-meal. And this, they call extending their
dominions agriculturally, and peaceably.
My lord, they pay a price for every canoe-load, said
Mohi.
Ay, old man, holding the spear in one hand, and
striking
the bargain with the other.
Yet charge it not upon all Vivenza, said Babbalanja.
Some of her tribes are hostile to these things: and when
their countryman fight for land, are only warlike in
opposing
war.
And therein, Babbalanja, is involved one of those
anomalies in the condition of Vivenza, said Media, which
I can hardly comprehend. How comes it, that with so
many things to divide them, the valley-tribes still keep their
mystic league intact?
All plain, it is because the model, whence they derive
their union, is one of nature's planning. My lord, have
you ever observed the mysterious federation subsisting among
the mollusca of the Tunicata order,in other words, a
species of cuttle-fish, abounding at the bottom of the
lagoon?
Yes: in clear weather about the reefs, I have beheld
them time and again: but never with an eye to their
political condition.
Ah! my lord king, we should not cut off the nervous
communication between our eyes, and our cerebellums.
What were you about to say concerning the Tunicata
order of mollusca, sir philosopher?
My very honorable lord, I hurry to conclude. They
live in a compound structure; but though connected by
membranous canals, freely communicating throughout the
leagueeach member has a heart and stomach of its own;
provides and digests its own dinners; and grins and bears its
own gripes, without imparting the same to its neighbors.
But if a prowling shark touches one member, it ruffles all.
Precisely thus now with Vivenza. In that confederacy,
there are as many consciences as tribes; hence, if one
member on its own behalf, assumes aught afterwards
repudiated
,
the sin rests on itself alone; is not participated.
A very subtle explanation, Babbalanja. You must
allude, then, to those recreant tribes; which, while in their
own eyes presenting a sublime moral spectacle to Mardi,
in King Bello's, do but present a hopeless example of bad
debts. And these, the tribes that boast of boundless
wealth.
Most true, my lord. But Bello errs, when for this
thing, he stigmatizes all Vivenza, as a unity.
Babbalanja, you yourself are made up of members:
then, if you be sick of a lumbago,'tis not
you
that are
unwell; but your spine.
As you will, my lord. I have said. But to speak no
more on that headwhat sort of a sensation, think you, life
is to such creatures as those mollusca?
Answer your own question, Babbalanja.
I will; but first tell me what sort of a sensation life is
to you, yourself, my lord.
Pray answer that along with the other, Azzageddi.
Directly; but tell me, if you will, my lord, what sort
of a sensation life is to a toad-stool.
Pray, Babbalanja put all three questions together; and
then, do what you have often done before,pronounce
yourself
a lunatic.
My lord, I beseech you, remind me not of that fact so
often. It is true, but annoying. Nor will any wise man
call another a fool.
Do you take me for a mere man, then, Babbalanja, that
you talk to me thus?
My demi-divine lord and master, I was deeply concerned
at your indisposition last night:may a loving subject
inquire, whether his prince is completely recovered from the
effect of those guavas?
Have a care, Azzageddi; you are far too courteous, to be
civil. But proceed.
I obey. In kings, mollusca, and toad-stools, life is one
thing and the same. The Philosopher Dumdi pronounces it
a certain febral vibration of organic parts, operating upon
the vis inertia of unorganized matter. But Bardianna says
nay. Hear him. `Who put together this marvelous
mechanism of mine; and wound it up, to go for three score
years and ten; when it runs out, and strikes Time's hours no
more? And what is it, that daily and hourly renews, and
by a miracle, creates in me my flesh and my blood? What
keeps up the perpetual telegraphic communication between
my outpost toes and digits, and that domed grandee up
aloft, my brain?It is not I; nor you; nor he; nor it.
No; when I place my hand to that king muscle my heart,
I am appalled. I feel the great God himself at work in
me. Oro is life.'
And what is death? demanded Media.
Death, my lord!it is the deadest of all things.
CHAPTER LX.
WHEREIN, THAT GALLANT GENTLEMAN AND DEMIGOD, KING
MEDIA, SCEPTER IN HAND, THROWS HIMSELF INTO THE
BREACH.
Sailing
south from Vivenza, not far from its coast, we
passed a cluster of islets, green as new fledged grass; and
like the mouths of floating cornucopias, their margins
brimmed
over upon the brine with flowers. On some, grew
stately roses; on others stood twin-pillars; across others,
tri-hued rainbows rested.
Cried Babbalanja, pointing to the last, Franko's pledge
of peace! with that, she loudly vaunts she'll span the reef!
Strike out all hues but red,and the token's nearer
truth.
All these isles were prolific gardens; where King Bello,
and the Princes of Porpheero grew their most delicious
fruits,nectarines and grapes.
But, though hard by, Vivenza owned no garden here;
yet longed and lusted; and her hottest tribes oft roundly
swore, to root up all roses the half-reef over; pull down all
pillars; and dissolve all rainbows. Mardi's half is ours;
said they. Stand back invaders! Full of vanity; and
mirroring themselves in the future; they deemed all reflected
there, their own.
'Twas now high noon.
Methinks the sun grows hot, said Media, retreating
deeper under the canopy. Ho! Vee-Vee; have you no
cooling beverage? none of that golden wine distilled from
torrid grapes, and then sent northward to be cellared in an
iceberg? That wine was placed among our stores. Search,
search the crypt, little Vee-Vee! Ha, I see it!that
yellow
gourd!Come: drag it forth, my boy. Let's have
the amber cups: so: pass them round;fill all! Taji!
my demi-god, up heart! Old Mohi, my babe, may you live
ten thousand centuries! Ah! this way you mortals have
of dying out at three score years and ten, is but a craven
habit. So, Babbalanja! may you never die. Yoomy! my
sweet poet, may you live to sing to me in Paradise. Ha,
ha! would that we floated in this glorious stuff, instead of
this pestilent brine.Hark ye! were I to make a Mardi
now, I'd have every continent a huge haunch of venison;
every ocean a wine-vat! I'd stock every cavern with choice
old spirits, and make three surplus suns to ripen the grapes
all the year round. Let's drink to that!Brimmers!
So: may the next Mardi that's made, be one entire grape;
and mine the squeezing!
Look, look! my lord, cried Yoomy, what a glorious
shore we pass.
Sallying out into the high golden noon, with
goldenbeaming
goblets suspended, we gazed.
This must be Kolumbo of the south, said Mohi.
It was a long, hazy reach of land; piled up in terraces,
traced here and there with rushing streams, that worked up
gold dust alluvian, and seemed to flash over pebbled diamonds.
Heliotropes, sun-flowers, marigolds gemmed, or starred the
violet meads, and vassal-like, still sunward bowed their
heads. The rocks were pierced with grottoes, blazing with
crystals, many-tinted.
It was a land of mints and mines; its east a ruby; west
a topaz. Inland, the woodlands stretched an ocean,
bottomless
with foliage; its green surges bursting through
cablevines
;
like Xerxes' brittle chains which vainly sought to bind
the Hellespont. Hence flowed a tide of forest sounds; of
parrots, paroquets, macaws; blent with the howl of jaguars,
hissing of anacondas, chattering of apes, and herons screaming.
Out from those depths up rose a stream.
The land lay basking in the world's round torrid brisket,
hot with solar fire.
No need here to land, cried Yoomy, Yillah lurks
not here.
Heat breeds life, and sloth, and rage, said Babbalanja.
Here live bastard tribes and mongrel nations; wrangling
and murdering to prove their freedom.Refill, my lord.
Methinks, Babbalanja, you savor of the mysterious
parchment, in Vivenza read:Ha? Yes, philosopher,
these are the men, who toppled castles to make way for
hovels; these, they who fought for freedom, but find it
despotism to rule themselves. These, Babbalanja, are of
the race, to whom a tyrant would prove a blessing. So
saying he drained his cup.
My lord, that last sentiment decides the authorship of
the scroll. But, with deference, tyrants seldom can prove
blessings; inasmuch as evil seldom eventuates in good.
Yet will these people soon have a tyrant over them, if long
they cleave to war. Of many javelins, one must prove a
scepter; of many helmets, one a crown. It is but in the
wearing.Refill, my lord.
Fools, fools! cried Media, these tribes hate us kings;
yet know not, that Peace is War against all kings. We
seldom are undone by spears, which are our ministers.
This wine is strong.
Ha, now's the time! In his cups learn king-craft from
a king. Ay, ay, my lord, your royal order will endure, so
long as men will fight. Break the spears, and free the
nations. Kings reap the harvests that wave on battle-fields.
And oft you kings do snatch the aloe-flower, whose slow
blossoming mankind watches for a hundred years.Say on,
my lord.
All this I know; and, therefore, rest content. My
children's children will be kings; though, haply, called by
other titles. Mardi grows fastidious in names: we royalties
will humor it. The steers would burst their yokes, but have
not hands. The whole herd rears and plunges, but soon
will bow again: the old, old way!
Yet, in Porpheero, strong scepters have been wrested
from anointed hands. Mankind seems in arms.
Let them arm on. They hate us:good;they
always
have; yet still we've reigned, son after sire.
Sometimes
they slay us, Babbalanja; pour out our marrow, as I
this wine; but they spill no kinless blood. 'Twas justly
held of old, that but to touch a monarch, was to strike at
Oro.Truth. The palest vengeance is a royal ghost; and
regicides but father slaves. Thrones, not scepters, have been
broken. Mohi, what of the past? Has it not ever proved
so?
Pardon, my lord; the times seem changed. 'Tis held,
that demi-gods no more rule by right divine. In Vivenza's
land, they swear the last kings now reign in Mardi.
Is the last day at hand, old man? Mohi, your beard
is gray; but, Yoomy, listen. When you die, look around;
mark then if any mighty change be seen. Old kingdoms
may be on the wane; but new dynasties advance. Though
revolutions rise to high spring-tide, monarchs will still drown
hard;monarchs survived the flood!
Are all our dreams, then, vain? sighed Yoomy. Is
this no dawn of day that streaks the crimson East! Naught
but the false and flickering lights which sometimes mock
Aurora in the north! Ah, man, my brother! have all
martyrs for thee bled in vain; in vain we poets sang, and
prophets spoken? Nay, nay; great Mardi, helmed and
mailed, strikes at Oppression's shield, and challenges to
battle! Oro will defend the right, and royal crests must
roll.
Thus, Yoomy, ages since, you mortal poets sang; but
the world may not be moved from out the orbit in which
first it rolled. On the map that charts the spheres, Mardi
is marked `the world of kings.' Round centuries on
centuries
have wheeled by:has all this been its nonage? Now,
when the rocks grow gray, does man first sprout his beard?
Or, is your golden time, your equinoctial year, at hand, that
your race fast presses toward perfection; and every hand
grasps at a scepter, that kings may be no more?"
"But free Vivenza! Is she not the star, that must, ere
long, lead up the constellations, though now unrisen? No
kings are in Vivenza ; yet, spite her thralls, in that land
seems more of good than elsewhere. Our hopes are not wild
dreams: Vivenza cheers our hearts. She is a rainbow to
the isles!"
"Ay, truth it is, that in Vivenza they have prospered.
But thence it comes not, that all men may be as they. Are
all men of one heart and brain; one bone and sinew? Are
all nations sprung of Dominora's loins? Or, has Vivenza
yet proved her creed? Yoomy! the years that prove a
man, prove not a nation. But two kings'-reigns have passed
since Vivenza was a monarch's. Her climacteric is not
come; hers is not yet a nation's manhood even ; though now
in childhood, she anticipates her youth, and lusts for empire
like any czar. Yoomy! judge not yet. Time hath tales
to tell. Many books, and many long, long chapters, are
wanting to Vivenza's history; and what history but is full
of blood?"
"There stop, my lord," said Babbalanja, "nor aught
predict. Fate laughs at prophets; and of all birds, the
raven is a liar!"
CHAPTER LXI.
THEY ROUND THE STORMY CAPE OF CAPES.
Long
leagues, for weary days, we voyaged along that coast,
till we came to regions where we multiplied our mantles.
The sky grew overcast. Each a night, black
storm-clouds
swept the wintry sea; and like Sahara caravans,
which leave their sandy wakesso, thick and fleet, slanted
the scud behind. Through all this rack and mist, ten
thousand
foam-flaked dromedary-humps uprose.
Deep among those panting, moaning fugitives, the three
canoes raced on.
And now, the air grew nipping cold. The clouds shed
off their fleeces; a snow-hillock, each canoe; our beards,
white-frosted.
And so, as seated in our shrouds, we sailed in among
great mountain passes of ice-isles; from icy ledges scaring
shivering seals, and white bears, musical with icicles,
jingling
from their shaggy ermine.
Far and near, in towering ridges, stretched the glassy
Andes; with their own frost, shuddering through all their
domes and pinnacles. Ice-splinters rattled down the cliffs,
and seethed into the sea.
Broad away, in amphitheaters undermined by currents,
whole cities of ice-towers, in crashes, toward one center,
fell.In their earthquakes, Lisbon and Lima never saw the
like. Churned and broken in the boiling tide, they swept
off amain;over and over rolling; like porpoises to vessels
tranced in calms, bringing down the gale.
At last, rounding an antlered headland, that seemed a
moose at bayere long, we launched upon blue lake-like
waters, serene as Windermere, or Horicon. Thus, from the
boisterous storms of youth, we glide upon senility.
But as we northward voyaged, another aspect wore the sea.
In far-off, endless vistas, colonnades of water-spouts were
seen: all heaven's dome upholding on their shafts: and
bright forms gliding up and down within. So at Luz, in
his strange vision, Jacob saw the angels.
A boundless cave of stalactites, it seemed; the cloud-born
vapors downward spiraling, till they met the
whirlpool-column
from the sea; then, uniting, over the waters stalked,
like ghosts of gods. Or midway sundereddown, sullen,
sunk the watery half; and far up into heaven, was drawn
the vapory. As, at death, we mortals part in twain; our
earthy half still here abiding; but our spirits flying whence
they came.
In good time, we gained the thither side of great
Kolumbo
of the South; and sailing on, long waited for the
day; and wondered at the darkness.
What steadfast clouds!" cried Yoomy, yonder! far
aloft: that ridge, with many points; it fades below, but
shows a faint white crest."
Not clouds, but mountains," said Babbalanja, the vast
spine, that traverses Kolumbo; spurring off in ribs, that
nestle loamy valleys, veined with silver streams, and silver
ores."
It was a long, embattled line of pinnacles. And high posted
in the East, those thousand bucklered peaks stood forth, and
breasted back the Dawn. Before their purple bastions bold,
Aurora long arrayed her spears, and clashed her golden shells.
The summons dies away. But now, her lancers charge the
steep, and gain its crest a-glow;their glittering spears and
blazoned shields triumphant in the morn.
But ere that sight, we glided on for hours in twilight;
when, on those mountains' farther side, the hunters must
have been abroad, morning-glories all astir.
CHAPTER LXII.
THEY ENCOUNTER GOLD-HUNTERS.
Now
, northward coasting along Kolumbo's Western
shore, whence came the same wild forest-sounds, as from the
Eastern; and where we landed not, to seek among those
wrangling tribes;after many, many days, we spied prow
after prow, before the wind all northward bound: sails
wide-spread, and paddles plying: scaring the fish from
before them.
Their inmates answered not our earnest hail.
But as they sped, with frantic glee, in one long chorus
thus they sang:
We rovers bold,
To the land of Gold,
Over bowling billows are gliding:
Eager to toil,
For the golden spoil,
And every hardship biding.
See! See!
Before our prows' resistless dashes,
The gold-fish fly in golden flashes!
'Neath a sun of gold,
We rovers bold,
On the golden land are gaining;
And every night,
We steer aright,
By golden stars unwaning!
All fires burn a golden glare:
No locks so bright as golden hair!
All orange groves have golden gushings:
All mornings dawn with golden flushings!
In a shower of gold, say fables old,
A maiden was won by the god of gold!
In golden goblets wine is beaming
On golden couches kings are dreaming!
The Golden Rule dries many tears!
The Golden Number rules the spheres!
Gold, gold it is, that sways the nations
Gold! gold! the center of all rotations!
On golden axles worlds are turning
With phosphorescence seas are burning!
All fire-flies flame with golden gleamings
Gold-hunters' hearts with golden dreamings!
With golden arrows kings are slain:
With gold we'll buy a freeman's name!
In toilsome trades,for scanty earnings,
At home we've slaved, with stifled yearnings:
No light! no hope! Oh, heavy woe!
When nights fled fast, and days dragged slow.
But joyful now, with eager eye,
Fast to the Promised Land we fly
Where in deep mines,
The treasure shines;
Or down in beds of golden streams,
The gold-flakes glance in golden gleams!
How we long to sift, That yellow drift!
Rivers! Rivers! cease your going!
Sand-bars! rise, and stay the tide!
'Till we've gained the golden flowing;
And in the golden haven ride!
Quick, quick, my lord, cried Yoomy, let us follow
them ; and from the golden waters where she lies, our
Yillah may emerge.
No, no, said Babbalanja, no Yillah there!from
yonder promised-land, fewer seekers will return, than go.
Under a gilded guise, happiness is still their instinctive aim.
But vain, Yoomy, to snatch at Happiness. Of that we
may not pluck and eat. It is the fruit of our own toilsome
planting; slow it grows, nourished by many tears, and all
our earnest tendings. Yet ere it ripen, frosts may nip;
and then, we plant again; and yet again. Deep, Yoomy,
deep, true treasure lies; deeper than all Mardi's gold, rooted
to Mardi's axis. But unlike gold, it lurks in every soil,
all Mardi over. With golden pills and potions is sickness
warded off?the shrunken veins of age, dilated with new
wine of youth? Will gold the heart-ache cure? turn
toward us hearts estranged? will gold, on solid centers
empires fix? 'Tis toil world-wasted to toil in mines.
Were all the isles gold globes, set in a quicksilver sea, all
Mardi were then a desert. Gold is the only poverty; of
all glittering ills the direst. And that man might not
impoverish himself thereby, Oro hath hidden it, with all
other banes,saltpeter and explosives, deep in mountain
bowels, and river-beds. But man still will mine for it;
and mining, dig his doom.Yoomy, Yoomy!she we seek,
lurks not in the Golden Hills!
Lo, a vision! cried Yoomy, his hands wildly passed
across his eyes. A vast and silent bay, belted by silent
villages
:gaunt
dogs howling over grassy thresholds at stark
corpses of old age and infancy; gray hairs mingling with sweet
flaxen curls; fields, with turned furrows, choked with briers;
arbor-floors strown over with hatchet-helves, rotting in the
iron; a thousand paths, marked with foot-prints, all inland
leading, none villageward; and strown with traces, as of a
flying host. On: over foresthill, and daleand lo! the
golden region! After the glittering spoil, by strange
rivermargins
,
and beneath impending cliffs, thousands delve in
quicksands; and, sudden, sink in graves of their own making:
with gold dust mingling their own ashes. Still deeper, in
more solid ground, other thousands slave; and pile their
earth so high, they gasp for air, and die; their comrades
mounting on them, and delving still, and dyinggrave pile
on grave! Here, one haggard hunter murders another in
his pit; and murdering, himself is murdered by a third.
Shrieks and groans! cries and curses! It seems a golden
Hell! With many camels, a sleek stranger comespauses
before the shining heaps, and shows
his
treasures: yams
and bread-fruit. `Give, give,' the famished hunters cry
`a thousand shekels for a yam!a prince's ransom for a
meal!Oh, stranger! on our knees we worship thee:
take, take our gold; but let us live! Yams are thrown
them; and they fight. Then be who toiled not, dug not,
slaved not, straight loads his caravans with gold; regains
the beach, and swift embarks for home. Home! home!
the hunters cry, with bursting eyes. With this bright
gold, could we but join our waiting wives, who wring their
hands on distant shores, all then were well. But we can
not fly; our prows lie rotting on the beach. Ah! home!
thou only happiness! better thy silver earnings than all
these golden findings. Oh, bitter end to all our hopeswe
die in golden graves.
CHAPTER LXIII.
THEY SEEK THROUGH THE ISLES OF PALMS; AND PASS THE
ISLES OF MYRRH.
Now
, our prows we turned due west, across the blue
lagoon.
Soon, no land appeared. Far as the eye could sweep,
one azure plain; all over flaked with foamy fleeces:a
boundless flock upon a boundless mead!
Again, all changed. Like stars in multitude, bright islets
multiplied around. Emerald-green, they dotted shapes
fantastic
:
circles, arcs, and crescents;atolls all, or coral
carcanets
,
begemmed and flashing in the sun.
By these we glided, group after group; and through the
foliage, spied sweet forms of maidens, like Eves in Edens ere
the Fall, or Proserpines in Ennas. Artless airs came from
the shore; and from the censer-swinging roses, a bloom, as
if from Hebe's cheek.
Here, at last, we find sweet Yillah! murmured Yoomy.
Here must she lurk in innocence! Quick! Let us land
and search.
If here, said Babbalanja, Yillah will not stay our
coming, but fly before us through the groves. Wherever a
canoe is beached, see you not the palm-trees pine? Not
so, where never keel yet smote the strand. In mercy, let
us fly from hence. I know not why, but our breath here,
must prove a blight.
These regions passed, we came to savage islands, where
the glittering coral seemed bones imbedded, bleaching in the
sun. Savage men stood naked on the strand, and
brandished
uncouth clubs, and gnashed their teeth like boars.
The full red moon was rising; and, in long review there
passed before it, phantom shapes of victims, led bound to
altars through the groves. Death-rattles filled the air. But
a cloud descended, and all was gloom.
Again blank water spread before us, and after many
days, there came a gentle breeze, fraught with all spicy
breathings ; cinnamon aromas; and in the rose-flushed
evening
air, like glow worms, glowed the islets, where this
incense
burned.
Sweet isles of myrh! oh crimson groves, cried Yoomy.
Woe, woe's your fate! your brightness and your bloom,
like musky fire-flies, double-lure to death! On ye, the
nations prey like bears that gorge themselves with honey.
Swan-like, our prows sailed in among these isles; and oft
we landed; but in vain; and leaving them, we still
pursued
the setting sun.
vol. ii.M
CHAPTER LXIV.
CONCENTRIC, INWARD, WITH MARDI'S REEF, THEY LEAVE
THEIR WAKE AROUND THE WORLD.
West
, West! West, West! Whitherward point Hope
and prophet-fingers; whitherward, at sun-set, kneel all
worshipers of fire; whitherward in mid-ocean, the great
whales turn to die; whitherward face all the Moslem dead
in Persia; whitherward lie Heaven and Hell!West, West!
Whitherward mankind and empiresflocks, caravans,
armies
,
navies; worlds, suns, and stars all wend!West,
West!Oh boundless boundary! Eternal goal!
Whitherward
rush, in thousand worlds, ten thousand thousand
keels! Beacon, by which the universe is steered!Like
the north-star, attracting all needles! Unattainable forever;
but forever leading to great things this side thyself!Hive
of all sunsets!Gabriel's pinions may not overtake thee!
Over balmy waves, still westward sailing! From dawn
till eve, the bright, bright days sped on, chased by the gloomy
nights; and, in glory dying, lent their luster to the starry
skies. So, long the radiant dolphins fly before the sable
sharks; but seized, and torn in flamesdie, burning:
their last splendor left, in sparkling scales that float along
the sea.
Cymbals, drums and psalteries! the air beats like a pulse
with music!High land! high land! and moving lights,
and painted lanterns!What grand shore is this?
Reverence we render thee, Old Orienda! cried Media,
with bared brow, Original of all empires and emperors!
a crowned king salutes thee!
Mardi's father-land! cried Mohi, grandsire of the
nations,hail!
All hail! cried Yoomy. Kings and sages hither
coming, should come like palmers,scrip and staff! Oh
Orienda! thou wert our East, where first dawned song and
science, with Mardi's primal mornings! But now, how
changed! the dawn of light become a darkness, which we
kindle with the gleam of spears! On the world's ancestral
hearth, we spill our brothers' blood!
Herein, said Babbalanja, have many distant tribes
proved parricidal. In times gone by, Luzianna hither sent
her proas; Franko, her scores of captains; and the Dykemen,
their peddler hosts, with yard-stick spears! But thou, oh
Bello! lord of the empire lineage! Noah of the moderns.
Sire of the long line of nations yet in germ!thou,
Bello, and thy locust armies, are the present curse of
Orienda. Down ancient streams, from holy plains, in rafts
thy murdered float! The pestilence that thins thy armies
here, is bred of corpses, made by thee. Maramma's
priests, thy pious heralds, loud proclaim that of all pagans,
Orienda's most resist the truth!ay! vain all pious voices,
that speak from clouds of war! The march of conquest
through wild provinces, may be the march of Mind; but
not the march of Love.
Thou, Bello! cried Yoomy, would'st wrest the crook
from Alma's hand, and place in it a spear. But vain to
make a conqueror of him, who put off the purple when he
came to Mardi; and declining gilded miters, entered the
nations meekly on an ass.
Oh curse of commerce! cried Babbalanja, that it
barters souls for gold. Bello! with opium, thou wouldst
drug this land, and murder it in sleep!And what boot
thy conquests here? Seed sown by spears but seldom
springs; and harvests reaped thereby, are poisoned by the
sickle's edge.
Yet on, and on we coasted; counting not the days.
Oh, folds and flocks of nations! dusky tribes
innumerable
!
cried Yoomy, camped on plains and steppes; on
thousand mountains, worshiping the stars; in thousand
valleys, offering up first-fruits, till all the forests seem in
flames;where, in fire, the widow's spirit mounts to meet
her lord!Oh, Orienda, in thee 'tis vain to seek our
Yillah!
How dark as death the night! said Mohi, shaking the
dew from his braids, the Heavens blaze not here with
stars, as over Dominora's land, and broad Vivenza.
One only constellation was beheld; but every star was
brilliant as the one, that promises the morning. That
constellation was the Crux-Australis,the badge, and type
of Alma.
And now, southwest we steered, till another island vast,
was reached;Hamora! far trending toward the Antarctic
Pole.
Coasting on by barbarous beaches, where painted men,
with spears, charged on all attempts to land, at length we
rounded a mighty bluff,lit by a beacon; and heard a bugle
call:Bello's hurrying to their quarters, the World-End's
garrison.
Here, the sea rolled high, in mountain surges: mid which,
we toiled and strained, as if ascending cliffs of Caucasus.
But not long thus. As when from howling Rhtian
heights, the traveler spies green Lombardy below, and
downward
rushes toward that pleasant plain; so, sloping from
long rolling swells, at last we launched upon the calm
lagoon.
But as we northward sailed, once more the storm-trump
blew, and charger-like, the seas ran mustering to the call;
and in battalions crouched before a towering rock, far distant
from the main. No moon, eclipsed in Egypt's skies, looked
half so lone. But from out that darkness, on the loftiest
peak, Bello's standard waved.
Oh rifled tomb! cried Babbalanja. Wherein lay the
Mars and Moloch of our times, whose constellated crown,
was gemmed with diadems. Thou god of war! who didst
seem the devouring Beast of the Apocalypse; casting so vast
a shadow over Mardi, that yet it lingers in old Franko's vale;
where still they start at thy tremendous ghost; and, late,
have hailed a phantom, King! Almighty hero-spell! that
after the lapse of half a century, can so bewitch all hearts!
But one drop of hero-blood will deify a fool.
Franko! thou wouldst be free; yet thy free homage is to
the buried ashes of a King; thy first choice, the
exaltation
of his race. In furious fires, thou burn'st Ludwig's
throne; and over thy new-made chieftain's portal, in golden
letters print'st`The Palace of our Lord!' In thy New
Dispensation
,
thou cleavest to the exploded Law. And on
Freedom's
altarah, I fearstill, may slay thy hecatombs. But
Freedom turns away; she is sick with burnt blood of
offerings
.
Other rituals she loves; and like Oro, unseen herself,
would be worshiped only by invisibles. Of long drawn
cavalcades, pompous processions, frenzied banners, mystic
music, marching nations, she will none. Oh, may thy
peaceful
Future, Franko, sanctify thy bloody Past. Let not
history
say; `To her old gods, she turned again.'
This rocky islet passed, the sea went down; once more
we neared Hamora's western shore. In the deep darkness,
here and there, its margin was lit up by foam-white,
breaking
billows rolled over from Vivenza's strand, and down
from northward Dominora; marking places where light was
breaking in, upon the interior's jungle-gloom.
In heavy sighs, the night-winds from shore came over us.
Ah, vain to seek sweet Yillah here, cried Yoomy.
Poor land! curst of man, not Oro! how thou faintest for
thy children, torn from thy soil, to till a stranger's.
Vivenza
!
did these winds not spend their plaints, ere reaching
thee, thy every vale would echo them. Oh, tribe of Hamo!
thy cup of woe so brims, that soon it must overflow upon
the land which holds ye thralls. No misery born of crime,
but spreads and poisons wide. Suffering hunteth sin, as the
gaunt hound the hare, and tears it in the greenest brakes.
Still on we sailed: and after many tranquil days and
nights, a storm came down, and burst its thousand bombs.
The lightnings forked and flashed; the waters boiled; our
three prows lifted themselves in supplication; but the billows
smote them as they reared.
Said Babbalanja, bowing to the blast: Thus, oh
Vivenza
!
retribution works! Though long delayed, it comes
at lastJudgment, with all her bolts.
Now, a current seized us, and like three darts, our keels
sped eastward, through a narrow strait, far in, upon a
smooth expanse, an inland ocean, without a throb.
On our left, Porpheero's southwest point, a mighty rock,
long tiers of galleries within, deck on deck; and flag-staffs,
like an admiral's masts: a line-of-battle-ship, all purple stone,
and anchored in the sea. Here Bello's lion crouched; and,
through a thousand port-holes, eyed the world.
On our right, Hamora's northern shore gleamed thick with
crescents; numerous as the crosses along the opposing strand.
How vain to say, that progress is the test of truth, my
lord, said Babbalanja, when, after many centuries, those
crescents yet unwaning shine, and count a devotee for every
worshiper of yonder crosses. Truth and Merit have other
symbols than success; and in this mortal race, all competitors
may enter; and the field is clear for all. Side by side, Lies
run with Truths, and fools with wise; but, like geometric
lines, though they pierce infinity, never may they join.
Over that tideless sea we sailed; and landed right, and
landed left; but the maiden never found; till, at last, we
gained the water's limit; and inland saw great pointed
masses, crowned with halos.
Granite continents, cried Babbalanja, that seem
created
like the planets, not built with human hands. Lo,
Landmarks! upon whose flanks Time leaves its traces, like
old tide-rips of diluvian seas.
As, after wandering round and round some purple dell,
deep in a boundless prairie's heart, the baffled hunter plunges
in; then, despairing, turns once more to gain the open plain;
even so we seekers now curved round our keels; and from
that inland sea emerged. The universe again before us; our
quest, as wide.
CHAPTER LXV.
SAILING ON.
Morning
dawned upon the same mild, blue Lagoon as
erst; and all the lands that we had passed, since leaving
Piko's shore of spears, were faded from the sight.
Part and parcel of the Mardian isles, they formed a
cluster by themselves; like the Pleiades, that shine in
Taurus, and are eclipsed by the red splendor of his fiery eye,
and the thick clusterings of the constellations round.
And as in Orion, to some old king-astronomer,say,
King of Rigel, or Betelguese,this Earth's four quarters
show but four points afar; so, seem they to terrestrial eyes,
that broadly sweep the spheres.
And, as the sun, by influence divine, wheels through the
Ecliptic; threading Cancer, Leo, Pisces, and Aquarius; so,
by some mystic impulse am I moved, to this fleet progress,
through the groups in white-reefed Mardi's zone.
Oh, reader, list! I've chartless voyaged. With
compass
and the lead, we had not found these Mardian Isles.
Those who boldly launch, cast off all cables; and turning
from the common breeze, that's fair for all, with their own
breath, fill their own sails. Hug the shore, naught new is
seen; and Land ho! at last was sung, when a new
world was sought.
That voyager steered his bark through seas, untracked
before; ploughed his own path mid jeers; though with a
heart that oft was heavy with the thought, that he might
only be too bold, and grope where land was none.
So I.
And though essaying but a sportive sail, I was driven
from my course, by a blast resistless; and ill-provided,
young, and bowed to the brunt of things before my prime,
still fly before the gale;hard have I striven to keep stout
heart.
And if it harder be, than e'er before, to find new climes,
when now our seas have oft been circled by ten thousand
prows,much more the glory!
But this new world here sought, is stranger far than his,
who stretched his vans from Palos. It is the world of
mind; wherein the wanderer may gaze round, with more
of wonder than Balboa's band roving through the golden
Aztec glades.
But fiery yearnings their own phantom-future make, and
deem it present. So, if after all these fearful, fainting
trances, the verdict be, the golden haven was not gained;
yet, in bold quest thereof, better to sink in boundless deeps,
that float on vulgar shoals; and give me, ye gods, an utter
wreck, if wreck I do.
M*
CHAPTER LXVI.
A FLIGHT OF NIGHTINGALES FROM YOOMY'S MOUTH.
By
noon, down came a calm.
Oh Neeva! good Neeva! kind Neeva! thy sweet breath,
dear Neeva!
So from his shark's-mouth prayed little Vee-Vee to the
god of Fair Breezes. And along they swept; till the three
prows neighed to the blast; and pranced on their path, like
steeds of Crusaders.
Now, that this fine wind had sprung up; the sun riding
joyously in the heavens; and the Lagoon all tossed with
white, flying manes; Media called upon Yoomy to ransack
his whole assortment of songs:warlike, amorous, and
sentimental,and regale us with something inspiring; for
too long the company had been gloomy.
Thy best, he cried.
Then will I e'en sing you a song, my lord, which is a
song-full of songs. I composed it long, long since, when
Yillah yet bowered in Odo. Ere now, some fragments
have been heard. Ah, Taji! in this my lay, live over
again your happy hours. Some joys have thousand lives;
can never die; for when they droop, sweet memories bind
them up.My lord, I deem these verses good; they came
bubbling out of me, like live waters from a spring in a
silver mine. And by your good leave, my lord, I have
much faith in inspiration. Whoso sings is a seer.
Tingling is the test, said Babbalanja, Yoomy, did
you tingle, when that song was composing?
All over, Babbalanja.
From sole to crown?
From finger to finger.
My life for it! true poetry, then, my lord! For this
self-same tingling, I say, is the test.
And infused into a song, cried Yoomy, it evermore
causes it so to sparkle, vivify, and irradiate, that no son of
man can repeat it without tingling himself. This very
song of mine may prove what I say.
Modest youth! sighed Media.
Not more so, than sincere, said Babbalanja. He
who is frank, will often appear vain, my lord. Having no
guile, he speaks as freely of himself, as of another; and is
just as ready to honor his own merits, even if imaginary,
as to lament over undeniable deficiencies. Besides, such
men are prone to moods, which to shallow-minded,
unsympathizing
mortals, make their occasional distrust of
themselves
,
appear but as a phase of self-conceit. Whereas, the
man who, in the presence of his very friends, parades a
barred and bolted front,that man so highly prizes his
sweet self, that he cares not to profane the shrine he
worships
,
by throwing open its portals. He is locked up; and
Ego is the key. Reserve alone is vanity. But all
mankind
are egotists. The world revolves upon an I; and we
upon ourselves; for we are our own worlds:all other
men as strangers, from outlandish, distant climes, going
clad in furs. Then, whate'er they be, let us show
our worlds; and not seek to hide from men, what Oro
knows.
Truth, my lord, said Yoomy, but all this applies to
men in mass; not specially, to my poor craft. Of all
mortals
,
we poets are most subject to contrary moods. Now,
heaven over heaven in the skies; now layer under layer in
the dust. This, the penalty we pay for being what we are.
But Mardi only sees, or thinks it sees, the tokens of our
self-complacency
:
whereas, all our agonies operate unseen.
Poets are only seen when they soar.
The song! the song! cried Media. Never mind
the metaphysics of genius.
And Yoomy, thus clamorously invoked, hemmed thrice,
tuning his voice for the air.
But here, be it said, that the minstrel was miraculously
gifted with three voices; and, upon occasions, like a
mocking-bird
,
was a concert of sweet sounds in himself. Had
kind friends died, and bequeathed him their voices? But
hark! in a low, mild tenor, he begins:
Half-vailed above the hills, yet rosy bright,
Stands fresh, and fair, the meek and blushing morn!
So Yillah looks! her pensive eyes the stars,
That mildly beam from out her cheek's young dawn!
But the still meek Dawn,
Is not aye the form
Of Yillah nor Morn!
Soon rises the sun,
Day's race to run:
His rays abroad,
Flash each a sword,
And merrily forth they flare!
Sun-music in the air!
So Yillah now rises and flashes!
Rays shooting from out her long lashes,
Sun-music in the air!
Her laugh! How it bounds!
Bright cascade of sounds!
Peal after peal, and ringing afar,
Ringing of waters, that silvery jar,
From basin to basin fast falling!
Fast falling, and shining, and streaming:
Yillah's bosom, the soft, heaving lake,
Where her laughs at last dimple, and flake!
Oh, beautiful Yillah! Thy step so free!
Fast fly the sea-ripples,
Revealing their dimples,
When forth, thou hi'st to the frolicsome sea!
All the stars laugh,
When upward she looks:
All the trees chat
In their woody nooks:
All the brooks sing;
All the caves ring;
All the buds blossom;
All the boughs bound;
All the birds carol;
And leaves turn round,
Where Yillah looks!
Light wells from her soul's deep sun
Causing many toward her to run!
Vines to climb, and flowers to spring;
And youths their love by hundreds bring!
Proceed, gentle Yoomy, said Babbalanja.
The meaning, said Mohi.
The sequel, said Media.
My lord, I have ceased in the middle; the end is not yet.
Mysticism! cried Babbalanja. What, minstrel;
must nothing ultimate come of all that melody? no final
and inexhaustible meaning? nothing that strikes down into
the soul's depths; till, intent upon itself, it pierces in upon
its own essence, and is resolved into its pervading original;
becoming a thing constituent of the all embracing deific;
whereby we mortals become part and parcel of the gods;
our souls to them as thoughts; and we privy to all things
occult, ineffable, and sublime? Then, Yoomy, is thy song
nothing worth. Alla Mollolla saith, `That is no true, vital
breath, which leaves no moisture behind.' I mistrust thee,
minstrel! that thou hast not yet been impregnated by the
arcane mysteries; that thou dost not sufficiently ponder on
the Adyta, the Monads, and the Hyparxes; the Dianoias,
the Unical Hypostases, the Gnostic powers of the
Psychical
Essence, and the Supermundane and Pleromatic Triads;
to say nothing of the Abstract Noumenons.
Oro forbid! cried Yoomy; the very sound of thy
words affrights me. Then, whispering to MohiIs he
daft again?
My brain is battered, said Media. Azzageddi! you
must diet, and be bled.
Ah! sighed Babbalanja, turning; how little they
ween of the Rudimental Quincunxes, and the Hecatic
Spherula!
CHAPTER LXVII.
THEY VISIT ONE DOXODOX.
Next
morning, we came to a deep, green wood, slowly
nodding over the waves; its margin frothy-white with foam.
A charming sight!
While delighted, all our paddlers gazed, Media,
observing
Babbalanja plunged in reveries, called upon him to
awake; asking what might so absorb him.
Ah, my lord! what seraphic sounds have ye driven from
me!
Sounds! Sure, there's naught heard but yonder
murmuring
surf; what other sound heard you?
The thrilling of my soul's monochord, my lord. But
prick not your ears to hear it; that divine harmony is
overheard
by the rapt spirit alone; it comes not by the auditory
nerves.
No more, Azzageddi! No more of that. Look yonder!
A most lovely wood, in truth. And methinks it is here
the sage Doxodox, surnamed the Wise One, dwells.
Hark, I hear the hootings of his owls, said Mohi.
My lord, you must have read of him. He is said to
have penetrated from the zoned, to the unzoned principles.
Shall we seek him out, that we may hearken to his wisdom?
Doubtless he knows many things, after which we pant.
The lagoon was calm, as we landed; not a breath stirred
the plumes of the trees; and as we entered the voiceless
shades, lifting his hand, Babbalanja whispered:This
silence is a fit introduction to the portals of Telestic lore.
Somewhere, beneath this moss, lurks the mystic stone
Mnizuris; whereby Doxodox hath attained unto a knowledge
of the ungenerated essences. Nightly, he bathes his soul in
archangelical circumlucencies. Oh, Doxodox! whip me the
Strophalunian top! Tell o'er thy Jynges!
Down, Azzageddi! down! cried Media. Behold:
there sits the Wise One; now, for true wisdom!
From the voices of the party, the sage must have been
aware of our approach: but seated on a green bank, beneath
the shade of a red mulberry, upon the boughs of which, many
an owl was perched, he seemed intent upon describing divers
figures in the air, with a jet-black wand.
Advancing with much deference and humility, Babbalanja
saluted him.
Oh wise Doxodox! Drawn hither by thy illustrious
name, we seek admittance to thy innermost wisdom. Of
all Mardians, thou alone comprehendest those arcane
combinations
,
whereby to drag to day the most deftly hidden
things, present and to come. Thou knowest what we are,
and what we shall be. We beseech thee, evoke thy
Tselmns!
Tetrads; Pentads; Hexads; Heptads; Ogdoads:
meanest thou those?
New terms all!
Foiled at thy own weapons, said Media.
Then, if thou comprehendest not my nomenclature:
how my science? But let me test thee in the portico.
Why is it, that as some things extend more remotely than
others; so, Quadammodotatives are larger than Qualitatives;
forasmuch, as Quadammodotatives extend to those things,
which include the Quadammodotatives themselves.
Azzageddi has found his match, said Media.
Still posed, Babbalanja? asked Mohi.
At a loss, most truly! But I beseech thee, wise
Doxodox
!
instruct me in thy dialectics, that I may embrace thy
more recondite lore.
To begin then, my child:all Dicibles reside in the
mind.
But what are Dicibles? said Media.
Meanest thou, Perfect or Imperfect Dicibles?
Any kind you please;but what are they?
Perfect Dicibles are of various sorts: Interrogative;
Percontative; Adjurative; Optative; Imprecative;
Execrative
;
Substitutive; Compellative; Hypothetical; and
lastly, Dubious.
Dubious enough! Azzageddi! forever, hereafter, hold
thy peace.
Ah, my children! I must go back to my Axioms.
And what are they? said old Mohi.
Of various sorts; which, again, are diverse. Thus:
my contrary axioms are Disjunctive, and Subdisjunctive;
and so, with the rest. So, too, in degree, with my
Syllogisms
.
And what of them?
Did I not just hint what they were, my child? I
repeat, they are of various sorts: Connex, and Conjunct,
for example.
And what of them? persisted Mohi; while
Babbalanja
,
arms folded, stood serious and mute; a sneer on his
lip.
As with other branches of my dialectics: so, too, in their
way, with my Syllogisms. Thus: when I say,If it be
warm, it is not cold:that's a simple Sumption. If I add,
But it
is
warm:that's an
Ass
umption.
So called from the syllogist himself, doubtless; said
Mohi, stroking his beard.
Poor ignorant babe! no. Listen:if finally, I say,
Therefore it is not cold:that's the final inference.
And a most triumphant one it is! cried Babbalanja.
Thrice profound, and sapient Doxodox! Light of Mardi!
and Beacon of the Universe! didst ever hear of the
Shark-Syllogism
?
Though thy epithets be true, my child, I distrust thy
sincerity. I have not yet heard of the syllogism to which
thou referrest.
It was thus. A shark seized a swimmer by the leg;
addressing him: `Friend, I will liberate you, if you truly
answer whether you think I purpose harm.' Well knowing
that sharks seldom were magnanimous, he replied:`Kind
sir, you mean me harm; now go your ways.' `No, no; my
conscience forbids. Nor will I falsify the words of so
veracious
a mortal. You were to answer truly; but you say I
mean you harm:so harm it is:here goes your leg.'
Profane jester! Would'st thou insult me with thy
tomfoolery
?
Begoneall of ye! tramp! pack! I say: away
with ye! and into the woods Doxodox himself disappeared.
Bravely done, Babbalanja! cried Media. You turned
the corner to admiration.
I have hopes of our Philosopher yet, said Mohi.
Outrageous impostor! fool, dotard, oaf! Did he think
to bejuggle me with his preposterous gibberish? And is this
shallow phraseman the renowned Doxodox whom I have been
taught so highly to reverence? Alas, alasOdonphi there
is none!
His fit again, sighed Yoomy.
CHAPTER LXVIII.
KING MEDIA DREAMS.
That
afternoon was melting down to eve; all but Media
broad awake; yet all motionless, as the slumberer upon the
purple mat. Sailing on, with open eyes, we slept the
wakeful
sleep of those, who to the body only give repose, while
the spirit still toils on, threading her mountain passes.
King Media's slumbers were like the helmed sentry's in
the saddle. From them, he started like an antlered deer,
bursting from out a copse. Some said he never slept; that
deep within himself he but intensified the hour; or, leaving
his crowned brow in marble quiet, unseen, departed to
faroff
councils of the gods. Howbeit, his lids never closed; in
the noonday sun, those crystal eyes, like diamonds, sparkled
with a fixed light.
As motionless we thus reclined, Media turned and
muttered
:Brother
gods, and demi-gods, it is not well. These
mortals should have less or more. Among my subjects is a
man, whose genius scorns the common theories of things;
but whose still mortal mind can not fathom the ocean at his
feet. His soul's a hollow, wherein he raves.
List, list, whispered Yoomyour lord is dreaming;
and what a royal dream.
A very royal and imperial dream, said Babbalanja
he is arraigning me before high heaven;ay, ay; in
dreams, at least, he deems himself a demi-god.
Hist, said Mohihe speaks again.
Gods and demi-gods! With one gesture all abysses we
may disclose; and before this Mardi's eyes, evoke the
shrouded time to come. Were this well? Like lost
children
groping in the woods, they falter through their tangled
paths; and at a thousand angles, baffled, start upon each
other. And even when they make an onward move, 'tis
but an endless vestibule, that leads to naught. In my own
isle of OdoOdo! Odo! How rules my viceroy there?
Down, down, ye madding mobs! Ho, spearmen, charge!
By the firmament, but my halberdiers fly!
His dream has changed, said Babbalanja. He is in
Odo, whither his anxieties impel him.
Hist, hist, said Yoomy.
I leap upon the soil! Render thy account, Almanni!
Where's my throne? Mohi, am I not a king? Do not thy
chronicles record me? Yoomy, am I not the soul of some
one glorious song? Babbalanja, speakMohi! Yoomy!
What is it, my lord? thou dost but dream.
Staring wildly; then calmly gazing round, Media smiled.
Ha! how we royalties ramble in our dreams! I've told
no secrets?
While he seemed to sleep, my lord spoke much, said
Mohi.
I knew it not, old man; nor would now; but that ye
tell me.
We dream not ourselves, said Babbalanja, but the
thing within us.
Ay?good-morrow Azzageddi!But come; no more
dreams:Vee-Vee! wine.
And straight through that livelong night, immortal Media
plied the can.
CHAPTER LXIX.
AFTER A LONG INTERVAL, BY NIGHT THEY ARE BECALMED.
Now
suns rose, and set; moons grew, and waned; till,
at last, the star that erewhile heralded the dawn, presaged
the eve; to us, sad token!while deep within the deepest
heart of Mardi's circle, we sailed from sea to sea; and isle
to isle; and group to group;vast empires explored, and
inland valleys, to their utmost heads; and for every ray in
heaven, beheld a king.
Needless to recount all that then befell; what tribes and
caravans we saw; what vast horizons; boundless plains;
and sierras, in their every intervale, a nation nestling.
Enough that still we roamed.
It was evening; and as the red sun, magnified, launched
into the wave, once more, from a wild strand, we launched
our three canoes.
Soon, from her clouds, hooded Night, like a nun from a
convent, drew nigh. Rustled her train, yet no spangles
were there. But high on her brow, still shone her pale
crescent; haloed by bandeletsviolet, red, and yellow. So
looked the lone watcher through her rainbow-iris; so sad,
the night without stars.
The winds were laid; the lagoon, still, as a prairie of an
August noon.
Let us dream out the calm, said Media. One of ye
paddlers, watch: Ho companions! who's for Cathay?
Sleep reigned throughout the canoes, sleeping upon the
waters. But nearer and nearer, low-creeping along, came
mists and vapors, a thousand; spotted with twinklings of
Will-o-Wisps from neighboring shores. Dusky leopards,
stealing on by crouches, those vapors seemed.
Hours silently passed. When startled by a cry, Taji
sprang to his feet; against which something rattled; then, a
quick splash! and a dark form bounded into the lagoon.
The dozing watcher had called aloud; and, about to stab,
the assassin, dropping his stiletto, plunged.
Peering hard through those treacherous mists, two figures
in a shallop, were espied; dragging another, dripping, from
the brine.
Foiled again, and foiled forever. No foe's corpse
was I.
As we gazed, in the gloom quickly vanished the shallop;
ere ours could be reversed to pursue.
Then, from the opposite mists, glided a second canoe;
and beneath the Iris round the moon, shone now another:
Hautia's flowery flag!
Vain to wave the sirens off; so still they came.
One waved a plant of sickly silver-green.
The Midnight Tremmella! cried Yoomy; the
falling-star
of flowers!Still I come, when least foreseen;
then, flee.
The second waved a hemlock top, the spike just tapering
to its final point. The third, a convolvulus, half closed.
The end draws nigh, and all thy hopes are waning.
Then they proffered grapes.
But once more waved off, silently they vanished.
Again the buried barb tore at my soul; again Yillah
was invoked, but Hautia made reply.
Slowly wore out the night. But when uprose the sun,
fled clouds, and fled sadness.
CHAPTER LXX.
THEY LAND AT HOOLOOMOOLOO.
Keep
all three prows, for yonder rock. cried Media;
No sadness on this merry morn! And now for the Isle
of Cripples,even Hooloomooloo.
The Isle of Cripples?
Ay; why not? Mohi, tell how they came to club.
In substance, this was the narration.
Averse to the barbarous custom of destroying at birth all
infants not symmetrically formed; but equally desirous of
removing from their sight those unfortunate beings; the
islanders of a neighboring group had long ago established an
asylum for cripples; where they lived, subject to their own
regulations; ruled by a king of their own election; in short,
forming a distinct class of beings by themselves.
One only restriction was placed upon them: on no
account
must they quit the isle assigned them. And to the
surrounding islanders, so unpleasant the sight of a distorted
mortal, that a stranger landing at Hooloomooloo, was deemed
a prodigy. Wherefore, respecting any knowledge of aught
beyond them, the cripples were well nigh as isolated, as if
Hooloomooloo was the only terra-firma extant.
Dwelling in a community of their own, these unfortunates,
who otherwise had remained few in number, increased and
multiplied greatly. Nor did successive generations improve
in symmetry upon those preceding them.
Soon, we drew nigh to the isle.
Heaped up, and jagged with rocks; and, here and there,
covered with dwarfed, twisted thickets, it seemed a fit place
for its denizens.
Landing, we were surrounded by a heterogeneous mob;
and thus escorted, took our way inland, toward the abode
of their lord, King Yoky.
What a scene!
Here, helping himself along with two crotched roots,
hobbled
a dwarf without legs; another stalked before, one arm
fixed in the air, like a lightning rod; a third, more active
than any, seal-like, flirted a pair of flippers, and went
skipping
along; a fourth hopped on a solitary pin, at every
bound, spinning round like a top, to gaze; while still another,
furnished with feelers or fins, rolled himself up in a ball,
bowling over the ground in advance.
With curious instinct, the blind stuck close to our side;
with their chattering fingers, the deaf and the dumb described
angles, obtuse and acute in the air; and like stones rolling
down rocky ravines, scores of stammerers stuttered.
Discord
wedded deformity. All asses' brays were now
harmonious
memories; all Calibans, as angels.
Yet for every stare we gave them, three stares they gave us.
At last, we halted before a tenement of rude stones;
crooked Banian boughs its rafters, thatched with fantastic
leaves. So rambling and irregular its plan, it seemed thrown
up by the eruption, according to sage Mohi, the origin of the
isle itself.
Entering, we saw King Yoky.
Ah! sadly lacking was he, in all the requisites of an
efficient ruler. Deaf and dumb he was; and save arms,
minus every thing but an indispensable trunk and head. So
huge his all-comprehensive mouth, it seemed to swallow up
itself.
But shapeless, helpless as was Yoky,as king of
Hooloomooloo
,
he was competent; the state being a limited
monarchy
,
of which his Highness was but the passive and
ornamental
head.
As his visitors advanced, he fell to gossiping with his
fingers: a servitor interpreting. Very curious to note the
rapidity with which motion was translated into sound; and
the simultaneousness with which meaning made its way
through four successive channels to the mindhand, sight,
voice, and tympanum.
Much amazement His Highness now expressed; horrified
his glances.
Why club such frights as ye? Herd ye, to keep in
countenance; or are afraid of your own hideousness, that
ye dread to go alone? Monsters! speak.
Great Oro! cried Mohi, are we then taken for
cripples
,
by the very King of the Cripples? My lord, are not
our legs and arms all right?
Comelier ones were never turned by turners, Mohi.
But royal Yoky! in sooth we feel abashed before thee.
Some further stares were then exchanged; when His
Highness sought to know, whether there were any
Comparative
Anatomists among his visitors.
Comparative Anatomists! not one.
And why may King Yoky ask that question? inquired
Babbalanja.
Then was made the following statement.
During the latter part of his reign, when he seemed fallen
into his dotage, the venerable predecessor of King Yoky had
been much attached to an old gray-headed Chimpanzee,
one day found meditating in the woods. Rozoko was his
name. He was very grave, and reverend of aspect; much
of a philosopher. To him, all gnarled and knotty subjects
were familiar; in his day he had cracked many a crabbed
nut. And so in love with his Timonean solitude was
Rozoko
,
that it needed many bribes and bland persuasions, to
induce him to desert his mossy, hillside, misanthropic cave,
for the distrating tumult of a court.
But ere long, promoted to high offices, and made the
royal favorite, the woodland sage forgot his forests; and,
love for love, returned the aged king's caresses. Ardent
friends they straight became; dined and drank together;
vol. ii.N
with quivering lips, quaffed long-drawn, sober bumpers;
comparing all their past experiences; and canvassing those
hidden themes, on which octogenarians dilate.
For when the fires and broils of youth are passed, and
Mardi wears its truer aspectthen we love to think, not
act; the present seems more unsubstantial than the past;
then, we seek out gray-beards like ourselves; and hold
discourse
of palsies, hearses, shrouds, and tombs; appoint our
undertakers; our mantles gather round us, like to
winding-sheets
;
and every night lie down to die. Then, the world's
great bubble bursts; then, Life's clouds seem sweeping by,
revealing heaven to our straining eyes; then, we tell our
beads, and murmur pater-nosters; and in trembling accents
cryOro! be merciful.
So, the monarch and Rozoko.
But not always were they thus. Of bright, cheerful
mornings, they took slow, tottering rambles in the woods;
nodding over grotesque walking-sticks, of the Chimpanzee's
handiwork. For sedate Rozoko was a dilletante-arborist: an
amateur in canes. Indeed, canes at last became his hobby.
For half daft with age, sometimes he straddled his good staff
and gently rode abroad, to take the salubrious evening air;
deeming it more befitting exercise, at times, than walking.
Into this menage, he soon initiated his friend, the king; and
side by side they often pranced; or, wearying of the saddle,
dismounted, and paused to ponder over prostrate palms,
decaying
across the path. Their mystic rings they counted;
and for every ring, a year in their own calendars.
Now, so closely did the monarch cleave to the
Chimpanzee
,
that, in good time, summoning his subjects,
earnestly
he charged it on them, that at death, he and his
faithful
friend should be buried in one tomb.
It came to pass, the monarch died; and Poor Rozoko,
now reduced to second childhood, wailed most dismally:
no one slept that night in Hooloomooloo. Never did
he leave the body; and at last, slowly going round it
thrice, he laid him down; close nestled; and noiselessly
expired.
The king's injunctions were remembered; and one vault
received them both.
Moon followed moon; and wrought upon by jeers and
taunts, the people of the isle became greatly scandalized, that
a base-born baboon should share the shroud of their
departed
lord; though they themselves had tucked in the aged
Eneas fast by the side of his Achates.
They straight resolved, to build another vault; and over
it, a lofty cairn; and thither carry the remains they
reverenced
.
But at the disinterring, a sad perplexity arose. For lo!
surpassing Saul and Jonathan, not even in decay were these
fast friends divided. So mingled every relic,ilium and
ulna, carpus and metacarpus;and so similar the
corresponding
parts, that like the literary remains of Beaumont
and of Fletcher, which was which, no spectacles could tell.
Therefore, they desisted; lest the towering monument they
had reared, might commemorate an ape, and not a king.
Such the narration; hearing which, my lord Media kept
stately silence. But in courtly phrase, as beseemed him,
Babbalanja, turban in hand, thus spoke:
My concern is extreme, King Yoky, at the
embarrassment
into which your island is thrown. Nor less my grief,
that I myself am not the man, to put an end to it. I could
weep that Comparative Anatomists are not so numerous
now, as hereafter they assuredly must become; when their
services shall be in greater request; when, at the last, last
day of all, millions of noble and ignoble spirits will loudly
clamor for lost skeletons; when contending claimants shall
start up for one poor, carious spine; and, dog-like, we shall
quarrel over our own bones.
Then entered dwarf-stewards, and major-domos; aloft
bearing twisted antlers; all hollowed out in goblets, grouped;
announcing dinner.
Loving not, however, to dine with misshapen Mardians,
King Media was loth to move. But Babbalanja, quoting
the old proverbStrike me in the face, but refuse not my
yams, induced him to sacrifice his fastidiousness.
So, under a flourish of ram-horn bugles, court and
company
proceeded to the banquet.
Central was a long, dislocated trunk of a wild Banian;
like a huge centipede crawling on its hundred branches,
sawn of even lengths for legs. This table was set out with
wry-necked gourds; deformities of calabashes; and
shapeless
trenchers, dug out of knotty woods.
The first course was shrimp-soup, served in great
clampshells
;
the second, lobsters, cuttle-fish, crabs, cockles,
crayfish
;
the third, hunchbacked roots of the Taro-plant
plantains
,
perversely curling at the end, like the inveterate tails
of pertinacious pigs; and for dessert, ill-shaped melons, huge
as idiots' heads, plainly suffering from water in the brain.
Now these viands were commended to the favorable notice
of all guests; not only for their delicacy of flavor, but for
their symmetry.
And in the intervals of the courses, we were bored with
hints to admire numerous objects of vertu: bow-legged stools
of mangrove wood; zig-zag rapiers of bone; armlets of
grampus-vertebr; outlandish tureens of the callipees of
terrapin; and cannakins of the skulls of baboons.
The banquet over, with many congees, we withdrew.
Returning to the water-side, we passed a field, where
dwarfs were laboring in beds of yams, heaping the soil
around the roots, by scartching it backward; as a dog.
All things in readiness, Yoky's valet, a tri-armed dwarf,
treated us to a glorious start, by giving each canoe a
vigorous
triple-push, crying, away with ye, monsters!
Nor must it be omitted that just previous to embarking,
Vee-Vee, spying a curious looking stone, turned it over, and
found a snake.
CHAPTER LXXI.
A BOOK FROM THE PONDERINGS OF OLD BARDIANNA.
Now
, said Babbalanja, lighting his trombone as we
sailed from the isle, who are the monsters, we or the
cripples?
You yourself are a monster, for asking the question,
said Mohi.
And so, to the cripples I am; though not, old man, for
the reason you mention. But I am, as I am; whether
hideous, or handsome, depends upon who is made judge.
There is no supreme standard yet revealed, whereby to judge
of ourselves; `Our very instincts are prejudices,' saith Alla
Mallolla; `Our very axioms, and postulates are far from
infallible.' `In respect of the universe, mankind is but
a sect,' saith Diloro: `and first principles but dogmas.'
What ethics prevail in the Pleiades? What things have
the synods in Sagittarius decreed?
Never mind your old authors, said Media. Stick to
the cripples; enlarge upon them.
But I have done with them now, my lord; the sermon
is not the text. Give ear to old Bardianna. I know him
by heart. Thus saith the sage in Book X. of the
Ponderings
,
`Zermalmende,' the title: `Je pense,' the motto:
`My supremacy over creation, boasteth man, is declared in
my natural attitude:I stand erect! But so do the
palm-trees
;
and the giraffes that graze off their tops. And the
fowls of the air fly high over our heads; and from the place
where we fancy our heaven to be, defile the tops of our
temples. Belike, the eagles, from their eyries look down
upon us Mardians, in our hives, even as upon the beavers in
their dams, marveling at our incomprehensible ways. And
cunning though we be, some things, hidden from us, may
not be mysteries to them. Having five keys, hold we all
that open to knowledge? Deaf, blind, and deprived of the
power of scent, the bat will steer its way unerringly:
could we? Yet man is lord of the bat and the brute; lord
over the crows; with whom, he must needs share the grain
he garners. We sweat for the fowls, as well as ourselves.
The curse of labor rests only on us. Like slaves, we toil:
at their good leisure they glean.
`Mardi is not wholly ours. We are the least populous
part of creation. To say nothing of other tribes, a census
of the herring would find us far in the minority. And what
life is to us,sour or sweet,so is it to them. Like us,
they die, fighting death to the last; like us, they spawn and
depart. We inhabit but a crust, rough surfaces, odds and
ends of the isles; the abounding lagoon being its two-thirds,
its grand feature from afar; and forever unfathomable.
`What shaft has yet been sunk to the antipodes? What
underlieth the gold mines?
`But even here, above-ground, we grope with the sun at
meridian. Vainly, we seek our Northwest Passages,old
alleys, and thoroughfares of the whales.
`Oh men! fellow men! we are only what we are; not
what we would be; nor every thing we hope for. We are
but a step in a scale, that reaches further above us than
below. We breathe but oxygen. Who in Arcturus hath
heard of us? They know us not in the Milky Way. We
prate of faculties divine: and know not how sprouteth a
spear of grass; we go about shrugging our shoulders: when
the firmament-arch is over us; we rant of etherealities: and
long tarry over our banquets; we demand Eternity for a
lifetime: when our mortal half-hours too often prove tedious.
We know not of what we talk. The Bird of Paradise
outflies
our flutterings. What it is to be immortal, has not
yet entered into our thoughts. At will, we build our
futurities
;
tier above tier, all galleries full of laureates:
resounding
with everlasting oratorios! Pater-nosters forever, or
eternal Misereres! forgetting that in Mardi, our breviaries
oft fall from our hands. But divans there are, some say,
whereon we shall recline, basking in effulgent suns, knowing
neither Orient nor Occident. Is it so? Fellow men! our
mortal lives have an end; but that end is no goal: no
place of repose. Whatever it may be, it will prove but as
the beginning of another race. We will hope, joy, weep,
as before; though our tears may be such as the spice-trees
shed. Supine we can only be, annihilated.
`The thick film is breaking; the ages have long been
circling. Fellow-men! if we live hereafter, it will not be
in lyrics; nor shall we yawn, and our shadows lengthen,
while the eternal cycles are revolving. To live at all, is a
high vocation; to live forever, and run parallel with Oro,
may truly appall us. Toil we not here? and shall we be
forever slothful elsewhere? Other worlds differ not much
from this, but in degree. Doubtless, a pebble is a fair
specimen of the universe.
`We point at random. Peradventure at this instant,
there are beings gazing up to this very world as their future
heaven. But the universe is all over a heaven: nothing
but stars on stars, throughout infinities of expansion. All
we see are but a cluster. Could we get to Bootes, we
would be no nearer Oro, than now; he hath no place; but
is here. Already, in its unimaginable roamings, our system
may have dragged us through and through the spaces,
where we plant cities of beryl and jasper. Even now, we
may be inhaling the ether, which we fancy seraphic wings
are fanning. But look round. There is much to be seen
here, and now. Do the archangels survey aught more
glorious than the constellations we nightly behold?
Continually
we slight the wonders, we deem in reserve. We
await the present. With marvels we are glutted, till we
hold them no marvels at all. But had these eyes first
opened upon all the prodigies in the Revelation of the
Dreamer, long familiarity would have made them appear,
even as these things we see. Now,
now
, the page is
outspread
:
to the simple, easy as a primer; to the wise, more
puzzling than hieroglyphics. The eternity to come, is but
a prolongation of time present: and the beginning may be
more wonderful than the end.
`Then let us be wise. But much of the knowledge we
seek, already we have in our cores. Yet so simple it is, we
despise it; so bold, we fear it.
`In solitude, let us exhume our ingots. Let us hear our
own thoughts. The soul needs no mentor, but Oro; and
Oro, without proxy. Wanting Him, it is both the teacher
and the taught. Undeniably, reason was the first
revelation
;
and so far as it tests all others, it has precedence over
them. It comes direct to us, without suppression or
interpolation
;
and with Oro's indisputable imprimatur. But
inspiration
though it be, it is not so arrogant as some think.
Nay, far too humble, at times it submits to the grossest
indignities
.
Though in its best estate, not infallible; so far
as it goes, for us, it is reliable. When at fault, it stands
still. We speak not of visionaries. But if this our first
revelation stops short of the uttermost, so with all others.
If, often, it only perplexes: much more the rest. They leave
much unexpounded; and disclosing new mysteries, add to
the enigma. Fellow-men; the ocean we would sound is
unfathomable; and however much we add to our line, when
it is out, we feel not the bottom. Let us be truly lowly,
then; not lifted up with a Pharisaic humility. We crawl not
like worms; nor wear we the liveries of angels.
`The firmament-arch has no key-stone; least of all, is
man its prop. He stands alone. We are every thing to
ourselves, but how little to others. What are others to us?
Assure life everlasting to this generation, and their
immediate
forefathers;and what tears would flow, were there
no resurrection for the countless generations from the first
man to five cycles since? And soon we ourselves shall
have fallen in with the rank and file of our sires. At a
blow, annihilate some distant tribe, now alive and jocund
and what would we reck? Curiosity apart, do we really
care whether the people in Bellatrix are immortal or no?
`Though they smite us, let us not turn away from these
things, if they be really thus.
`There was a time, when near Cassiopeia, a star of the
first magnitude, most lustrous in the North, grew lurid as a
fire, then dim as ashes, and went out. Now, its place is a
blank. A vast world, with all its continents, say the
astronomers
,
blazing over the heads of our fathers; while in Mardi
were merry-makings, and maidens given in marriage. Who
now thinks of that burning sphere? How few are aware
that ever it was?
`These things are so.
`Fellow-men! we must go, and obtain a glimpse of what
we are from the Belts of Jupiter and the Moons of Saturn,
ere we see ourselves aright. The universe can wax old
without us; though by Oro's grace we may live to behold a
wrinkle in the sky. Eternity is not ours by right; and,
alone, unrequited sufferings here, form no title thereto,
unless
resurrections are reserved for maltreated brutes.
Suffering
is suffering; be the sufferer man, brute, or thing.
`How small;how nothing, our deserts! Let us stifle
all vain speculations; we need not to be told what
righteousness
is; we were born with the whole Law in our hearts. Let
us do: let us act: let us down on our knees. And if, after
all, we should be no more forever;far better to perish
meriting immortality, than to enjoy it unmeritorious. While
we fight over creeds, ten thousand fingers point to where
vital good may be done. All round us, Want crawls to her
lairs; and, shivering, dies unrelieved. Here,
here
,
fellowmen
,
we can better minister as angels, than in heaven, where
want and misery come not.
N*
`We Mardians talk as though the future was all in all;
but act as though the present was every thing. Yet so far
as, in our theories, we dwarf our Mardi; we go not beyond
an archangel's apprehension of it, who takes in all suns and
systems at a glance. Like pebbles, were the isles to sink
in space, Sirius, the Dog-star, would still flame in the sky.
But as the atom to the animalculae, so Mardi to us. And
lived aright, these mortal lives are long; looked into, these
souls, fathomless as the nethermost depths.
`Fellow-men; we split upon hairs; but stripped, mere
words and phrases cast aside, the great bulk of us are
orthodox
.
None who think, dissent from the grand belief. The
first man's thoughts were as ours. The paramount
revelation
prevails with us; and all that clashes therewith, we do
not so much believe, as believe that we can not disbelieve.
Common sense is a sturdy despot; that, for the most part, has
its own way. It inspects and ratifies much independent of
it. But those who think they do wholly reject it, are but
held in a sly sort of bondage; under a semblance of
something
else, wearing the old yoke.'
Cease, cease, Babbalanja, said Media, and permit me
to insinuate a word in your ear. You have long been in the
habit, philosopher, of regaling us with chapters from your old
Bardianna; and with infinite gusto, you have just recited
the longest of all. But I do not observe, oh, Sage! that
for all these things, you yourself are practically the better
or wiser. You live not up to Bardianna's main thought.
Where he stands, he stands immovable; but you are a
Dog-vane. How is this?
Gogle-goggle, fugle-fi, fugle-fogle-orum!
Mad, mad again, cried Yoomy.
CHAPTER LXXII.
BABBALANJA STARTS TO HIS FEET.
For
twenty-four hours, seated stiff, and motionless,
Babbalanja
spoke not a word; then, almost without moving
a muscle, muttered thus:At banquets surfeit not, but
fill; partake, and retire; and eat not again till you crave.
Thereby you give nature time to work her magic
transformings
;
turning all solids to meat, and wine into blood.
After a banquet you incline to repose:do so: digestion
commands. All this follow those, who feast at the tables
of Wisdom; and all such are they, who partake of the fare
of old Bardianna.
Art resuscitated, then, Babbalanja? said Media.
Ay, my lord, I am just risen from the dead.
And did Azzageddi conduct you to their realms?
Fangs off! fangs off! depart, thou fiend!unhand me!
or by Oro, I will die and spite thee!
Quick, quick, Mohi! let us change places, cried
Yoomy.
How now, Babbalanja? said Media.
Oh my lord mannot
you
my lord Media!high and
mighty Puissance! great King of Creation!thou art but
the biggest of braggarts! In every age, thou boastest of thy
valorous advances:flat fools, old dotards, and numskulls,
our sires! All the Past, wasted time! the Present knows
all! right lucky, fellow-beings, we live now! every man an
author! books plenty as men! strike a light in a minute!
teeth sold by the pound! all the elements fetching and
carrying
!
lightning running on errands! rivers made to order!
the ocean a puddle!But ages back they boasted like us;
and ages to come, forever and ever, they'll boast. Ages
back they black-balled the past, thought the last day was
come; so wise they were grown. Mardi could not stand
long; have to annex one of the planets; invade the great
sun; colonize the moon;conquerors sighed for new Mardis;
and sages for heavenhaving by heart all the primers here
below. Like us, ages back they groaned under their books;
made bonfires of libraries, leaving ashes behind, mid which
we reverentially grope for charred pages, forgetting we are
so much wiser than they.But amazing times! astounding
revelations; preternatural divulgings!How now?more
wonderful than all our discoveries is this: that they never
were discovered before. So simple, no doubt our ancestors
overlooked them; intent on deeper thingsthe deep things
of the soul. All we discover has been with us since the
sun began to roll; and much we discover, is not worth the
discovering. We are children, climbing trees after birds'
nests, and making a great shout, whether we find eggs in
them or no. But where are our wings, which our
forefathers
surely had not? Tell us, ye sages! something
worth an archangel's learning; discover, ye discoverers,
something
new. Fools, fools! Mardi's not changed: the sun
yet rises in its old place in the East; all things go on in the
same old way; we cut our eye-teeth just as late as they did,
three thousand years ago.'
Your pardon, said Mohi, for beshrew me, they are
not yet all cut. At threescore and ten, here have I a new
tooth coming now.
Old man! it but clears the way for another. The
teeth sown by the alphabet-founder were eye-teeth, not yet
all sprung from the soil. Like spring-wheat, blade by blade,
they break ground late; like spring-wheat, many seeds have
perished in the hard winter glebe. Oh, my lord! though
we galvanize corpses into St. Vitus' dances, we raise not the
dead from their graves! Though we have discovered the
circulation of the blood, men die as of yore; oxen graze,
sheep bleat, babies bawl, asses brayloud and lusty as the
day before the flood. Men fight and make up; repent and
go at it; feast and starve; laugh and weep; pray and curse;
cheat, chaffer, trick, truckle, cozen, defraud, fib, lie, beg,
borrow, steal, hang, drownas in the laughing and weeping,
tricking and truckling, hanging and drowning times that have
been. Nothing changes, though much be new-fashioned:
new fashions but revivals of things previous. In the books
of the past we learn naught but of the present; in those
of the present, the past. All Mardi's historybeginning
middle, and finiswas written out in capitals in the first
page penned. The whole story is told in a title-page. An
exclamation point is entire Mardi's autobiography.
Who speaks now? said Media, Bardianna,
Azzageddi
,
or Babbalanja?
All three: is it not a pleasant concert?
Very fine: very fine.Go on; and tell us something
of the future.
I have never departed this life yet, my lord.
But just now you said you were risen from the dead.
From the buried dead within me; not from myself, my
lord.
If you, then, know nothing of the futuredid
Bardianna
?
If he did, naught did he reveal. I have ever observed,
my lord, that even in their deepest lucubrations, the
profoundest
,
frankest, ponderers always reserve a vast deal of
precious thought for their own private behoof. They think,
perhaps, that 'tis too good, or too bad; too wise, or too
foolish, for the multitude. And this unpleasant vibration is
ever consequent upon striking a new vein of ideas in the
soul. As with buried treasures, the ground over them
sounds strange and hollow. At any rate, the profoundest
ponderer seldom tells us all he thinks; seldom reveals to us
the ultimate, and the innermost; seldom makes us open our
eyes under water; seldom throws open the totus-in-toto; and
never carries us with him, to the unconsubsistent, the
ideaimmanens
,
the super-essential, and the One.
Confusion! Remember the Quadammodatatives!
Ah! said Braid-Beard, that's the crack in his
calabash, which all the Dicibles of Doxdox will not mend.
And from that crazy calabash he gives us to drink, old
Mohi.
But never heed his leaky gourd nor its contents, my
lord. Let these philosophers muddle themselves as they
will, we wise ones refuse to partake.
And fools like me drink till they reel, said Babbalanja.
But in these matters one's calabash must needs go round
to keep afloat. Fogle-orum!
CHAPTER LXXIII.
AT LAST, THE LAST MENTION IS MADE OF OLD BARDIANNA;
AND HIS LAST WILL AND TESTAMENT IS RECITED AT
LENGTH.
The
day was waning. And, as after many a tale of
ghosts, around their forest fire, Hungarian gipsies silent sit;
watching the ruddy glow kindling each other's faces;so,
now we solemn sat; the crimson West our fire; all our
faces flushed.
Testators! then cried Media, when your last wills
are all round settled, speak, and make it known!
Mine, my lord, has long been fixed, said Babbalanja.
And how runs it?
Fugle-fogle
Hark ye, intruding Azzageddi! rejoin thy merry mates
below;go there, and wag thy saucy tail; or I will nail
it to our bow, till ye roar for liberation. Begone, I say.
Down, devil! deeper down! rumbled Babbalanja.
My lord, I think he's gone. And now, by your good leave,
I'll repeat old Bardianna's Will. It's worth all Mardi's
hearing; and I have so studied it, by rote I know it.
Proceed then; but I mistrust that Azzageddi is not yet
many thousand fathoms down.
Attend my lord:`Anno Mardis 50,000,000, o. s.
I, Bardianna, of the island of Vamba, and village of the
same name, having just risen from my yams, in high health,
high spirits, and sound mind, do hereby cheerfully make and
ordain this my last will and testament.
`Imprimis:
`All my kith and kin being well to do in Mardi, I
wholly leave them out of this my will.
`Item. Since, in divers ways, verbally and otherwise,
my good friend Pondo has evinced a strong love for me,
Bardianna, as the owner and proprietor of all that
capital
messuage with the appurtenances, in Vamba aforesaid,
called `The Lair,' wherein I now dwell; also for all my
Bread-fruit orchards, Palm-groves, Banana-plantations,
Taro-patches
,
gardens, lawns, lanes, and hereditaments
whatsoever
,
adjoining the aforesaid messuage;I do hereby give
and bequeath the same to Bomblum of the island of Adda;
the aforesaid Bomblum having never expressed any regard
for me, as a holder of real estate.
`Item. My esteemed neighbor Lakreemo having since
the last lunar eclipse called daily to inquire after the state
of my health: and having nightly made tearful inquiries of
my herb-doctor, concerning the state of my viscera;I do
hereby give and bequeath to the aforesaid Lakreemo all and
sundry those vegetable pills, potions, powders, aperients,
purgatives, expellatives, evacuatives, tonics, emetics,
cathartics
,
clysters, injections, scarifiers, cataplasms, lenitives,
lotions, decoctions, washes, gargles, and phlegmagogues;
together
with all the jars, calabashes, gourds, and galipots,
thereunto pertaining; situate, lying, and being, in the
west-by-north
corner of my east-southeast crypt, in my aforesaid
tenement known as `The Lair.'
`Item. The woman Pesti; a native of Vamba, having
oftentimes hinted that I, Bardianna, sorely needed a spouse,
and having also intimated that she bore me a conjugal
affection; I do hereby give and bequeath to the aforesaid
Pesti:my blessing; forasmuch, as by the time of the
opening of this my last will and testament, I shall have
been forever delivered from the aforesaid Pesti's
persecutions
.
`Item. Having a high opinion of the probity of my
worthy and excellent friend Bidiri, I do hereby entirely, and
wholly, give, will, grant, bestow, devise, and utterly hand
over unto the said Bidiri, all that tenement where my
servant Oram now dwelleth; with all the lawns, meadows,
uplands and lowlands, fields, groves, and gardens, thereunto
belonging:
In Trust Nevertheless
to have and to hold
the same for the sole use and benefit of Lanbranka Hohinna,
spinster, now resident of the aforesaid island of Vamba.
`Item. I give and bequeath my large carved drinking
gourd to my good comrade Topo.
`Item. My fast friend Doldrum having at sundry
times, and in sundry places, uttered the prophecy, that upon
my decease his sorrow would be great; I do hereby give
and bequeath to the aforesaid Doldrum, ten yards of my best
soft tappa, to be divided into handkerchiefs for his sole
benefit and behoof.
`Item. My sensible friend Solo having informed me,
that he intended to remain a bachelor for life; I give and
devise to the aforesaid Solo, the mat for one person, whereon
I nightly repose.
`Item. Concerning my private Arbor and Palm-groves,
adjoining, lying, and being in the isle of Vamba, I give and
devise the same, with all appurtenances whatsoever, to my
friend Minta the Cynic, to have and to hold, in trust for the
first through-and-through honest man, issue of my neighbor
Mondi; and in default of such issue, for the first
through-and-through
honest man, issue of my neighbor Pendidda; and
in default of such issue, for the first through-and-through
honest man, issue of my neighbor Wynodo: and in default
of such issue, to any through-and-through honest man, issue
of any body, to be found through the length and breadth of
Mardi.
`Item. My friend Minta the Cynic to be sole judge of
all claims to the above-mentioned devise; and to hold the
said premises for his own use, until the aforesaid person be
found.
`Item. Knowing my devoted scribe Marko to be very
sensitive touching the receipt of a favor; I willingly spare
him that pain; and hereby bequeath unto the aforesaid
scribe, three milk-teeth, not as a pecuniary legacy, but as a
very slight token of my profound regard.
`Item. I give to the poor of Vamba the total contents
of my red-labeled bags of bicuspids and canines (which I
account three-fourths of my whole estate); to my body
servant Fidi, my staff, all my robes and togas, and three
hundred molars in cash; to that discerning and sagacious
philosopher my disciple Krako, one complete set of denticles,
to buy him a vertebral bone ring; and to that pious and
promising youth Vangi, two fathoms of my best kaiar rope,
with the privilege of any bough in my groves.
`All the rest of my goods, chattels and household stuff
whatsoever; and all my loose denticles, remaining after my
debts and legacies are paid, and my body is out of sight, I
hereby direct to be distributed among the poor of Vamba.
`Ultimo. I give and bequeath to all Mardi this my
last advice and counsel:videlicet: live as long as you
can; close your own eyes when you die.
`I have no previous wills to revoke; and publish this
to be my first and last.
`In witness whereof, I have hereunto set my right
hand; and hereunto have caused a true copy of the
tattooing
on my right temple to be affixed, during the year first
above written.
`By me,
Bardianna
.'
Babbalanja, that's an extraordinary document, said
Media.
Bardianna was an extraordinary man, my lord.
Were there no codicils?
The will is all codicils; all after-thoughts; Ten thoughts
for one act, was Bardianna's motto.
Left he nothing whatever to his kindred?
Not a stump.
From his will, he seems to have lived single.
Yes: Bardianna never sought to improve upon nature;
a bachelor he was born, and a bachelor he died.
According to the best accounts, how did he depart,
Babbalanja? asked Mohi.
With a firm lip, and his hand on his heart, old man.
His last words?
Calmer, and better!
Where think you, he is now?
In his Ponderings, And those, my lord, we all inherit;
for like the great chief of Romara, who made a whole
empire his legatee; so, great authors have all Mardi for an
heir.
CHAPTER LXXIV.
A DEATH-CLOUD SWEEPS BY THEM, AS THEY SAIL.
Next
day, a fearful sight!
As in Sooloo's seas, one vast water-spout will, sudden,
form: and whirling, chase the flying Malay keels; so, before
a swift-winged cloud, a thousand prows sped by, leaving
braided, foaming wakes; their crowded inmates' arms, in
frenzied supplications wreathed; like tangled forest-boughs.
See, see, cried Yoomy, how the Death-cloud flies!
Let us dive down in the sea.
Nay, said Babbalanja. All things come of Oro; if
we must drown, let Oro drown us.
Down sails: drop paddles, said Media: here we
float.
Like a rushing bison, sweeping by, the Death-cloud grazed
us with its foam; and whirling in upon the thousand prows
beyond, sudden burst in deluges; and scooping out a
maelstrom
,
dragged down every plank and soul.
Long we rocked upon the circling billows, which
expanding
from that center, dashed every isle, till, moons
afterward
,
faint, they laved all Mardi's reef.
Thanks unto Oro, murmured Mohi, this heart still
beats.
That sun-flushed eve, we sailed by many tranquil harbors,
whence fled those thousand prows. Serene, the waves ran
up their strands; and chimed around the unharmed stakes
of palm, to which the thousand prows that morning had
been fastened.
Flying death, they ran to meet it, said Babbalanja.
But 'tis not that they fled, they died; for maelstrms, of
these harbors, the Death-cloud might have made. But they
died, because they might not longer live. Could we gain
one glimpse of the great calendar of eternity, all our names
would there be found, glued against their dates of death. We
die by land, and die by sea; we die by earthquakes, famines,
plagues, and wars; by fevers, agues; woe, or mirth
excessive
.
This mortal air is one wide pestilence, that kills us
all at last. Whom the Death-cloud spares, sleeping, dies in
silent watches of the night. He whom the spears of many
battles could not slay, dies of a grape-stone, beneath the
vine-clad bower he built, to shade declining years. We die,
because we live. But none the less does Babbalanja quake.
And if he flies not, 'tis because he stands the center of a
circle; its every point a leveled dart; and every bow, bent
back:a twang, and Babbalanja dies.
CHAPTER LXXV.
THEY VISIT THE PALMY KING ABRAZZA.
Night
and morn departed; and in the afternoon, we
drew nigh to an island, overcast with shadows; a shower
was falling; and pining, plaintive notes forth issued from
the groves; half-suppressed, and sobbing whisperings of
leaves. The shore sloped to the water; thither our prows
were pointed.
Sheer off! no landing here, cried Media, let us gain
the sunny side; and like the care-free bachelor Abrazza,
who here is king, turn our back on the isle's shadowy side,
and revel in its morning-meads.
And lord Abrazza:who is he? asked Yoomy.
The one hundred and twentieth in lineal descent from
Phipora, said Mohi; and connected on the maternal side
to the lord seigniors of Klivonia. His uttermost uncle was
nephew to the niece of Queen Zmiglandi; who flourished
so long since, she wedded at the first Transit of Venus.
His pedigree is endless.
But who is lord Abrazza?
Has he not said? answered Babbalanja. Why so
dull?Uttermost nephew to him, who was nephew to the
niece of the peerless Queen Zmiglandi; and the one hundred
and twentieth in descent from the illustrious Phipora.
Will none tell, who Abrazza is?
Can not a man then, be described by running off the
catalogue of his ancestors? said Babbalanja. Or must
we e'en descend to himself. Then, listen, dull Yoomy!
and know that lord Abrazza is six feet two: plump thighs;
blue eyes; and brown hair; likes his bread-fruit baked, not
roasted; sometimes carries filberts in his crown: and has a
way of winking when he speaks. His teeth are good.
Are you publishing some decamped burglar, said Media,
that you speak thus of my royal friend, the lord Abrazza?
Go on, sir! and say he reigns sole king of Bonovona!
My lord, I had not ended. Abrazza, Yoomy, is a fine
and florid king: high-fed, and affluent of heart; of speech,
mellifluent. And for a royalty extremely amiable. He is
a sceptered gentleman, who does much good. Kind king!
in person he gives orders for relieving those, who daily dive
for pearls, to grace his royal robe; and gasping hard, with
blood-shot eyes, come up from shark-infested depths, and
fainting, lay their treasure at his feet. Sweet lord Abrazza!
how he pities those, who in his furthest woodlands day-long
toil to do his bidding. Yet king-philosopher, he never
weeps; but pities with a placid smile; and that but
seldom.
There seems much iron in your blood, said Media.
But say your say.
Say I not truth, my lord? Abrazza, I admire. Save
his royal pity all else is jocund round him. He loves to
live for life's own sake. He vows he'll have no cares; and
often says, in pleasant reveries,`Sure, my lord Abrazza,
if any one should be care-free, 'tis thou; who strike down
none, but pity all the fallen! Yet none he lifteth up.
At length we gained the sunny side, and shoreward
tended. Vee-Vee's horn was sonorous; and issuing from
his golden groves, my lord Abrazza, like a host that greets
you on the threshold, met us, as we keeled the beach.
Welcome! fellow demi-god, and king! Media, my
pleasant guest!
His servitors salamed; his chieftains bowed; his
yeoman-guard
,
in meadow-green, presented palm-stalks,royal
tokens; and hand in hand, the nodding, jovial, regal friends,
went up a lane of salutations; dragging behind, a train of
envyings.
Much we marked Abrazza's jeweled crown; that shot
no honest blaze of ruddy rubies; nor looked stern-white like
Media's pearls; but cast a green and yellow glare; rays
from emeralds, crossing rays from many a topaz. In those
beams, so sinister, all present looked cadaverous: Abrazza's
cheek alone beamed bright, but hectic.
Upon its fragrant mats a spacious hall received the kings;
and gathering courtiers blandly bowed; and gushing with
soft flatteries, breathed idol-incense round them.
The hall was terraced thrice; its elevated end was
curtained
;
and thence, at every chime of words, there burst a
girl, gay scarfed, with naked bosom, and poured forth wild
and hollow laughter, as she raced down all the terraces, and
passed their merry kingships.
Wide round the hall, in avenues, waved almond-woods;
their whiteness frosted into bloom. But every vine-clad
trunk was hollow-hearted; hollow sounds came from the
grottos: hollow broke the billows on the shore: and hollow
pauses filled the air, following the hollow laughter.
Guards, with spears, paced the groves, and in the inner
shadows, oft were seen to lift their weapons, and
backward
press some ugly phantom, saying, Subjects! haunt
him not; Abrazza would be merry; Abrazza feasts his
guests.
So, banished from our sight seemed all things uncongenial;
and pleasant times were ours, in these dominions. Not a
face passed by, but smiled; mocking-birds perched on the
boughs; and singing, made us vow the woods were warbling
forth thanksgiving, with a thousand throats! The stalwart
yeomen grinned beneath their trenchers, heaped with citrons
pomegrantes, grapes; the pages tittered, pouring out the
wine; and all the lords loud laughed, smote their gilded
spears, and swore the isle was glad.
Such the isle, in which we tarried; but in our rambles,
found no Yillah.
CHAPTER LXXVI.
SOME PLEASANT, SHADY TALK IN THE GROVES, BETWEEN
MY LORDS ABRAZZA AND MEDIA, BABBALANJA, MOHI, AND
YOOMY.
Abrazza
had a cool retreata grove of dates; where
we were used to lounge of noons, and mix our converse with
the babble of the rills; and mix our punches in goblets
chased with grapes. And as ever, King Abrazza was the
prince of hosts.
Your crown, he said to Media; and with his own, he
hung it on a bough.
Be not ceremonious: and stretched his royal legs upon
the turf.
Wine! and his pages poured it out.
So on the grass we lounged; and King Abrazza, who
loved his antique ancestors; and loved old times; and would
not talk of moderns;bade Yoomy sing old songs; bade
Mohi rehearse old histories; bade Babbalanja tell of old
ontologies; and commanded all, meanwhile, to drink his
old, old wine.
So, all round we quaffed and quoted.
At last, we talked of old Homeric bards:those who,
ages back, harped, and begged, and groped their blinded way
through all this charitable Mardi; receiving coppers then,
and immortal glory now.
Abrazza
.How came it, that they all were blind?
Babbalanja
.It was endemical, your Highness. Few
grand poets have good eyes; for they needs blind must be,
who ever gaze upon the sun. Vavona himself was blind;
vol. ii.O
when, in the silence of his secret bower, he saidI will
build another world. Therein, let there be kings and slaves,
philosophers and wits; whose checkered actionsstrange,
grotesque, and merry-sad, will entertain my idle moods.
So, my lord, Vavona played at kings and crowns, and men
and manners; and loved that lonely game to play.
Abrazza
.Vavona seemed a solitary Mardian; who
seldom went abroad; had few friends; and shunning others,
was shunned by them.
Babbalanja
.But shunned not himself, my lord; like
gods, great poets dwell alone; while round them, roll the
worlds they build.
Media
.You seem to know all authors:you must have
heard of Lombardo, Babbalanja; he who flourished many
ages since.
Babbalanja
.I have; and his grand Koztanza know
by heart.
Media
(
to Abrazza
.)A very curious work, that, my
lord.
Abrazza
.Yes, my dearest king. But, Babbalanja, if
Lombardo had aught to tell to Mardiwhy choose a vehicle
so crazy?
Babbalanja
.It was his nature, I suppose.
Abrazza
.But so it would not have been, to me.
Babbalanja
.Nor would it have been natural, for my
noble lord Abrazza, to have worn Lombardo's head:every
man has his own, thank Oro!
Abrazza
.A curious work: a very curious work.
Babbalanja
,
are you acquainted with the history of Lombardo?
Babbalanja
.None better. All his biographies have I
read.
Abrazza
.Then, tell us how he came to write that
work. For one, I can not imagine how those poor devils
contrive to roll such thunders through all Mardi.
Media
.Their thunder and lightning seem spontaneous
combustibles, my lord.
Abrazza
.With which, they but consume themselves,
my prince beloved.
Babbalanja
.In a measure, true, your Highness. But
pray you, listen; and I will try to tell the way in which
Lombardo produced his great Koztanza.
Media
.But hark you, philosopher! this time no
incoherencies
;
gag that devil, Azzageddi. And now, what was
it that originally impelled Lombardo to the undertaking?
Babbalanja
.Primus and forever, a full heart:
brimful
,
bubbling, sparkling; and running over like the flagon in
your hand, my lord. Secundo, the necessity of bestirring
himself to procure his yams.
Abrazza
.Wanting the second motive, would the first
have sufficed, philosopher?
Babbalanja
.Doubtful. More conduits than one to drain
off the soul's overflowings. Besides, the greatest fullnesses
overflow not spontaneously; and, even when decanted, like
rich syrups, slowly ooze; whereas, poor fluids glibly flow,
wide-spreading. Hence, when great fullness weds great
in-dolence
;that
man, to others, too often proves a cipher;
though, to himself, his thoughts form an Infinite Series,
indefinite
,
from its vastness; and incommunicable;not for
lack of power, but for lack of an omnipotent volition, to move
his strength. His own world is full before him; the fulcrum
set; but lever there is none. To such a man, the giving of
any boor's resoluteness, with tendons braided, would be as
hanging a claymore to Valor's side, before unarmed. Our
minds are cunning, compound mechanisms; and one spring,
or wheel, or axle wanting, the movement lags, or halts.
Cerebrum must not overbalance cerebellum; our brains
should be round as globes; and planted on capacious chests,
inhaling mighty morning-inspirations. We have had vast
developments of parts of men; but none of manly wholes.
Before a full-developed man, Mardi would fall down and
worship. We are idiot, younger-sons of gods, begotten in
dotages divine; and our mothers all miscarry. Giants are
in our germs; but we are dwarfs, staggering under heads
overgrown. Heaped, our measures burst. We die of too
much life.
Media
(
to Abrazza
).Be not impatient, my lord; he'll
recover presently. You were talking of Lombardo,
Babbalanja
.
Babbalanja
.I was, your Highness. Of all Mardians, by
nature, he was the most inert. Hast ever seen a yellow lion,
all day basking in the yellow sun:in reveries, rending droves
of elephants; but his vast loins supine, and eyelids winking?
Such, Lombardo; but fierce Want, the hunter, came and
roused his roar. In hairy billows, his great mane tossed
like the sea; his eyeballs flamed two hells; his paw had
stopped a rolling world,
Abrazza
.In other words, yams were indispensable, and,
poor devil, he roared to get them.
Babbalanja
(
bowing
).Partly so, my literal lord. And
as with your own golden scepter, at times upon your royal
teeth, indolent tattoos you beat; then, potent, sway it o'er
your isle; so, Lombardo. And ere Necessity plunged spur
and rowel into him, he knew not his own paces.
That
churned him into consciousness; and brought ambition, ere
then dormant, seething to the top, till he trembled at
himself
.
No mailed hand lifted up against a traveler in woods,
can so appall, as we ourselves. We are full of ghosts and
spirits; we are as grave-yards full of buried dead, that start
to life before us. And all our dead sires, verily, are in us;
that
is their immortality. From sire to son, we go on
multiplying
corpses in ourselves; for all of which, are
resurrections
.
Every thought's a soul of some past poet, hero, sage.
We are fuller than a city. Woe it is, that reveals these
things. He knows himself, and all that's in him, who
knows adversity. To scale great heights, we must come
out of lowermost depths. The way to heaven is through
hell. We need fiery baptisms in the fiercest flames of our
own bosoms. We must feel our hearts hothissing in us.
And ere their fire is revealed, it must burn its way out of
us; though it consume us and itself. Oh, sleek-cheeked
Plenty! smiling at thine own dimples;vain for thee to
reach out after greatness. Turn! turn! from all your tiers
of cushions of eider-downturn! and be broken on the wheels
of many woes. At white-heat, brand thyself; and count the
scars, like old war-worn veterans, over camp-fires. Soft
poet! brushing tears from liliesthis way! and howl in
sackcloth and in ashes! Know, thou, that the lines that
live are turned out of a furrowed brow. Oh! there is a
fierce, a cannibal delight, in the grief that shrieks to
multiply
itself. That grief is miserly of its own; it pities all the
happy. Some damned spirits would not be otherwise, could
they.
Abrazza
(
to Media
).Pray, my lord, is this good
gentleman
a devil?
Media
.No, my lord; but he's possessed by one. His
name is Azzageddi. You may hear more of him. But
come, Babbalanja, hast forgotten all about Lombardo?
How set he about that great undertaking, his Koztanza?
Abrazza
(
to Media
).Oh, for all the ravings of your
Babbalanja, Lombardo took no special pains; hence,
deserves
small commendation. For, genius must be somewhat
like us kings,calm, content, in consciousness of power.
And to Lombardo, the scheme of his Koztanza must have
come full-fledged, like an eagle from the sun.
Babbalanja
.No, your Highness; but like eagles, his
thoughts were first callow; yet, born plumeless, they came
to soar.
Abrazza
.Very fine. I presume, Babbalanja, the first
thing he did, was to fast, and invoke the muses.
Babbalanja
.Pardon, my lord; on the contrary he first
procured a ream of vellum, and some sturdy quills:
indispensable
preliminaries, my worshipful lords, to the writing
of the sublimest epics.
Abrazza
.Ah! then the muses were afterward invoked.
Babbalanja
.Pardon again. Lombardo next sat down
to a fine plantain pudding.
Yoomy
.When the song-spell steals over me, I live upon
olives.
Babbalanja
.Yoomy, Lombardo eschewed olives. Said
he, What fasting soldier can fight? and the fight of all
fights is to write. In ten days Lombardo had written
Abrazza
.Dashed off, you mean.
Babbalanja
.He never dashed off aught.
Abrazza
.As you will.
Babbalanja
.In ten days, Lombardo had written full
fifty folios; he loved huge acres of vellum whereon to
expatiate.
Media
.What then?
Babbalanja
.He read them over attentively; made a
neat package of the whole: and put it into the fire.
All
.How?
Media
.What! these great geniuses writing trash?
Abrazza
.I thought as much.
Babbalanja
.My lords, they abound in it! more than
any other men in Mardi. Genius is full of trash. But
genius essays its best to keep it to itself; and giving away its
ore, retains the earth; whence, the too frequent wisdom of
its works, and folly of its life.
Abrazza
.Then genius is not inspired, after all. How
they must slave in their mines! I weep to think of it.
Babbalanja
.My lord, all men are inspired; fools are
inspired; your highness is inspired; for the essence of all
ideas is infused. Of ourselves, and in ourselves, we originate
nothing. When Lombardo set about his work, he knew
not what it would become. He did not build himself in
with plans; he wrote right on; and so doing, got deeper and
deeper into himself; and like a resolute traveler, plunging
through baffling woods, at last was rewarded for his toils.
In good time, saith he, in his autobiography, I came out
into a serene, sunny, ravishing region; full of sweet scents,
singing birds, wild plaints, roguish laughs, prophetic voices.
Here we are at last, then, he cried; I have created the
creative. And now the whole boundless landscape
stretched
away. Lombardo panted; the sweat was on his brow;
he off mantle; braced himself; sat within view of the
ocean; his face to a cool rushing breeze; placed flowers
before him; and gave himself plenty of room. On one side
was his ream of vellum
Abrazza
.And on the other, a brimmed beaker.
Babbalanja
.No, your Highness; though he loved it,
no wine for Lombardo while actually at work.
Mohi
.Indeed? Why, I ever thought that it was to
the superior quality of Lombardo's punches, that Mardi
was indebted for that abounding humor of his.
Babbalanja
.Not so; he had another way of keeping
himself well braced.
Yoomy
.Quick! tell us the secret.
Babbalanja
.He never wrote by rush-light. His lamp
swung in heaven.He rose from his East, with the sun;
he wrote when all nature was alive.
Mohi
.Doubtless, then, he always wrote with a grin;
and none laughed louder at his quips, that Lombardo
himself
.
Babbalanja
.Hear you laughter at the birth of a man
child, old man? The babe may have many dimples; not
so, the parent. Lombardo was a hermit to behold.
Media
.What! did Lombardo laugh with a long face?
Babbalanja
.His merriment was not always merriment
to him, your Highness. For the most part, his meaning
kept him serious. Then he was so intensely riveted to his
work, he could not pause to laugh.
Mohi
.My word for it; but he had a sly one, now
and then.
Babbalanja
.For the nonce, he was not his own master:
a mere amanuensis writing by dictation.
Yoomy
.Inspiration, that!
Babbalanja
.Call it as you will, Yoomy, it was a sort
of sleep-walking of the mind. Lombardo never threw down
his pen: it dropped from him; and then, he sat disenchanted:
rubbing his eyes; staring; and feeling faintsometimes,
almost unto death.
Media
.But pray, Babbalanja, tell us how he made
acquaintance
with some of those rare worthies, he introduces
us to, in his Koztanza.
Babbalanja
.He first met them in his reveries; they
were walking about in him, sour and moody: and for a long
time, were shy of his advances; but still importuned, they
at last grew ashamed of their reserve; stepped forward;
and gave him their hands. After that, they were frank
and friendly. Lombardo set places for them at his board;
when he died, he left them something in his will.
Media
.What! those imaginary beings?
Abrazza
.Wondrous witty! infernal fine!
Media
.But, Babbalanja; after all, the Koztanza found
no favor in the eyes of some Mardians.
Abrazza
.Ay: the arch-critics Verbi and Batho
denounced
it.
Babbalanja
.Yes: on good authority, Verbi is said to
have detected a superfluous comma; and Batho declared
that, with the materials he could have constructed a far
better world than Lombardo's. But, didst ever hear of his
laying his axis?
Abrazza
.But the unities; Babbalanja, the unities! they
are wholly wanting in the Koztanza.
Babbalanja
.Your Highness; upon that point,
Lombardo
was frank. Saith he, in his autobiography: For
some time, I endeavored to keep in the good graces of those
nymphs; but I found them so captious, and exacting; they
threw me into such a violent passion with their
fault-findings
;
that, at last, I renounced them.
Abrazza
.Very rash!
Babbalanja
.No, your Highness; for though Lombardo
abandoned all monitors from without; he retained one
auto-crat
withinhis crowned and sceptered instinct. And
what, if he pulled down one gross world, and ransacked the
etherial spheres, to build up something of his owna
composite
:what
then? matter and mind, though matching
not, are mates; and sundered oft, in his Koztanza they
unite:the airy waist, embraced by stalwart arms.
Media
.Incoherent again! I thought we were to have
no more of this!
Babbalanja
.My lord Media, there are things infinite
in the finite; and dualities in unities. Our eyes are pleased
with the redness of the rose, but another sense lives upon its
fragrance. Its redness you must approach, to view: its
invisible fragrance pervades the field. So, with the
Koztanza
.
Its mere beauty is restricted to its form: its
expanding
soul, past Mardi does embalm. Modak is Modako;
but fogle-foggle is not fugle-fi.
Media
(
to Abrazza
).My lord, you start again; but
'tis only another phase of Azzageddi; sometimes he's quite
mad. But all this you must needs overlook.
Abrazza
.I will, my dear prince; what one can not see
through, one must needs look over, as you say.
Yoomy
.But trust me, your Highness, some of those
strange things fall far too melodiously upon the ear, to be
wholly deficient in meaning.
Abrazza
.Your gentle minstrel,
this
must be, my lord.
But Babbalanja, the Koztanza lacks cohesion; it is wild,
un-connected
,
all episode.
Babbalanja
.And so is Mardi itself:nothing but
episodes; valleys and hills; rivers, digressing from plains;
vines, roving all over; boulders and diamonds; flowers and
thistles; forests and thickets; and, here and there, fens and
moors. And so, the world in the Koztanza.
Abrazza
.Ay, plenty of dead-desert chapters there;
horrible sands to wade through.
Media
.Now, Babbalanja, away with your tropes; and
O*
tell us of the work, directly it was done. What did
Lombardo
then? Did he show it to any one for an opinion?
Babbalanja
.Yes, to Zenzori; who asked him where
he picked up so much trash; to Hanto, who bade him not be
cast down, it was pretty good; to Lucree, who desired to
know how much he was going to get for it; to Roddi, who
offered a suggestion.
Media
.And what was that?
Babbalanja
.That he had best make a faggot of the
whole; and try again.
Abrazza
.Very encouraging.
Media
.Any one else?
Babbalanja
.To Pollo; who, conscious his opinion was
sought, was thereby puffed up; and marking the faltering
of Lombardo's voice, when the manuscript was handed him,
straightway concluded, that the man who stood thus
trembling
at the bar, must needs be inferior to the judge. But
his verdict was mild. After sitting up all night over the
work; and diligently taking notes:Lombardo, my friend!
here, take your sheets. I have run through them loosely.
You might have done better; but then you might have
done worse. Take them, my friend; I have put in some
good things for you.
Media
.And who was Pollo?
Babbalanja
.Probably some one who lived in
Lombardo's
time, and went by that name. He is incidentally
mentioned, and cursorily immortalized in one of the
posthumous
notes to the Koztanza.
Media
.What is said of him there?
Babbalanja
.Not much. In a very old transcript of
the workthat of Aldinathe note alludes to a brave line
in the text, and runs thus:Diverting to tell, it was this
passage that an old prosodist, one Pollo, claimed for his own.
He maintained he made a free-will offering of it to
Lombardo
.
Several things are yet extant of this Pollo, who
died some weeks ago. He seems to have been one of those,
who would do great things if they could; but are content
to compass the small. He imagined, that the precedence
of authors he had established in his library, was their Mardi
order of merit. He condemned the sublime poems of Vavona
to his lowermost shelf. `Ah,' thought he, `how we library
princes, lord it over these beggarly authors!' Well read in
the history of their woes, Pollo pitied them all, particularly
the famous; and wrote little essays of his own, which he
read to himself.
Media
.Well: and what said Lombardo to those good
friends of his,Zenzori, Hanto, and Roddi?
Babbalanja
.Nothing. Taking home his manuscript,
he glanced it over; making three corrections.
Abrazza
.And what then?
Babbalanja
.Then, your Highness, he thought to try a
conclave of professional critics; saying to himself, Let them
privately point out to me, now, all my blemishes; so that,
what time they come to review me in public, all will be
well. But curious to relate, those professional critics, for
the most part, held their peace, concerning a work yet
unpublished. And, with some generous exceptions, in their
vague, learned way, betrayed such base, beggarly notions of
authorship, that Lombardo could have wept, had tears been
his. But in his very grief, he ground his teeth. Muttered
he, They are fools. In their eyes, bindings not brains make
books. They criticise my tattered cloak, not my soul,
caparisoned like a charger. He is the great author, think
they, who drives the best bargain with his wares: and no
bargainer am I. Because he is old, they worship some
mediocrity of an ancient, and mock at the living prophet
with the live coal on his lips. They are men who would
not be men, had they no books. Their sires begat them
not; but the authors they have read. Feelings they have
none: and their very opinions they borrow. They can not
say yea, nor nay, without first consulting all Mardi as an
Encyclopedia. And all the learning in them, is as a dead
corpse in a coffin. Were they worthy the dignity of being
damned, I would damn them; but they are not. Critics?
Asses! rather mules!so emasculated, from vanity, they
can not father a true thought. Like mules, too, from
dunghills, they trample down gardens of roses: and deem
that crushed fragrance their own.Oh! that all round the
domains of genius should lie thus unhedged, for such cattle
to uproot! Oh! that an eagle should be stabbed by a
goose-quill! But at best, the greatest reviewers but prey
on my leavings. For I am critic and creator; and as
critic, in cruelty surpass all critics merely, as a tiger,
jackals
.
For ere Mardi sees aught of mine, I scrutinize it
myself, remorseless as a surgeon. I cut right and left; I
probe, tear, and wrench; kill, burn, and destroy; and
what's left after that, the jackals are welcome to. It is
I
that stab false thoughts, ere hatched;
I
that pull down
wall and tower, rejecting materials which would make
palaces for others. Oh! could Mardi but see how we work,
it would marvel more at our primal chaos, than at the
round world thence emerging. It would marvel at our
scaffoldings, scaling heaven; marvel at the hills of earth,
banked all round our fabrics ere completed.How plain the
pyramid! In this grand silence, so intense, pierced by that
pointed mass,could ten thousand slaves have ever toiled?
ten thousand hammers rung?There it stands,part of
Mardi: claiming kin with mountains;was this thing
piecemeal built?It was. Piecemeal?atom by atom it
was laid. The world is made of mites.
Yoomy
(
musing
.)It is even so.
Abrazza
.Lombardo was severe upon the critics; and
they as much so upon him;of that, be sure.
Babbalanja
.Your Highness, Lombardo never presumed
to criticise true critics; who are more rare than true poets.
A great critic is a sultan among satraps; but pretenders
are thick as ants, striving to scale a palm, after its aerial
sweetness. And they fight among themselves. Essaying to
pluck eagles, they themselves are geese, stuck full of quills,
of which they rob each other.
Abrazza
(
to Media
.)Oro help the victim that falls in
Babbalanja's hands!
Media
.Ay, my lord; at times, his every finger is a
dagger: every thought a falling tower that whelms! But
resume, philosopherwhat of Lombardo now?
Babbalanja
.For this thing, said he, I have agonized
over it enough.I can wait no more. It has faultsall
mine;its merits all its own;but I can toil no longer.
The beings knit to me implore; my heart is full; my brain
is sick. Let it golet it goand Oro with it. Somewhere
Mardi has a mighty heart
that
struck, all the isles shall
resound!
Abrazza
.Poor devil! he took the world too hard.
Media
.As most of these mortals do, my lord. That's
the load, self-imposed, under which Babbalanja reels. But
now, philosopher, ere Mardi saw it, what thought Lombardo
of his work, looking at it objectively, as a thing out of him,
I mean.
Abrazza
.No doubt, he hugged it.
Babbalanja
.Hard to answer. Sometimes, when by
himself, he thought hugely of it, as my lord Abrazza says;
but when abroad, among men, he almost despised it; but
when he bethought him of those parts, written with full
eyes, half blinded; temples throbbing; and pain at the
heart
Abrazza
.Pooh! pooh!
Babbalanja
.He would say to himself, Sure, it can
not be in vain! Yet again, when he bethought him of the
hurry and bustle of Mardi, dejection stole over him. Who
will heed it, thought he; what care these fops and
brawlers
for me? But am I not myself an egregious coxcomb?
Who will read me? Say one thousand pagestwenty-five
lines eachevery line ten wordsevery word ten letters.
That's two million five hundred thousand
a
's, and
i
's, and
o
's to read! How many are superfluous? Am I not mad
to saddle Mardi with such a task? Of all men, am I the
wisest, to stand upon a pedestal, and teach the mob? Ah,
my own Koztanza! child of many prayers!in whose
earnest
eyes, so fathomless, I see my own; and recall all past
delights and silent agoniesthou may'st prove, as the child
of some fond dotard:beauteous to me; hideous to Mardi!
And methinks, that while so much slaving merits that thou
should'st not die; it has not been intense, prolonged enough,
for the high meed of immortality. Yet, things immortal
have been written; and by men as me;men, who slept
and waked; and ate; and talked with tongues like mine.
Ah, Oro! how may we know or not, we are what we would
be? Hath genius any stamp and imprint, obvious to
possessors
?
Has it eyes to see itself; or is it blind? Or do
we delude ourselves with being gods, and end in grubs?
Genius, genius?a thousand years hence, to be a
household-word
?I?Lombardo?
but yesterday cut in the
marketplace
by a spangled fool!Lombardo immortal?Ha, ha,
Lombardo! but thou art an ass, with vast ears brushing
the tops of palms! Ha, ha, ha! Methinks I see thee
immortal! `Thus great Lombardo saith; and thus; and
thus; and thus:thus saith heillustrious Lombardo!
Lombardo, our great countryman! Lombardo, prince of
poetsLombardo! great Lombardo!'Ha, ha, ha!go,
go! dig thy grave, and bury thyself!
Abrazza
.He was very funny, then, at times.
Babbalanja
.Very funny, your Highness:amazing
jolly! And from my nethermost soul, would to Oro, thou
could'st but feel one touch of that jolly woe! It would
appall thee, my Right Worshipful lord Abrazza!
Abrazza
(
to Media
).My dear lord, his teeth are
marvelously
white and sharp: some she-shark must have been
his dam:does he often grin thus? It was infernal!
Media
.Ah! that's Azzageddi. But, prithee,
Babbalanja
,
proceed.
Babbalanja
.Your Highness, even in his calmer critic
moods, Lombardo was far from fancying his work. He
confesses
,
that it ever seemed to him but a poor scrawled copy
of something within, which, do what he would, he could not
completely transfer. My canvas was small, said he;
crowded out were hosts of things that came last. But
Fate is in it. And Fate it was, too, your Highness, which
forced Lombardo, ere his work was well done, to take it off
his easel, and send it to be multiplied. Oh, that I was not
thus spurred! cried he; but like many another, in its
very childhood, this poor child of mine must go out into
Mardi, and get bread for its sire.
Abrazza
(
with a sigh
).Alas, the poor devil! But
methinks 'twas wondrous arrogant in him to talk to all Mardi
at that lofty rate.Did he think himself a god?
Babbalanja
.He himself best knew what he thought;
but, like all others, he was created by Oro to some special
end; doubtless, partly answered in his Koztanza.
Media
.And now that Lombardo is long dead and gone
and his work, hooted during life, lives after himwhat
think the present company of it? Speak, my lord Abrazza!
Babbalanja! Mohi! Yoomy!
Abrazza
(
tapping his sandal with his scepter
).I never
read it.
Babbalanja
(
looking upward
).It was written with a
divine intent.
Mohi
(
stroking his beard
).I never hugged it in a
corner
,
and ignored it before Mardi.
Yoomy
(
musing
).It has bettered my heart.
Media
(
rising
).And I have read it through nine times.
Babbalanja
(
starting up
).Ah, Lombardo! this must
make thy ghost glad!
CHAPTER LXXVII.
THEY SUP.
There
seemed something sinister, hollow, heartless, about
Abrazza, and that green-and-yellow, evil-starred crown that
he wore.
But why think of that? Though we like not something
in the curve of one's brow, or distrust the tone of his voice;
yet, let us away with suspicions if we may, and make a
jolly comrade of him, in the name of the gods. Miserable!
thrice miserable he, who is forever turning over and over
one's character in his mind, and weighing by nice
avoirdupois
,
the pros and the cons of his goodness and badness.
For we are all good and bad. Give me the heart that's
huge as all Asia; and unless a man be a villain outright,
account him one of the best tempered blades in the world.
That night, in his right regal hall, King Abrazza received
us. And in merry good time a fine supper was spread.
Now, in thus nocturnally regaling us, our host was
warranted by many ancient and illustrious examples.
For old Jove gave suppers; the god Woden gave suppers;
the Hindoo deity Brahma gave suppers; the Red Man's
Great Spirit gave suppers:chiefly venison and game.
And many distinguished mortals besides.
Ahasuerus gave suppers; Xerxes gave suppers;
Montezuma
gave suppers; Powhattan gave suppers; the Jews'
Passovers were suppers; the Pharaohs gave suppers; Julius
Csar gave suppers:and rare ones they were; Great
Pompey gave suppers; Nabob Crassus gave suppers; and
Heliogabalus, surnamed the Gobbler, gave suppers.
It was a common saying of old, that King Pluto gave
suppers; some say he is giving them still. If so, he is
keeping tip-top company, old Pluto:Emperors and Czars;
Great Moguls and Great Khans; Grand Lamas and Grand
Dukes; Prince Regents and Queen Dowagers:Tamerlane
hob-a-nobbing with Bonaparte; Antiochus with Solyman
the Magnificent; Pisistratus pledging Pilate; Semiramis
eating bon-bons with Bloody Mary, and her namesake of
Medicis; the Thirty Tyrants quaffing three to one with
the Council of Ten; and Sultans, Satraps, Viziers, Hetmans,
Soldans, Landgraves, Bashaws, Doges, Dauphins, Infantas,
Incas, and Caciques looking on.
Again: at Arbela, the conqueror of conquerors, conquering
son of Olympia by Jupiter himself, sent out cards to his
captains,Hephestion, Antigonus, Antipater, and the rest
to join him at ten, P.M., in the Temple of Belus; there, to
sit down to a victorious supper, off the gold plate of the
Assyrian High Priests. How majestically he poured out
his old Madeira that night!feeling grand and lofty as
the Himmalehs; yea, all Babylon nodded her towers in
his soul!
Spread, heaped up, stacked with good things; and
redolent
of citrous and grapes, hilling round tall vases of wine;
and here and there, waving with fresh orange-boughs,
among whose leaves, myriads of small tapers gleamed like
fire-flies in groves,Abrazza's glorious board showed like
some banquet in Paradise: Ceres and Pomona presiding;
and jolly Bacchus, like a recruit with a mettlesome rifle,
staggering back as he fires off the bottles of vivacious
champagne
.
In ranges, roundabout stood living candelabras:lackeys,
gayly bedecked, with tall torches in their hands; and at
one end, stood trumpeters, bugles at their lips.
This way, my dear Media!this seat at my left
Noble Taji!my right. Babbalanja!Mohiwhere you
are. But where's pretty Yoomy?Gone to meditate
in the moonlight? ah!Very good. Let the banquet
begin. A blast there!
And charge all did.
The venison, wild boar's meat, and buffalo-humps, were
extraordinary; the wine, of rare vintages, like bottled
lightning
;
and the first course, a brilliant affair, went off like a
rocket.
But as yet, Babbalanja joined not in the revels. His
mood was on him; and apart he sat; silently eyeing the
banquet; and ever and anon muttering,Fogle-foggle,
fugle-fi
The first fury of the feast over, said King Media, pouring
out from a heavy flagon into his goblet, Abrazza, these
suppers are wondrous fine things.
Ay, my dear lord, much better than dinners.
So they are, so they are. The dinner-hour is the
summer
of the day: full of sunshine, I grant; but not like the
mellow autumn of supper. A dinner, you know, may go off
rather stiffly; but invariably suppers are jovial. At
dinners
,
'tis not till you take in sail, furl the cloth, bow the
lady-passengers out, and make all snug; 'tis not till then,
that one begins to ride out the gale with complacency.
But at these suppersGood Oro! your cup is empty, my
dear demi-god!But at these suppers, I say, all is snug
and ship-shape before you begin; and when you begin, you
waive the beginning, and begin in the middle. And as for
the cloth,but tell us, Braid-Beard, what that old king of
Franko, Ludwig the Fat, said of that matter. The cloth
for suppers, you know. It's down in your chronicles.
My lord,wiping his beard,Old Ludwig was of
opinion, that at suppers the cloth was superfluous, unless on
the back of some jolly good friar. Said he, `For one, I
prefer sitting right down to the unrobed table.'
High and royal authority, that of Ludwig the Fat,
said Babbalanja, far higher than the authority of Ludwig
the Great:the one, only great by courtesy; the other, fat
beyond a peradventure. But they are equally famous; and
in their graves, both on a par. For after devouring many
a fair province, and grinding the poor of his realm, Ludwig
the Great has long since, himself, been devoured by very
small worms, and ground into very fine dust. And after
stripping many a venison rib, Ludwig the Fat has had his
own polished and bleached in the Valley of Death; yea,
and his cranium chased with corrodings, like the carved flagon
once held to its jaws.
My lord! my lord!cried Abrazza to Media
this ghastly devil of yours grins worse than a skull. I
feel the worms crawling over me!By Oro we must eject
him!
No, no, my lord. Let him sit there, as of old the
Death's-head graced the feasts of the Pharaohslet him
sitlet him sitfor Death but imparts a flavor to Life
Go on: wag your tongue without fear, Azzageddi!But
come, Braid-Beard! let's hear more of the Ludwigs.
Well, then, your Highness, of all the eighteen royal
Ludwigs of Franko
Who like so many ten-pins, all in a row, interposed
Babbalanjahave been bowled off the course by grim
Death.
Heed him not, said Mediago on.
The Debonnaire, the Pious, the Stammerer, the
Do-Nothing
,
the Juvenile, the Quarreler:of all these, I say,
Ludwig the Fat was the best table-man of them all. Such
a full orbed paunch was his, that no way could he devise of
getting to his suppers, but by getting right into them. Like
the Zodiac his table was circular, and full in the middle he
sat, like a sun;all his jolly stews and ragouts revolving
around him.
Yea, said Babbalanja, a very round sun was Ludwig
the Fat. No wonder he's down in the chronicles; several
ells about the waist, and King of cups and Tokay. Truly,
a famous king: three hundred-weight of lard, with a diadem
on top: lean brains and a fat doubleta demi-john of a
demi-god!
Is this to be longer borne? cried Abrazza, starting up.
Quaff that sneer down, devil! on the instant! down with
it, to the dregs! This comes, my lord Media, of having a
slow drinker at one's board. Like an iceberg, such a fellow
frosts the whole atmosphere of a banquet, and is felt a league
off. We must thrust him out. Guards!
Back! touch him not, hounds!cried Media. Your
pardon, my lord, but we'll keep him to it; and melt him
down in this good wine. Drink! I command it, drink,
Babbalanja!
And am I not drinking, my lord? Surely you would
not that I should imbibe more than I can hold. The
measure being full, all poured in after that is but wasted.
I am for being temperate in these things, my good lord.
And my one cup outlasts three of yours. Better to sip a
pint, than pour down a quart. All things in moderation
are good; whence, wine in moderation is good. But all
things in excess are bad: whence wine in excess is bad.
Away with your logic and conic sections! Drink!
But no, no: I am too severe. For of all meals a supper
should be the most social and free. And going thereto we
kings, my lord, should lay aside our scepters.Do as you
please Babbalanja.
You are right, you are right, after all, my dear
demi-god
,
said Abrazza. And to say truth, I seldom worry
myself with the ways of these mortals; for no thanks do
we demi-gods get. We kings should be ever indifferent.
Nothing like a cold heart; warm ones are ever chafing, and
getting into trouble. I let my mortals here in this isle take
heed to themselves; only barring them out when they would
thrust in their petitions. This very instant, my lord, my
yeoman-guard is on duty without, to drive off intruders.
Hark!what noise is that?Ho, who comes?
At that instant, there burst into the hall, a crowd of
spearmen, driven before a pale, ragged rout, that loudly
invoked King Abrazza.
Pardon, my lord king, for thus forcing an entrance!
But long in vain have we knocked at thy gates! Our
grievances are more than we can bear! Give ear to our
spokesman, we beseech!
And from their tumultuous midst, they pushed forward a
tall, grim, pine-tree of a fellow, who loomed up out of the
throng, like the Peak of Teneriffe among the Canaries in a
storm.
Drive the knaves out! Ho, cowards, guards, turn
about! charge upon them! Away with your grievances!
Drive them out, I say, drive them out!High times, truly,
my lord Media, when demi-gods are thus annoyed at their
wine. Oh, who would reign over mortals!
So at last, with much difficulty, the ragged rout were
ejected; the Peak of Teneriffe going last, a pent storm on
his brow; and muttering about some black time that was
coming.
While the hoarse murmurs without still echoed through
the hall, King Abrazza refilling his cup thus spoke:You
were saying, my dear lord, that of all meals a supper is the
most social and free. Very true. And of all suppers those
given by us bachelor demi-gods are the best. Are they
not?
They are. For Benedict mortals must be home
betimes
:
bachelor demi-gods are never away.
Ay, your Highnesses, bachelors are all the year round at
home; said Mohi: sitting out life in the chimney corner,
cozy and warm as the dog, whilome turning the old-fashioned
roasting-jack.
And to us bachelor demi-gods, cried Media our
tomorrows
are as long rows of fine punches, ranged on a board,
and waiting the hand.
But my good lords, said Babbalanja, now brightening
with wine; if, of all suppers those given by bachelors be
the best:of all bachelors, are not your priests and monks
the jolliest? I mean, behind the scenes? Their prayers
all said, and their futurities securely invested,who so
care-free
and cozy as they? Yea, a supper for two in a friar's
cell in Maramma, is merrier far, than a dinner for
five-and-twenty
,
in the broad right wing of Donjalolo's great Palace
of the Morn.
Bravo, Babbalanja! cried Media, your iceberg is
thawing. More of that, more of that. Did I not say, we
would melt him down at last, my lord?
Ay, continued Babbalanja, bachelors are a noble
fraternity: I'm a bachelor myself. One of ye, in that
matter, my lord demi-gods. And if unlike the patriarchs of
the world, we father not our brigades and battalions; and
send not out into the battles of our country whole
regiments
of our own individual raising;yet do we oftentimes
leave behind us goodly houses and lands; rare old brandies
and mountain Malagas; and more especially, warm doublets
and togas, and spatterdashes, wherewithal to keep
comfortable
those who survive us;casing the legs and arms,
which others beget. Then compare not invidiously
Benedicts
with bachelors, since thus we make an equal division
of the duties, which both owe to posterity.
Suppers forever! cried Media. See, my lord, what
yours has done for Babbalanja. He came to it a skeleton;
but will go away, every bone padded!
Ay, my lord demi-gods, said Babbalanja, drop by drop
refilling his goblet. These suppers are all very fine, very
pleasant, and merry. But we pay for them roundly.
Every thing, my good lords, has its price, from a marble to
a world. And easier of digestion, and better for both body
and soul, are a half-haunch of venison and a gallon of mead,
taken under the sun at meridian, than the soft bridal breast
of a partridge, with some gentle negus, at the noon of
night!
No lie that! said Mohi. Beshrew me, in no well
appointed mansion doth the pantry lie adjoining the
sleeping-chamber
.
A good thought: I'll fill up, and ponder on it.
Let not Azzageddi get uppermost again, Babbalanja,
cried Media. Your goblet is only half-full.
Permit it to remain so, my lord. For whoso takes
much wine to bed with him, has a bedfellow, more restless
than a somnambulist. And though Wine be a jolly blade
at the board, a sulky knave is he under a blanket. I know
him of old. Yet, your Highness, for all this, to many a
Mardian, suppers are still better than dinners, at whatever
cost purchased Forasmuch, as many have more leisure to
sup, than dine. And though you demi-gods, may dine at
your ease; and dine it out into night: and sit and chirp
over your Burgundy, till the morning larks join your
crickets
,
and wed matins to vespers;far otherwise, with us
plebeian mortals. From our dinners, we must hie to our
anvils: and the last jolly jorum evaporates in a cark and a
care.
Methinks he relapses, said Abrazza.
It waxes late, said Mohi; your Highnesses, is it not
time to break up?
No, no! cried Abrazza; let the day break when it
will: but no breakings for us. It's only midnight. This
way with the wine; pass it along, my dear Media. We
are young yet, my sweet lord; light hearts and heavy
purses; short prayers and long rent-rolls. Pass round the
Tokay! We demi-gods have all our old age for a
dormitory
.
Come!Round and round with the flagons! Let
them disappear like mile-stones on a race-course!
Ah! murmured Babbalanja, holding his full goblet at
arm's length on the board, not thus with the hapless
wight, born with a hamper on his back, and blisters in his
palms.Toil and sleepsleep and toil, are his days and
his nights; he goes to bed with a lumbago, and wakes with
the rheumatics;I know what it is;he snatches lunches,
not dinners, and makes of all life a cold snack! Yet praise
be to Oro, though to such men dinners are scarce worth the
eating; nevertheless, praise Oro again, a good supper is
something
.
Off jack-boots; nay, off shirt, if you will, and go at
it. Hurrah! the fagged day is done: the last blow is an
echo. Twelve long hours to sunrise! And would it were
an Antarctic night, and six months to to-morrow! But,
hurrah! the very bees have their hive, and after a day's
weary wandering, hie home to their honey. So they stretch
out their stiff legs, rub their lame elbows, and putting their
tired right arms in a sling, set the others to fetching and
carrying from dishes to dentals, from foaming flagon to the
demijohn which never pours out at the end you pour in.
Ah! after all, the poorest devil in Mardi lives not in vain.
There's a soft side to the hardest oak-plank in the world!
Methinks I have heard some such sentimental gabble
as this before from my slaves, my lord, said Abrazza to
Media. It has the old gibberish flavor.
Gibberish, your Highness? Gibberish? I'm full of it
I'm a gibbering ghost, my right worshipful lord! Here,
pass your hand through mehere,
here
, and scorch it where
I most burn. By Oro! King! but I will gibe and gibber
at thee, till thy crown feels like another skull clapped on thy
own. Gibberish? ay, in hell we'll gibber in concert, king!
we'll howl, and roast, and hiss together!
Devil that thou art, begone! Ho, guards! seize him!
Back, curs! cried Media. Harm not a hair of his
head. I crave pardon, King Abrazza, but no violence must
be done Babbalanja.
Trumpets there! said Abrazza; so: the banquet is
donelights for King Media! Good-night, my lord!
Now, thus, for the nonce, with good cheer, we close.
And after many fine dinners and banquetsthrough light
and through shade; through mirth, sorrow, and all
drawing
nigh to the evening end of these wanderings wildmeet
is it that all should be regaled with a supper.
CHAPTER LXXVIII.
THEY EMBARK.
Next
morning, King Abrazza sent frigid word to Media
that the day was very fine for yachting; but he much
regretted
that indisposition would prevent his making one of
the party, who that morning doubtless would depart his
isle.
My compliments to your king, said Media to the
chamberlains
,
and say the royal notice to quit was duly
received
.
Take Azzageddi's also, said Babbalanja; and say, I
hope his Highness will not fail in his appointment with me:
the first midnight after he dies; at the grave-yard corner;
there I'll be, and grin again!
Sailing on, the next land we saw was thickly wooded:
hedged round about by mangrove trees; which growing in
the water, yet lifted high their boughs. Here and there were
shady nooks, half verdure and half water. Fishes rippled,
and canaries sung.
Let us break through, my lord, said Yoomy, and
seek the shore. Its solitudes must prove reviving.
Solitudes they are, cried Mohi.
Peopled but not enlivened, said Babbalanja. Hard
landing here, minstrel! see you not the isle is hedged?
Why, break through, then, said Media. Yillah is
not here.
I mistrusted it, sighed Yoomy; an imprisoned island!
full of uncomplaining woes: like many others we must have
glided by, unheedingly. Yet of them have I heard. This
isle many pass, marking its outward brightness, but
dreaming
vol. ii.P
not of the sad secrets here embowered. Haunt of the
hopeless! In those inland woods brood Mardians who have
tasted Mardi, and found it bitterthe draught so sweet to
others!maidens whose unimparted bloom has cankered in
the bud; and children, with eyes averted from life's dawn
like those new-oped morning blossoms which, foreseeing storms,
turn and close.
Yoomy's rendering of the truth, said Mohi.
Why land, then? and Media. No merry man of
senseno demi-god like me, will do it. Let's away; let's
see all that's pleasant, or that seems so, in our circuit, and,
if possible, shun the sad.
Then we have circled not the round reef wholly, said
Babbalanja, but made of it a segment. For this is far
from being the first sad land, my lord, that we have
slighted
at your instance.
No more. I will have no gloom. A chorus! there,
ye paddlers! spread all your sails; ply paddles; breeze up,
merry winds!
And so, in the saffron sunset, we neared another shore.
A gloomy-looking land! black, beetling crags, rent by
volcanic clefts; ploughed up with water-courses, and dusky
with charred woods. The beach was strewn with scoria
and cinders; in dolorous soughs, a chill wind blew; wails
issued from the caves; and yellow, spooming surges, lashed
the moaning strand.
Shall we land? said Babbalanja.
Not here, cried Yoomy; no Yillah here.
No, said Media. This is another of those lands far
better to avoid.
Know ye not, said Mohi, that here are the mines of
King Klanko, whose scourged slaves, toiling in their pits, so
nigh approach the volcano's bowels, they hear its
rumblings
?
`Yet they must work on,' cries Klanko, `the
mines still yield!' And daily his slaves' bones are brought
above ground, mixed with the metal masses.
Set all sail there, men! away!
My lord, said Babbalanja; still must we shun the
unmitigated evil; and only view the good; or evil so mixed
therewith, the mixture's both?
Half vailed in misty clouds, the harvest-moon now rose;
and in that pale and haggard light, all sat silent; each man
in his own secret mood: best knowing his own thoughts.
CHAPTER LXXIX.
BABBALANJA AT THE FULL OF THE MOON.
Ho
, mortals! Go we to a funeral, that our paddles
seem thus muffled? Up heart, Taji! or does that witch
Hautia haunt thee? Be a demi-god once more, and laugh.
Her flowers are not barbs; and the avengers' arrows are
too blunt to slay. Babbalanja! Mohi! Yoomy! up heart!
up heart!By Oro! I will debark the whole company on
the next land we meet. No tears for me. Ha, ha! let us
laugh. Ho, Vee-Vee! awake; quick, boy,some wine!
and let us make glad, beneath the glad moon. Look! it is
stealing forth from its clouds. Perdition to Hautia! Long
lives, and merry ones to ourselves! Taji, my charming
fellow, here's to you:May your heart be a stone! Ha, ha!
will nobody join me? My laugh is lonely as his who
laughed in his tomb. Come, laugh; will no one quaff
wine, I say? See! the round moon is abroad.
Say you so, my lord? then for one, I am with you;
cried Babbalanja. Fill me a brimmer. Ah! but this
wine leaps through me like a panther. Ay, let us laugh:
let us roar: let us yell! What, if I was sad but just now?
Life is an April day, that both laughs and weeps in a breath.
But whoso is wise, laughs when he can. Men fly from a
groan, but run to a laugh. Vee-Vee! your gourd. My
lord, let me help you. Ah, how it sparkles! Cups, cups,
Vee-Vee, more cups! Here, Taji, take that: Mohi, take
that: Yoomy, take that. And now let us drown away
grief. Ha! ha! the house of mourning, is deserted, though
of old good cheer kept the funeral guests; and so keep I
mine; here I sit by my dead, and replenish your wine cups.
Old Mohi, your cup: Yoomy, yours: ha! ha! let us laugh,
let us scream! Weeds are put off at a fair; no heart
bursts but in secret; it is good to laugh, though the laugh
be hollow; and wise to make merry, now and for aye.
Laugh, and make friends: weep, and they go. Women
sob, and are rid of their grief: men laugh, and retain it.
There is laughter in heaven, and laughter in hell. And a
deep thought whose language is laughter. Though wisdom
be wedded to woe, though the way thereto is by tears, yet
all ends in a shout. But wisdom wears no weeds; woe is
more merry than mirth; 'tis a shallow grief that is sad.
Ha! ha! how demoniacs shout; how all skeletons grin;
we all die with a rattle. Laugh! laugh! Are the
cherubim
grave? Humor, thy laugh is divine; whence,
mirthmaking
idiots have been revered; and therefore may I.
Ho! let us be gay, if it be only for an hour, and Death
hand us the goblet. Vee-Vee! bring on your gourds! Let
us pledge each other in bumpers!let us laugh, laugh, laugh
it out to the last. All sages have laughed,let us;
Bardianna
laughed,let us; Demorkriti laughed,let us: Amoree
laughed,let us; Rabeelee roared,let us; the hyenas
grin, the jackals yell,let us.But you don't laugh, my
lord? laugh away!
No, thank you, Azzageddi, not after that infernal
fashion
;
better weep.
He makes me crawl all over, as if I were an ant-hill,
said Mohi.
He's mad, mad, mad! cried Yoomy.
Ay, mad, mad, mad!mad as the mad fiend that
rides me!But come, sweet minstrel, wilt list to a song?
We madmen are all poets, you know:Ha! ha!
Stars laugh in the sky:
Oh fugle-fi!
The waves dimple below:
Oh fugle-fo!
The wind strikes her dulcimers; the groves give a shout;
the hurricane is only an hysterical laugh; and the lightning
that blasts, blasts only in play. We must laugh or we die;
to laugh is to live. Not to laugh is to have the tetanus.
Will you weep? then laugh while you weep. For mirth
and sorrow are kin; are published by identical nerves. Go,
Yoomy: go study anatomy: there is much to be learned
from the dead, more than you may learn from the living,
and I am dead though I live; and as soon dissect myself as
another; I curiously look into my secrets: and grope under
my ribs. I have found that the heart is not whole, but
divided; that it seeks a soft cushion whereon to repose;
that it vitalizes the blood; which else were weaker than
water: I have found that we can not live without hearts;
though the heartless live longest. Yet hug your hearts, ye
handful that have them; 'tis a blessed inheritance! Thus,
thus, my lord, I run on; from one pole to the other; from
this thing to that. But so the great world goes round, and
in one somerset, shows the sun twenty-five thousand miles
of a landscape!
At that instant, down went the fiery full-moon, and the
Dog-Star; and far down into Media, a Tivoli of wine.
CHAPTER LXXX.
MORNING.
Life
or death, weal or woe, the sun stays not his course.
On: over battle-field and bower; over tower, and town,
he speeds,peers in at births, and death-beds; lights up
cathedral, mosque, and pagan shrine;laughing over all;
a very Democritus in the sky; and in one brief day sees
more than any pilgrim in a century's round.
So, the sun; nearer heaven than we:with what mind,
then, may blessed Oro downward look.
It was a purple, red, and yellow East;streaked, and
crossed. And down from breezy mountains, robust and
ruddy Morning came,a plaided Highlander, waving his
plumed bonnet to the isles.
Over the neighboring groves the larks soared high; and
soaring, sang in jubilees; while across our bows, between
two isles, a mighty moose swam stately as a seventy-four;
and backward tossed his antlered wilderness in air.
Just bounding from fresh morning groves, with the brine
he mixed the dew of leaves,his antlers dripping on the
swell, that rippled before his brown and bow-like chest.
Five hundred thousand centuries since, said Babbalanja,
this same sight was seen. With Oro, the sun is co-eternal;
and the same life that moves that moose, animates alike the
sun and Oro. All are parts of One. In me, in
me
, flit
thoughts participated by the beings peopling all the stars.
Saturn, and Mercury, and Mardi, are brothers, one and all;
and across their orbits, to each other talk, like souls. Of
these things what chapters might be writ! Oh! that flesh
can not keep pace with spirit. Oh! that these myriad
germ-dramas in me, should so perish hourly, for lack of
power mechanic.Worlds pass worlds in space, as men,
men,in thoroughfares; and after periods of thousand years,
cry:Well met, my friend, again!To me to
me
, they
talk in mystic music; I hear them think through all their
zones.Hail, furthest worlds! and all the beauteous beings
in ye! Fan me, sweet Zenora! with thy twilight wings!
Ho! let's voyage to Aldebaran.Ha! indeed, a ruddy
world! What a buoyant air! Not like to Mardi, this.
Ruby columns: minarets of amethyst: diamond domes!
Who is this?a god? What a lake-like brow!
transparent
as the morning air. I see his thoughts like worlds
revolvingand in his eyeslike unto heavenssoft falling
stars are shooting.How these thousand passing wings
winnow away my breath:I faint:back, back to some
small asteroid.Sweet being! if, by Mardian word I may
address theespeak!`I bear a soul in germ within me; I
feel the first, faint trembling, like to a harp-string, vibrate
in my inmost being. Kill me, and generations die.'So,
of old, the unbegotten lived within the virgin; who then
loved her God, as new-made mothers their babes ere born.
Oh, Alma, Alma, Alma!Fangs off, fiend!will that
name ever lash thee into foam?Smite not my face so,
forked flames!
Babbalanja! Babbalanja! rouse, man! rouse! Art in
hell and damned, that thy sinews so snake-like coil and twist
all over thee? Thy brow is black as Ops! Turn, turn!
see yonder moose!
Hail! mighty brute!thou feelest not these things:
never canst
thou
be damned. Moose! would thy soul were
mine; for if that scorched thing, mine, be immortalso
thine; and thy life hath not the consciousness of death. I
read profound placiditydeepmillionviolet fathoms
down, in that soft, pathetic, woman eye! What is man's
shrunk form to thine, thou woodland majesty?Moose,
moose!my soul is shot againOh, Oro! Oro!
He falls! cried Media.
Mark the agony in his waning eye, said Yoomy;
alas, poor Babbalanja! Is this thing of madness conscious
to thyself? If ever thou art sane again, wilt thou have
reminiscences
?
Take my robe:here, I strip me to cover
thee and all thy woes. Oro! by this, thy being's side, I
kneel:grant death or happiness to Babbalanja!
P*
CHAPTER LXXXI.
L'ULTIMA SERA.
Thus
far, through myriad islands, had we searched: of
all, no one pen may write: least, mine;and still no trace
of Yillah.
But though my hopes revived not from their ashes; yet,
so much of Mardi had we searched, it seemed as if the long
pursuit must, ere many moons, be ended; whether for weal
or woe, my frenzy sometimes recked not.
After its first fair morning flushings, all that day was
overcast. We sailed upon an angry sea, beneath an angry
sky. Deep scowled on deep; and in dun vapors, the
blinded
sun went down, unseen; though full toward the West
our three prows were pointed; steadfast as three printed
points upon the compass-card.
When we set sail from Odo, 'twas a glorious morn in
spring, said Yoomy; toward the rising sun we steered.
But now, beneath autumnal night-clouds, we hasten to its
setting.
How now? cried Media; why is the minstrel
mournful?He whose place it is to chase away
despondency
:
not be its minister.
Ah, my lord, so
thou
thinkest. But better can my
verses soothe the sad, than make them light of heart.
Nor are we minstrels so gay of soul as Mardi deems us.
The brook that sings the sweetest, murmurs through the
loneliest woods:
The isles hold thee not, thou departed!
From thy bower, now issues no lay:
In vain we recall perished warblings:
Spring birds, to far climes, wing their way!
As Yoomy thus sang; unmindful of the lay, with paddle
plying, in low, pleasant tones, thus hummed to himself our
bowsman, a gamesome wight:
Ho! merrily ho! we paddlers sail!
Ho! over sea-dingle, and dale!
Our pulses fly,
Our hearts beat high,
Ho! merrily, merrily, ho!
But a sudden splash, and a shrill, gurgling sound, like
that of a fountain subsiding, now broke upon the air. Then
all was still, save the rush of the waves by our keels.
Save him! Put back!
From his elevated seat, the merry bowsman, too gleefully
reaching forward, had fallen into the lagoon.
With all haste, our speeding canoes were reversed; but
not till we had darted in upon another darkness than that
in which the bowsman fell.
As, blindly, we groped back, deep Night dived deeper
down in the sea.
Drop paddles all, and list.
Holding their breath, over the six gunwales all now leaned;
but the only moans were the wind's.
Long time we lay thus; then slowly crossed and recrossed
our track, almost hopeless; but yet loth to leave him who,
with a song in his mouth, died and was buried in a breath.
Let us away, said Mediawhy seek more? He is
gone.
Ay, gone, said Babbalanja, and whither? But a
moment since, he was among us: now, the fixed stars are
not more remote than he. So far off, can he live? Oh,
Oro! this death thou ordainest, unmans the manliest. Say
not nay, my lord. Let us not speak behind Death's back.
Hard and horrible is it to die: blindfold to leap from life's
verge! But thus, in clouds of dust, and with a trampling
as of hoofs, the generations disappear; death driving them
all into his treacherous fold, as wild Indians the bison herds.
Nay, nay, Death is Life's last despair. Hard and horrible is
it to die. Oro himself, in Alma, died not without a groan.
Yet why, why live? Life is wearisome to all: the same
dull round. Day and night, summer and winter, round
about us revolving for aye. One moment lived, is a life.
No new stars appear in the sky; no new lights in the soul.
Yet, of changes there are many. For though, with rapt
sight, in childhood, we behold many strange things beneath
the moon, and all Mardi looks a tented fairhow soon every
thing fades. All of us, in our very bodies, outlive our own
selves. I think of green youth as of a merry playmate
departed; and to shake hands, and be pleasant with my old
age, seems in prospect even harder, than to draw a cold
stranger to my bosom. But old age is not for me. I am
not of the stuff that grows old. This Mardi is not our home.
Up and down we wander, like exiles transported to a planet
afar:'tis not the world
we
were born in; not the world
once so lightsome and gay; not the world where we once
merrily danced, dined, and supped; and wooed, and wedded
our long-buried wives. Then let us depart. But whither?
We push ourselves forwardthen, start back in affright.
Essay it again, and flee. Hard to live; hard to die;
intolerable
suspense! But the grim despot at last interposes;
and with a viper in our winding-sheets, we are dropped in
the sea.
To me, said Mohi, his gray locks damp with
night-dews
,
death's dark defile at times seems at hand, with no
voice to cheer. That all have died, makes it not easier for
me to depart. And that many have been quenched in
infancy seems a mercy to the slow perishing of my old age,
limb by limb and sense by sense. I have long been the
tomb of my youth. And more has died out of me, already,
than remains for the last death to finish. Babbalanja says
truth. In childhood, death stirred me not; in middle age,
it pursued me like a prowling bandit on the road; now,
grown an old man, it boldly leads the way; and ushers me
on; and turns round upon me its skeleton gaze: poisoning
the last solaces of life. Maramma but adds to my gloom.
Death! death! cried Yoomy, must I be not, and
millions be? Must I go, and the flowers still bloom? Oh,
I have marked what it is to be dead;how shouting boys,
of holidays, hide-and-seek among the tombs, which must
hide all seekers at last.
Clouds on clouds! cried Media, but away with them
all! Why not leap your graves, while ye may? Time
to die, when death comes, without dying by inches. 'Tis
no death, to die; the only death is the fear of it. I, a
demi-god, fear death not.
But when the jackals howl round you? said
Babbalanja
.
Drive them off! Die the demi-god's death! On his
last couch of crossed spears, my brave old sire cried, `Wine,
wine; strike up, conch and cymbal; let the king die to
martial melodies!'
More valiant dying, than dead, said Babbalanja.
Our end of the winding procession resounds with music,
and flaunts with banners with brave devices:`Cheer up!'
`Fear not!' `Millions have died before!'but in the
endless
van, not a pennon streams; all there, is silent and
solemn. The last wisdom is dumb.
Silence ensued; during which, each dip of the paddles in
the now calm water, fell full and long upon the ear.
Anon, lifting his head, Babbalanja thus:Yillah still
eludes us. And in all this tour of Mardi, how little have
we found to fill the heart with peace: how much to slaughter
all our yearnings.
Croak no more, raven! cried Media. Mardi is full
of spring-time sights, and jubilee sounds. I never was sad
in my life.
But for thy one laugh, my lord, how many groans!
Were all happy, or all miserable,more tolerable then, than
as it is. But happiness and misery are so broadly marked,
that this Mardi may be the retributive future of some
forgotten
past.Yet vain our surmises. Still vainer to say,
that all Mardi is but a means to an end; that this life is a
state of probation: that evil is but permitted for a term;
that for specified ages a rebel angel is viceroy.Nay, nay.
Oro delegates his scepter to none; in his everlasting reign
there are no interregnums; and Time is Eternity; and we
live in Eternity now. Yet, some tell of a hereafter, where
all the mysteries of life will be over; and the sufferings of
the virtuous recompensed. Oro is just, they say.Then
always,now, and evermore. But to make restitution
implies
a wrong; and Oro can do no wrong. Yet what
seems evil to us, may be good to him. If he fears not, nor
hopes,he has no other passion; no ends, no purposes.
He lives content; all ends are compassed in Him; He
has no past, no future; He is the everlasting now; which
is an everlasting calm; and things that are,have been,
will be. This gloom's enough. But hoot! hoot! the
night-owl ranges through the woodlands of Maramma; its
dismal notes pervade our lives; and when we would fain
depart in peace, that bird flies on before:cloud-like,
eclipsing
our setting suns, and filling the air with dolor.
Too true! cried Yoomy. Our calms must come by
storms. Like helmless vessels, tempest-tossed, our only
anchorage is when we founder.
Our beginnings, murmured Mohi, are lost in clouds;
we live in darkness all our days, and perish without an
end.
Croak on, cowards! cried Media, and fly before the
hideous phantoms that pursue ye.
No coward he, who hunted, turns and finds no foe to
fight, said Babbalanja. Like the stag, whose brow is
beat with wings of hawks, perched in his heavenward
antlers
;
so I, blinded, goaded, headlong, rush! this way and
that; nor knowing whither; one forest wide around!
CHAPTER LXXXII.
THEY SAIL FROM NIGHT TO DAY.
Ere
long the three canoes lurched heavily in a violent
swell. Like palls, the clouds swept to and fro, hooding the
gibbering winds. At every head-beat wave, our arching
prows reared up, and shuddered; the night ran out in rain.
Whither to turn we knew not; nor what haven to gain;
so dense the darkness.
But at last, the storm was over. Our shattered prows
seemed gilded. Day dawned; and from his golden vases
poured red wine upon the waters.
That flushed tide rippled toward us; floating from the
east, a lone canoe; in which, there sat a mild old man; a
palm-bough in his hand: a bird's beak, holding amaranth
and myrtles, his slender prow.
Alma's blessing upon ye, voyagers! ye look
storm-worn
.
The storm we have survived, old man; and many
more, we yet must ride, said Babbalanja.
The sun is risen; and all is well again. We but need
to repair our prows, said Media.
Then, turn aside to Serenia, a pleasant isle, where all
are welcome; where many storm-worn rovers land at last
to dwell.
Serenia? said Babbalanja; methinks Serenia is that
land of enthusiasts, of which we hear, my lord; where
Mardians
pretend to the unnatural conjunction of reason with
things revealed; where Alma, they say, is restored to his
divine original; where, deriving their principles from the
same sources whence flow the persecutions of Maramma,
men strive to live together in gentle bonds of peace and
charity;folly! folly!
Ay, said Media, much is said of those people of
Serenia
;
but their social fabric must soon fall to pieces; it is
based upon the idlest of theories. Thanks for thy courtesy,
old man, but we care not to visit thy isle. Our voyage has
an object, which, something tells me, will not be gained by
touching at thy shores. Elsewhere we may refit.
Farewell
!
'Tis breezing; set the sails! Farewell, old man.
Nay, nay! think again; the distance is but small; the
wind fair,but 'tis ever so, thither;come: we, people of
Serenia, are most anxious to be seen of Mardi; so that if
our manner of life seem good, all Mardi may live as we.
In blessed Alma's name, I pray ye, come!
Shall we then, my lord?
Lead on, old man! We will e'en see this wondrous isle.
So, guided by the venerable stranger, by noon we descried
an island blooming with bright savannas, and pensive with
peaceful groves.
Wafted from this shore, came balm of flowers, and melody
of birds: a thousand summer sounds and odors. The
dimpled
tide sang round our splintered prows; the sun was high
in heaven, and the waters were deep below.
The land of Love! the old man murmured, as we
neared the beach, where innumerable shells were gently
rolling in the playful surf, and murmuring from their
tuneful
valves. Behind, another, and a verdant surf played
against lofty banks of leaves; where the breeze, likewise,
found its shore.
And now, emerging from beneath the trees, there came a
goodly multitude in flowing robes; palm-branches in their
hands; and as they came, they sang:
Hail! voyagers, hail!
Whence e'er ye come, where'er ye rove,
No calmer strand,
No sweeter land,
Will e'er ye view, than the Land of Love!
Hail! voyagers, hail!
To these, our shores, soft gales invite:
The palm plumes wave,
The billows lave,
And hither point fix'd stars of light!
Hail! voyagers, hail!
Think not our groves wide brood with gloom;
In this, our isle,
Bright flowers smile:
Full urns, rose-heaped, these valleys bloom.
Hail! voyagers, hail!
Be not deceived; renounce vain things;
Ye may not find
A tranquil mind,
Though hence ye sail with swiftest wings.
Hail! voyagers, hail!
Time flies full fast; life soon is o'er;
And ye may mourn,
That hither borne,
Ye left behind our pleasant shore.
CHAPTER LXXXIII.
THEY LAND.
The
song was ended; and as we gained the strand, the
crowd embraced us; and called us brothers; ourselves and
our humblest attendants.
Call ye us brothers, whom ere now ye never saw?
Even so, said the old man, is not Oro the father of
all? Then, are we not brothers? Thus Alma, the
master, hath commanded.
This was not our reception in Maramma, said Media,
the appointed place of Alma; where his precepts are
preserved
.
No, no, said Babbalanja; old man! your lesson of
brotherhood was learned elsewhere than from Alma; for in
Maramma and in all its tributary isles true brotherhood
there is none. Even in the Holy Island many are
oppressed
;
for heresies, many murdered; and thousands perish
beneath
the altars, groaning with offerings that might relieve
them.
Alas! too true. But I beseech ye, judge not Alma by
all those who profess his faith. Hast thou thyself his records
searched?
Fully, I have not. So long, even from my infancy,
have I witnessed the wrongs committed in his name; the
sins and inconsistencies of his followers; that thinking all
evil must flow from a congenial fountain, I have scorned to
study the whole record of your Master's life. By parts I
only know it.
Ah! baneful error! But thus is it, brothers! that the
wisest are set against the Truth, because of those who wrest
it from itself.
Do ye then claim to live what your Master hath spoken?
Are your precepts practices?
Nothing do we claim: we but earnestly endeavor.
Tell me not of your endeavors, but of your life. What
hope for the fatherless among ye?
Adopted as a son.
Of one poor, and naked?
Clothed, and he wants for naught.
If ungrateful, he smite you?
Still we feed and clothe him.
If yet an ingrate?
Long, he can not be; for Love is a fervent fire.
But what, if widely he dissent from your belief in
Alma;then, surely, ye must cast him forth?
No, no; we will remember, that if he dissent from us,
we then equally dissent from him; and men's faculties are
Oro-given. Nor will we say that he is wrong, and we are
right; for this we know not, absolutely. But we care not
for men's words; we look for creeds in actions; which are
the truthful symbols of the things within. He who hourly
prays to Alma, but lives not up to world-wide love and
charitythat man is more an unbeliever than he who
verbally
rejects the Master, but does his bidding. Our lives are
our Amens.
But some say that what your Alma teaches is wholly
newa revelation of things before unimagined, even by the
poets. To do his bidding, then, some new faculty must be
vouchsafed, whereby to apprehend aright.
So have I always thought, said Mohi.
If Alma teaches love, I want no gift to learn, said
Yoomy.
All that is vital in the Master's faith, lived here in
Mardi, and in humble dells was practiced, long previous to
the Master's coming. But never before was virtue so lifted
up among us, that all might see; never before did rays from
heaven descend to glorify it. But are Truth, Justice, and
Love, the revelations of Alma alone? Were they never
heard of till he came? Oh! Alma but opens unto us our
own hearts. Were his precepts strange we would recoil
not one feeling would respond; whereas, once hearkened to, our
souls embrace them as with the instinctive tendrils of a vine.
But, said Babbalanja, since Alma, they say, was
solely intent upon the things of the Mardi to comewhich
to all, must seem uncertainof what benefit his precepts
for the daily lives led here?
Would! would that Alma might once more descend!
Brother! were the turf our everlasting pillow, still would
the Master's faith answer a blessed end;making us more
truly happy
here. That
is the first and chief result; for
holy here, we must be holy elsewhere. 'Tis Mardi, to
which loved Alma gives his laws; not Paradise.
Full soon will I be testing all these things, murmured
Mohi.
Old man, said Media, thy years and Mohi's lead ye
both to dwell upon the unknown future. But speak to me
of other themes. Tell me of this island and its people.
From all I have heard, and now behold, I gather that here,
there dwells no king; that ye are left to yourselves; and
that this mystic Love, ye speak of, is your ruler. Is it so?
Then, are ye full as visionary, as Mardi rumors. And
though for a time, ye may have prospered,long, ye can
not be, without some sharp lesson to convince ye, that your
faith in Mardian virtue is entirely vain.
Truth. We have no king; for Alma's precepts rebuke
the arrogance of place and power. He is the tribune of
mankind; nor will his true faith be universal Mardi's, till
our whole race is kingless. But think not we believe in
man's perfection. Yet, against all good, he is not
absolutely
set. In his heart, there is a germ.
That
we seek to
foster. To
that
we cling; else, all were hopeless!
Your social state?
It is imperfect; and long must so remain. But we
make not the miserable many support the happy few. Nor
by annulling reason's laws, seek to breed equality, by
breeding
anarchy. In all things, equality is not for all. Each
has his own. Some have wider groves of palms than others;
fare better; dwell in more tasteful arbors; oftener renew
their fragrant thatch. Such differences must be. But none
starve outright, while others feast. By the abounding, the
needy are supplied. Yet not by statute, but from dictates,
born half dormant in us, and warmed into life by Alma.
Those dictates we but follow in all we do; we are not
dragged to righteousness; but go running. Nor do we
live in common. For vice and virtue blindly mingled, form
a union where vice too often proves the alkali. The vicious
we make dwell apart, until reclaimed. And reclaimed they
soon must be, since every thing invites. The sin of others
rests not upon our heads: none we drive to crime. Our
laws are not of vengeance bred, but Love and Alma.
Fine poetry all this, said Babbalanja, but not so
new. Oft do they warble thus in bland Maramma!
It sounds famously, old man! said Media, but men
are men. Some must starve; some be scourged.Your
doctrines are impracticable.
And are not these things enjoined by Alma? And
would Alma inculcate the impossible? of what merit, his
precepts, unless they may be practiced? But, I beseech ye,
speak no more of Maramma. Alas! did Alma revisit
Mardi
,
think you, it would be among those Morais he would lay
his head?
No, no, said Babbalanja, as an intruder he came;
and an intruder would he be this day. On all sides, would
he jar our social systems.
Not here, not here! Rather would we welcome Alma
hungry and athirst, than though he came floating hither on
the wings of seraphs; the blazing zodiac his diadem! In
all his aspects we adore him; needing no pomp and power
to kindle worship. Though he came from Oro; though he
did miracles; though through him is life;not for these
things alone, do we thus love him. We love him from
an instinct in us;a fond, filial, reverential feeling. And
this would yet stir in our souls, were death our end; and
Alma incapable of befriending us. We love him because
we do.
Is this man divine? murmured Babbalanja. But
thou speakest most earnestly of adoring Alma:I see no
temples in your groves.
Because this isle is all one temple to his praise; every
leaf is consecrated his. We fix not Alma here and there;
and say,`those groves for Him, and these broad fields for
us.' It is all his own; and we ourselves; our every hour
of life; and all we are, and have.
Then, ye forever fast and pray; and stand and sing;
as at long intervals the censer-bearers in Maramma
supplicate
their gods.
Alma forbid! We never fast; our aspirations are our
prayers; our lives are worship. And when we laugh, with
human joy at human things,
then
do we most sound great
Oro's praise, and prove the merit of sweet Alma's love!
Our love in Alma makes us glad, not sad. Ye speak of
temples;behold! 'tis by not building
them
, that we widen
charity among us. The treasures which, in the islands
round about, are lavished on a thousand fanes;with these
we every day relieve the Master's suffering disciples. In
Mardi, Alma preached in open fields,and must his
worshipers
have palaces?
No temples, then no priests; said Babbalanja, for
few priests will enter where lordly arches form not the
portal.
We have no priests, but one; and he is Alma's self.
We have his precepts: we seek no comments but our
hearts.
But without priests and temples, how long will flourish
this your faith? said Media.
For many ages has not this faith lived, in spite of
priests and temples? and shall it not survive them? What
we believe, we hold divine; and things divine endure
forever
.
But how enlarge your bounds? how convert the vicious,
without persuasion of some special seers? Must your
religion
go hand in hand with all things secular?
We hold not, that one man's words should be a gospel
to the rest; but that Alma's words should be a gospel to us
all. And not by precepts would we have some few
endeavor
to persuade; but all, by practice, fix convictions, that
the life we lead is the life for all. We are apostles, every
one. Where'er we go, our faith we carry in our hands, and
hearts. It is our chiefest joy. We do not put it wide
away six days out of seven; and then, assume it. In it
we all exult, and joy; as that which makes us happy here;
as that, without which, we could be happy nowhere; as
something meant for this time present, and henceforth for
aye. It is our vital mode of being; not an incident. And
when we die, this faith shall be our pillow; and when we
rise, our staff; and at the end, our crown. For we are all
immortal. Here, Alma joins with our own hearts,
confirming
nature's promptings.
How eloquent he is! murmured Babbalanja. Some
black cloud seems floating from me. I begin to see. I
come out in light. The sharp fang tears me less. The
forked flames wane. My soul sets back like ocean streams,
that sudden change their flow. Have I been sane?
Quickened
in me is a hope. But pray you, old mansay on
methinks, that in your faith must be much that jars with
reason.
No, brother! Right-reason, and Alma, are the same;
else Alma, not reason, would we reject. The Master's great
command is Love; and here do all things wise, and all
things good, unite. Love is all in all. The more we love,
the more we know; and so reversed. Oro we love; this
isle; and our wide arms embrace all Mardi like its reef.
How can we err, thus feeling? We hear loved Alma's
pleading, prompting voice, in every breeze, in every leaf;
we see his earnest eye in every star and flower.
Poetry! cried Yoomy, and poetry is truth! He
stirs me.
When Alma dwelt in Mardi, 'twas with the poor and
friendless. He fed the famishing; he healed the sick; he
bound up wounds. For every precept that he spoke, he did
ten thousand mercies. And Alma is our loved example.
Sure, all this is in the histories! said Mohi, starting.
But not alone to poor and friendless, did Alma wend
his charitable way. From lowly places, he looked up; and
long invoked great chieftains in their state; and told them all
their pride was vanity; and bade them ask their souls. `In
me
,' he cried, `is that heart of mild content, which in vain
ye seek in rank and title. I am Love: love ye then me.'
Cease, cease, old man! cried Media; thou movest
me beyond my seeming. What thoughts are these? Have
done! Wouldst thou unking me?
Alma is for all; for high and low. Like heaven's own
breeze, he lifts the lily from its lowly stem, and sweeps,
reviving, through the palmy groves. High thoughts he
gives the sage, and humble trust the simple. Be the
measure
what it may, his grace doth fill it to the brim. He
lays the lashings of the soul's wild aspirations after things
unseen; oil he poureth on the waters; and stars come out
of night's black concave at his great command. In him is
hope for all; for all, unbounded joys. Fast locked in his
loved clasp, no doubts dismay. He opes the eye of faith,
and shuts the eye of fear. He is all we pray for, and
beyond
;
all, that in the wildest hour of ecstasy, rapt fancy
paints in bright Auroras upon the soul's wide, boundless
Orient!
Oh, Alma, Alma! prince divine! cried Babbalanja,
sinking on his kneesin
thee
, at last, I find repose. Hope
perches in my heart a dove;a thousand rays illume;
all Heaven's a sun. Gone, gone! are all distracting doubts.
Love and Alma now prevail. I see with other eyes:
Are these my hands? What wild, wild dreams were mine;
I have been mad. Some things there are, we must not
think of. Beyond one obvious mark, all human lore is vain.
Where have I lived till now? Had dark Maramma's zealot
tribe but murmured to me as this old man, long since had I
been wise! Reason no longer domineers; but still doth
speak. All I have said ere this, that wars with Alma's
precepts, I here recant. Here I kneel, and own great Oro
and his sovereign son.
And here another kneels and prays, cried Yoomy.
In Alma all my dreams are found, my inner longings for
the Love supreme, that prompts my every verse, Summer
is in my soul.
Nor now, too late for these gray hairs, cried Mohi,
with devotion. Alma, thy breath is on my soul. I see
bright light.
No more a demigod, cried Media, but a subject to
our common chief. No more shall dismal cries be heard
from Odo's groves. Alma, I am thine.
With swimming eyes the old man kneeled; and round
him grouped king, sage, gray hairs, and youth.
There, as they kneeled, and as the old man blessed them,
the setting sun burst forth from mists, gilded the island
round about, shed rays upon their heads, and went down in
a gloryall the East radiant with red burnings, like an
altar-fire.
vol. ii.Q
CHAPTER LXXXIV.
BABBALANJA RELATES TO THEM A VISION.
Leaving
Babbalanja in the old man's bower, deep in
meditation; thoughtfully we strolled along the beach,
inspiring
the musky, midnight air; the tropical stars glistening in
heaven, like drops of dew among violets.
The waves were phosphorescent, and laved the beach
with a fire that cooled it.
Returning, we espied Babbalanja advancing in his
snowwhite
mantle. The fiery tide was ebbing; and in the soft,
moist sand, at every step, he left a lustrous foot-print.
Sweet friends! this isle is full of mysteries, he said.
I have dreamed of wondrous things. After I had laid me
down, thought pressed hard upon me. By my eyes passed
pageant visions. I started at a low, strange melody, deep
in my inmost soul. At last, methought my eyes were fixed
on heaven; and there, I saw a shining spot, unlike a star.
Thwarting the sky, it grew, and grew, descending; till
bright wings were visible: between them, a pensive face
angelic, downward beaming; and, for one golden moment,
gauze-vailed in spangled Berenice's Locks.
Then, as white flame from yellow, out from that starry
cluster it emerged; and brushed the astral Crosses, Crowns,
and Cups. And as in violet, tropic seas, ships leave a
radiant-white, and fire-fly wake; so, in long extension
tapering, behind the vision, gleamed another Milky-Way.
Strange throbbings seized me; my soul tossed on its
own tides. But soon the inward harmony bounded in
exulting
choral strains. I heard a feathery rush; and straight
beheld a form, traced all over with veins of vivid light.
The vision undulated round me.
`Oh! Spirit! angel! god! whate'er thou art,'I cried,
`leave me; I am but man.'
Then, I heard a low, sad sound,no voice. It said,
or breathed upon me,`Thou hast proved the grace of
Alma: tell me what thou'st learned.'
Silent replied my soul, for voice was gone,`This have
I learned, oh! spirit!In things mysterious, to seek no
more; but rest content, with knowing naught but Love.'
`Blessed art thou for that: thrice blessed,' then I heard,
`and since humility is thine, thou art one apt to learn.
That which thy own wisdom could not find, thy ignorance
confessed shall gain. Come, and see new things.'
Once more it undulated round me; its lightning wings
grew dim; nearer, nearer; till I felt a shock electric,and
nested 'neath its wing.
We clove the air; passed systems, suns, and moons:
what seem from Mardi's isles, the glow-worm stars.
By distant fleets of worlds we sped, as voyagers pass far
sails at sea, and hail them not. Foam played before them
as they darted on; wild music was their wake; and many
tracks of sound we crossed, where worlds had sailed before.
Soon, we gained a point, where a new heaven was seen;
whence all our firmament seemed one nebula. Its glories
burned like thousand steadfast-flaming lights.
Here hived the worlds in swarms: and gave forth
sweets ineffable.
We lighted on a ring, circling a space, where mornings
seemed forever dawning over worlds unlike.
`Here,' I heard, `thou viewest thy Mardi's Heaven.
Herein each world is portioned.'
As he who climbs to mountain tops pants hard for
breath; so panted I for Mardi's grosser air. But that
which caused my flesh to faint, was new vitality to my
soul. My eyes swept over all before me. The spheres
were plain as villages that dot a landscape. I saw most
beauteous forms, yet like our own. Strange sounds I heard
of gladness that seemed mixed with sadness:a low, sweet
harmony of both. Else, I know not how to phrase what
never man but me e'er heard.
`In these blest souls are blent,' my guide discoursed,
`far higher thoughts, and sweeter plaints than thine. Rude
joy were discord here. And as a sudden shout in thy
hushed mountain-passes brings down the awful avalanche;
so one note of laughter here, might start some white and
silent world.'
Then low I murmured:`Is their's, oh guide! no
happiness supreme? their state still mixed? Sigh these
yet to know? Can these sin?'
Then I heard:`No mind but Oro's can know all; no
mind that knows not all can be content; content alone
approximates to happiness. Holiness comes by wisdom;
and it is because great Oro is supremely wise, that He's
supremely holy. But as perfect wisdom can be only Oro's;
so, perfect holiness is his alone. And whoso is otherwise
than perfect in his holiness, is liable to sin.
`And though death gave these beings knowledge, it
also opened other mysteries, which they pant to know, and
yet may learn. And still they fear the thing of evil;
though for them, 'tis hard to fall. Thus hoping and thus
fearing, then, their's is no state complete. And since Oro
is past finding out, and mysteries ever open into mysteries
beyond; so, though these beings will for aye progress in
wisdom and in good; yet, will they never gain a fixed
beatitude
.
Know, then, oh mortal Mardian! that when
translated
hither, thou wilt but put off lowly temporal pinings,
for angel and eternal aspirations. Start not: thy human
joy hath here no place: no name.
Still, I mournful mused; then said:`Many Mardians
live, who have no aptitude for Mardian lives of thought:
how then endure more earnest, everlasting, meditations?'
`Such have their place,' I heard.
`Then low I moaned, `And what, oh! guide! of those
who, living thoughtless lives of sin, die unregenerate; no
service done to Oro or to Mardian?'
`They, too, have their place,' I heard; `but 'tis not
here. And Mardian! know, that as your Mardian lives
are long preserved through strict obedience to the organic
law, so are your spiritual lives prolonged by fast keeping of
the law of mind. Sin is death.'
`Ah, then,' yet lower moan made I; `and why create
the germs that sin and suffer, but to perish?'
`That,' breathed my guide; `is the last mystery which
underlieth all the rest. Archangel may not fathom it; that
makes of Oro the everlasting mystery he is; that to divulge,
were to make equal to himself in knowledge all the souls
that are; that mystery Oro guards; and none but him may
know.'
Alas! were it recalled, no words have I to tell of all that
now my guide discoursed, concerning things unsearchable to
us. My sixth sense which he opened, sleeps again, with all
the wisdom that it gained.
Time passed; it seemed a moment, might have been an
age; when from high in the golden haze that canopied this
heaven, another angel came; its vans like East and West;
a sunrise one, sunset the other. As silver-fish in vases, so,
in his azure eyes swam tears unshed.
Quick my guide close nested me; through its veins the
waning light throbbed hard.
`Oh, spirit! archangel! god! whate'er thou art,' it
breathed; `leave me: I am but blessed, not glorified.'
So saying, as down from doves, from its wings dropped
sounds. Still nesting me, it crouched its plumes.
Then, in a snow of softest syllables, thus breathed the
greater and more beautiful:`From far away, in fields
beyond thy ken, I heard thy fond discourse with this lone
Mardian. It pleased me well; for thy humility was
manifest
;
no arrogance of knowing. Come
thou
and learn new
things.'
And straight it overarched us with its plumes; which,
then, down-sweeping, bore us up to regions where my first guide
had sunk, but for the power that buoyed us, trembling, both.
My eyes did wane, like moons eclipsed in overwhelming
dawns: such radiance was around; such vermeil light, born
of no sun, but pervading all the scene. Transparent,
fleckless
,
calm, all glowed one flame.
Then said the greater guide:`This is the night of all
ye here beholdits day ye could not bide. Your utmost
heaven is far below.'
Abashed, smote down, I, quaking, upward gazed; where,
to and fro, the spirits sailed, like broad-winged crimson-dyed
flamingos, spiraling in sunset-clouds. But a sadness
glorified
,
deep-fringed their mystic temples, crowned with weeping
halos, bird-like, floating o'er them, wheresoe'er they roamed.
Sights and odors blended. As when new-morning winds,
in summer's prime, blow down from hanging gardens,
wafting
sweets that never pall; so, from those flowery pinions,
at every motion, came a flood of fragrance.
And now the spirits twain discoursed of things, whose
very terms, to me, were dark. But my first guide grew
wise. For me, I could but blankly list; yet comprehended
naught; and, like the fish that's mocked with wings, and
vainly seeks to fly;again I sought my lower element.
As poised, we hung in this rapt ether, a sudden
trembling
seized the four wings now folding me. And afar off,
in zones still upward reaching, suns' orbits off, I, tranced,
beheld an awful glory. Sphere in sphere, it burned:the
one Shekinah! The air was flaked with fire;deep in
which, fell showers of silvery globes, tears magnified
braiding
the flame with rainbows. I heard a sound; but not for
me, nor my first guide, was that unutterable utterance.
Then, my second guide was swept aloft, as rises a cloud of
red-dyed leaves in autumn whirlwinds.
Fast clasping me, the other drooped, and, instant, sank,
as in a vacuum; myriad suns' diameters in a breath;my
five senses merged in one, of falling; till we gained the
nether sky, descending still.
Then strange thingssoft, sad, and faint, I saw or
heard; as, when, in sunny, summer seas, down, down, you
dive, starting at pensive phantoms, that you can not fix.
`These,' breathed my guide, `are spirits in their
essences
;
sad, even in undevelopment. With these, all space
is peopled:all the air is vital with intelligence, which
seeks embodiment. This it is, that unbeknown to
Mardians
,
causes them to strangely start in solitudes of night,
and in the fixed flood of their enchanted noons. From
hence, are formed your mortal souls; and all those sad and
shadowy dreams, and boundless thoughts man hath, are
vague remembrances of the time when the soul's sad germ,
wide wandered through these realms. And hence it is,
that when ye Mardians feel most sad, then ye feel most
immortal.
Like a spark new-struck from flint, soon Mardi showed
afar. It glowed within a sphere, which seemed, in space,
a bubble, rising from vast depths to the sea's surface.
Piercing it, my Mardian strength returned; but the angel's
veins once more grew dim.
Nearing the isles, thus breathed my guide:`Loved
one, love on! But know, that heaven hath no roof. To
know all is to be all. Beatitude there is none. And your
only Mardian happiness is but exemption from great woes
no more. Great Love is sad; and heaven is Love. Sadness
makes the silence throughout the realms of space; sadness
is universal and eternal; but sadness is tranquillity;
tranquillity
the uttermost that souls may hope for.'
Then, with its wings it fanned adieu; and disappeared
where the sun flames highest.
We heard the dream and, silent, sought repose, to dream
away our wonder.
CHAPTER LXXXV.
THEY DEPART FROM SERENIA.
At
sunrise, we stood upon the beach.
Babbalanja thus:My voyage is ended. Not because
what we sought is found; but that I now possess all which
may be had of what I sought in Mardi. Here, I tarry to
grow wiser still:then I am Alma's and the world's.
Taji! for Yillah thou wilt hunt in vain; she is a phantom
that but mocks thee; and while for her thou madly huntest,
the sin thou didst cries out, and its avengers still will
follow
.
But here they may not come: nor those, who,
tempting, track thy path. Wise counsel take. Within
our hearts is all we seek: though in that search many need
a prompter. Him I have found in blessed Alma. Then
rove no more. Gain now, in flush of youth, that last wise
thought, too often purchased, by a life of woe. Be wise:
be wise.
Media! thy station calls thee home. Yet from this
isle, thou carriest that, wherewith to bless thy own. These
flowers, that round us spring, may be transplanted: and Odo
made to bloom with amaranths and myrtles, like this
Serenia
.
Before thy people act the things, thou here hast heard.
Let no man weep, that thou may'st laugh; no man toil too
hard, that thou may'st idle be. Abdicate thy throne: but
still retain the scepter. None need a king; but many need
a ruler.
Mohi! Yoomy! do we part? then bury in
forgetfulness
much that hitherto I've spoken. But let not one
syllable of this old man's words be lost.
Mohi! Age leads thee by the hand. Live out thy
life; and die, calm-browed.
But Yoomy! many days are thine. And in one life's
span, great circles may be traversed, eternal good be done.
Take all Mardi for thy home. Nations are but names;
and continents but shifting sands.
Once more: Taji! be sure thy Yillah never will be
found; or found, will not avail thee. Yet search, if so thou
wilt; more isles, thou say'st, are still unvisited; and when
all is seen, return, and find thy Yillah here.
Companions all! adieu.
And from the beach, he wended through the woods.
Our shallops now refitted, we silently embarked; and as
we sailed away, the old man blessed us.
For a time, each prow's ripplings were distinctly heard:
ripple after ripple.
With silent, steadfast eyes, Media still preserved his
noble mien; Mohi his reverend repose; Yoomy his musing
mood.
But as a summer hurricane leaves all nature still, and
smiling to the eye; yet, in deep woods, there lie concealed
some anguished roots torn up:so, with these.
Much they longed, to point our prows for Odo's isle;
saying our search was over.
But I was fixed as fate.
On we sailed, as when we first embarked; the air was
bracing as before. More isles we visited:thrice
encountered
the avengers: but unharmed; thrice Hautia's heralds
but turned not aside;saw many checkered scenes
wandered
through groves, and open fieldstraversed many
valesclimbed hill-tops whence broad views were gained
tarried in townsbroke into solitudessought far, sought
near:Still Yillah there was none.
Then again they all would fain dissuade me.
Closed is the deep blue eye, said Yoomy.
Fate's last leaves are turning, let me home and die,
said Mohi.
So nigh the circuit's done, said Media, our morrow's
sun must rise o'er Odo; Taji! renounce the hunt.
I am the hunter, that never rests! the hunter without
a home! She I seek, still flies before; and I will follow,
though she lead me beyond the reef; through sunless seas;
and into night and death. Her, will I seek, through all
the isles and stars; and find her, whate'er betide!
Again they yielded; and again we glided on;our
storm-worn prows, now pointed here, now there;beckoned,
repulsed;their half-rent sails, still courting every breeze.
But that same night, once more, they wrestled with me.
Now, at last, the hopeless search must be renounced: Yillah
there was none: back must I hie to blue Serenia.
Then sweet Yillah called me from the sea;still must I
on! but gazing whence that music seemed to come, I thought
I saw the green corse drifting by: and striking 'gainst our
prow, as if to hinder. Then, then! my heart grew hard,
like flint; and black, like night; and sounded hollow to
the hand I clenched. Hyenas filled me with their laughs;
death-damps chilled my brow; I prayed not, but
blasphemed
.
CHAPTER LXXXVI.
THEY MEET THE PHANTOMS.
That
starless midnight, there stole from out the darkness,
the Iris flag of Hautia.
Again the sirens came. They bore a large and stately
urn-like flower, white as alabaster, and glowing, as if lit
up within. From its calyx, flame-like, trembled forked and
crimson stamens, burning with intensest odors.
The phantoms nearer came; their flower, as an urn of
burning niter. Then it changed, and glowed like Persian
dawns; or passive, was shot over by palest lightnings;so
variable its tints.
The night-blowing Cereus! said Yoomy, shuddering,
that never blows in sun-light; that blows but once; and
blows but for an hour.For the last time I come; now, in
your midnight of despair, and promise you this glory. Take
heed! short time hast thou to pause; through me, perhaps,
thy Yillah may be found.
Away! away! tempt me not by that, enchantress!
Hautia! I know thee not; I fear thee not; but instinct
makes me hate thee. Away! my eyes are frozen shut; I
will not be tempted more.
How glorious it burns! cried Media. I reel with
incense:can such sweets be evil?
Look! look! cried Yoomy, its petals wane, and
creep; one moment more, and the night-flower shuts up
forever the last, last hope of Yillah!
Yillah! Yillah! Yillah! bayed three vengeful voices
far behind.
Yillah! Yillah!dash the urn! I follow, Hautia!
though thy lure be death.
The Cereus closed; and in a mist the siren prow went
on before; we, following.
When day dawned, three radiant pilot-fish swam in
advance: three ravenous sharks astern.
And, full before us, rose the isle of Hautia.
CHAPTER LXXXVII.
THEY DRAW NIGH TO FLOZELLA.
As
if Mardi were a poem, and every island a canto, the
shore now in sight was called Flozella-a-Nina, or
The-Last-Verse-of-the-Song
.
According to Mohi, the origin of this term was traceable
to the remotest antiquity.
In the beginning, there were other beings in Mardi
besides Mardians; winged beings, of purer minds, and cast in
gentler molds, who would fain have dwelt forever with
mankind
.
But the hearts of the Mardians were bitter against
them, because of their superior goodness. Yet those beings
returned love for malice, and long entreated to virtue and
charity. But in the end, all Mardi rose up against them,
and hunted them from isle to isle; till, at last, they rose
from the woodlands like a flight of birds, and disappeared
in the skies. Thereafter, abandoned of such sweet
influences
,
the Mardians fell into all manner of sins and sufferings,
becoming the erring things their descendants were now. Yet
they knew not, that their calamities were of their own
bringing
down. For deemed a victory, the expulsion of the
winged beings was celebrated in choruses, throughout Mardi.
And among other jubilations, so ran the legend, a pean was
composed, corresponding in the number of its stanzas, to the
number of islands. And a band of youths, gayly appareled,
voyaged in gala canoes all round the lagoon, singing upon
each isle, one verse of their song. And Flozella being the
last isle in their circuit, its queen commemorated the
circumstance
,
by new naming her realm.
That queen had first incited Mardi to wage war against
the beings with wings. She it was, who had been foremost
in every assault. And that queen was ancestor of Hautia,
now ruling the isle.
Approaching the dominions of one who so long had
haunted
me, conflicting emotions tore up my soul in tornadoes.
Yet Hautia had held out some prospect of crowning my
yearnings. But how connected were Hautia and Yillah?
Something I hoped; yet more I feared. Dire presentiments,
like poisoned arrows, shot through me. Had they pierced
me before, straight to Flozella would I have voyaged; not
waiting for Hautia to woo me by that last and victorious
temptation. But unchanged remained my feelings of hatred
for Hautia; yet vague those feelings, as the language of her
flowers. Nevertheless, in some mysterious way seemed
Hautia and Yillah connected. But Yillah was all beauty,
and innocence; my crown of felicity; my heaven below;
and Hautia, my whole heart abhorred. Yillah I sought;
Hautia sought me. One, openly beckoned me here; the
other dimly allured me there. Yet now was I wildly
dreaming to find them together. But so distracted my soul,
I knew not what it was, that I thought.
Slowly we neared the land. Flozella-a-Nina!An omen?
Was this isle, then, to prove the last place of my search, even
as it was the Last-Verse-of-the-Song?
CHAPTER LXXXVIII.
THEY LAND.
A jeweled
tiara, nodding in spray, looks flowery Flozella,
approached from the sea. For, lo you! the glittering foam
all round its white marge; where, forcing themselves
underneath
the coral ledge, and up through its crevices, in
fountains
,
the blue billows gush. While, within, zone above zone,
thrice zoned in belts of bloom, all the isle, as a
hanging-garden
soars; its tapering cone blending aloft, with heaven's
own blue.
What flies through the spray! what incense is this?
cried Media.
Ha! you wild breeze! you have been plundering the
gardens of Hautia, cried Yoomy.
No sweets can be sweeter, said Braid-Beard, but no
Upas more deadly.
Anon we came nearer; sails idly flapping, and paddles
suspended; sleek currents our coursers. And round about
the isle, like winged rainbows, shoals of dolphins were
leaping
over floating fragments of wrecks:dark-green,
long-haired
ribs, and keels of canoes. For many shallops,
inveigled
by the eddies, were oft dashed to pieces against that
flowery strand. But what cared the dolphins? Mardian
wrecks were their homes. Over and over they sprang:
from east to west: rising and setting: many suns in a
moment; while all the sea, like a harvest plain, was stacked
with their glittering sheaves of spray.
And far down, fathoms on fathoms, flitted rainbow hues:
as seines-full of mermaids; half-screening the bones of the
drowned.
Swifter and swifter the currents now ran; till with a
shock, our prows were beached.
There, beneath an arch of spray, three dark-eyed maidens
stood; garlanded with columbines, their nectaries nodding
like jesters' bells; and robed in vestments blue.
The pilot-fish transformed! cried Yoomy.
The night-eyed heralds three! said Mohi.
Following the maidens, we now took our way along a
winding vale; where, by sweet-scented hedges, flowed
bluebraided
brooks; their tributaries, rivulets of violets,
meandering
through the meads.
On one hand, forever glowed the rosy mountains with a
tropic dawn; and on the other, lay an Arctic eve;the
white daisies drifted in long banks of snow, and snowed the
blossoms from the orange boughs. There, summer breathed
her bridal bloom; her hill-top temples crowned with bridal
wreaths.
We wandered on, through orchards arched in long arcades,
that seemed baronial halls, hung o'er with trophies:so
spread the boughs in antlers. This orchard was the
frontlet
of the isle.
The fruit hung high in air, that only beaks, not hands,
might pluck.
Here, the peach tree showed her thousand cheeks of down,
kissed often by the wooing winds; here, in swarms, the
yellow
apples hived, like golden bees upon the boughs; here,
from the kneeling, fainting trees, thick fell the cherries, in
great drops of blood; and here, the pomegranate, with cold
rind and sere, deep pierced by bills of birds revealed the
mellow of its ruddy core. So, oft the heart, that cold and
withered seems, within yet hides its juices.
This orchard passed, the vale became a lengthening plain,
that seemed the Straits of Ormus bared; so thick it lay with
flowery gems:torquoise-hyacinths, ruby-roses, lily-pearls.
Here roved the vagrant vines; their flaxen ringlets curling
over arbors, which laughed and shook their golden locks.
From bower to bower, flew the wee bird, that ever
hovering
,
seldom lights; and flights of gay canaries passed, like
jonquils, winged.
But now, from out half-hidden bowers of clematis, there
issued swarms of wasps, which flying wide, settled on all the
buds.
And, fifty nymphs preceding, who now follows from those
bowers, with gliding, artful steps:the very snares of love!
Hautia. A gorgeous amaryllis in her hand; Circe-flowers
in her ears; her girdle tied with vervain.
She came by privet hedges, drooping; downcast
honeysuckles
;
she trod on pinks and pansies, blue-bells, heath,
and lilies. She glided on: her crescent brow calm as the
moon, when most it works its evil influences.
Her eye was fathomless.
But the same mysterious, evil-boding gaze was there, which
long before had haunted me in Odo, ere Yillah fled.Queen
Hautia the incognito! Then two wild currents met, and
dashed me into foam.
Yillah! Yillah!tell me, queen! But she stood
motionless
;
radiant, and scentless: a dahlia on its stalk.
Where? Where?
Is not thy voyage now ended?Take flowers!
Damsels
,
give him wine to drink. After his weary hunt, be the
wanderer happy.
I dashed aside their cups, and flowers; still rang the vale
with Yillah!
Taji! did I know her fate, naught would I now
disclose
;
my heralds pledged their queen to naught. Thou
but comest here to supplant thy mourner's night-shade, with
marriage roses. Damsels! give him wreaths; crowd round
him; press him with your cups!
Once more I spilled their wine, and tore their garlands.
Is not that, the evil eye that long ago did haunt me?
and thou, the Hautia who hast followed me, and wooed, and
mocked, and tempted me, through all this long, long voyage?
I swear! thou knowest all.
I am Hautia. Thou hast come at last. Crown him
with your flowers! Drown him in your wine! To all
questions, Taji! I am mute.Away!damsels dance; reel
round him; round and round!
Then, their feet made music on the rippling grass, like
thousand leaves of lilies on a lake. And, gliding nearer,
Hautia welcomed Media; and said, Your comrade here is
sad:be ye gay. Ho, wine!I pledge ye, guests!
Then, marking all, I thought to seem what I was not,
that I might learn at last the thing I sought.
So, three cups in hand I held; drank wine, and laughed;
and half-way met Queen Hautia's blandishments.
CHAPTER LXXXIX.
THEY ENTER THE BOWER OF HAUTIA.
Conducted
to the arbor, from which the queen had
emerged, we came to a sweet-brier bower within; and
reclined
upon odorous mats.
Then, in citron cups, sherbet of tamarinds was offered to
Media, Mohi, Yoomy; to me, a nautilus shell, brimmed
with a light-like fluid, that welled, and welled like a fount.
Quaff, Taji, quaff! every drop drowns a thought!
Like a blood-freshet, it ran through my veins.
A philter?How Hautia burned before me! Glorious
queen! with all the radiance, lighting up the equatorial
night.
Thou art most magical, oh queen! about thee a
thousand
constellations cluster.
They blaze to burn, whispered Mohi.
I see ten million Hautias!all space reflects her, as a
mirror.
Then, in reels, the damsels once more mazed, the blossoms
shaking from their brows; till Hautia, glided near; arms
lustrous as rainbows: chanting some wild invocation.
My soul ebbed out; Yillah there was none! but as I
turned round open-armed, Hautia vanished.
She is deeper than the sea, said Media.
Her bow is bent, said Yoomy.
I could tell wonders of Hautia and her damsels, said
Mohi.
What wonders?
Listen; and in his own words will I recount the
adventure
of the youth Ozonna. It will show thee, Taji, that the
maidens of Hautia are all Yillahs, held captive, unknown to
themselves; and that Hautia, their enchantress, is the most
treacherous of queens.
`Camel-like, laden with woe,' said Ozonna, `after many
wild rovings in quest of a maiden long lostbeautiful Ady!
and after being repelled in Maramma; and in vain hailed to
land at Serenia, represented as naught but another
Maramma
;with
vague promises of discovering Ady, three sirens,
who long had pursued, at last inveigled me to Flozella;
where Hautia made me her thrall. But ere long, in Rea,
one of her maidens, I thought I discovered my Ady
transformed
.
My arms opened wide to embrace; but the damsel
knew not Ozonna. And even, when after hard wooing, I
won her again, she seemed not lost Ady, but Rea. Yet all
the while, from deep in her strange, black orbs, Ady's blue
eyes seemed pensively looking:blue eye within black: sad,
silent soul within merry. Long I strove, by fixed ardent
gazing, to break the spell, and restore in Rea my lost one's
Past. But in vain. It was only Rea, not Ady, who at
stolen intervals looked on me now. One morning Hautia
started as she greeted me; her quick eye rested on my bosom;
and glancing there, affrighted, I beheld a distinct, fresh mark,
the impress of Rea's necklace drop. Fleeing, I revealed what
had passed to the maiden, who broke from my side; as I, from
Hautia's. The queen summoned her damsels, but for many
hours the call was unheeded; and when at last they came,
upon each bosom lay a necklace-drop like Rea's. On the
morrow, lo! my arbor was strown over with bruised
Lindenleaves
,
exuding a vernal juice. Full of forbodings, again
I sought Rea: who, casting down her eyes, beheld her feet
stained green. Again she fled; and again Hautia summoned
her damsels: malicious triumph in her eye; but dismay
succeeded
:
each maid had spotted feet. That night Rea was
torn from my side by three masks; who, stifling her cries,
rapidly bore her away; and as I pursued, disappeared in
a cave. Next morning, Hautia was surrounded by her
nymphs, but Rea was absent. Then, gliding near, she
snatched
from my hair, a jet-black tress, loose-hanging. `Ozonna
is the murderer! See! Rea's torn hair entangled with
his!' Aghast, I swore that I knew not her fate. `Then let
the witch Larfee be called!' The maidens darted from
the bower; and soon after, there rolled into it a green
cocoa-nut, followed by the witch, and all the damsels,
flinging
anemones upon it. Bowling this way and that, the
nut at last rolled to my feet.`It is he!' cried all.Then
they bound me with osiers; and at midnight, unseen and
irresistible hands placed me in a shallop; which sped far
out into the lagoon, where they tossed me to the waves;
but so violent the shock, the osiers burst; and as the
shallop
fled one way, swimming another, ere long I gained
land.
`Thus in Flozella, I found but the phantom of Ady, and
slew the last hope of Ady the true.'
This recital sank deep into my soul. In some wild way,
Hautia had made a captive of Yillah; in some one of her
black-eyed maids, the blue-eyed One was transformed. From
side to side, in frenzy, I turned; but in all those cold,
mystical
eyes, saw not the warm ray that I sought.
Hast taken root within this treacherous soil? cried
Media.Away! thy Yillah is behind thee, not before.
Deep she dwells in blue Serenia's groves; which thou
would'st not search. Hautia mocks thee; away! The
reef is rounded; but a strait flows between this isle and
Odo, and thither its ruler must return. Every hour I tarry
here, some wretched serf is dying there, for whom, from blest
Serenia, I carry life and joy. Away!
Art still bent on finding evil for thy good? cried Mohi.
How can Yillah harbor here?Beware!Let not
Hautia so enthrall thee.
Come away, come away, cried Yoomy. Far hence
O*
is Yillah! and he who tarries among these flowers, must
needs burn juniper.
Look on me, Media, Mohi, Yoomy. Here I stand, my
own monument, till Hautia breaks the spell.
In grief they left me.
Vee-Vee's conch I heard no more.
CHAPTER XC.
TAJI WITH HAUTIA.
As
their last echoes died away down the valley, Hautia
glided near;zone unbound, the amaryllis in her hand.
Her bosom ebbed and flowed; the motes danced in the
beams that darted from her eyes.
Come! let us sin, and be merry. Ho! wine, wine,
wine! and lapfuls of flowers! let all the cane-brakes pipe
their flutes. Damsels! dance; reel, swim, around me:I,
the vortex that draws all in. Taji! Taji!as a berry,
that name is juicy in my mouth!Taji, Taji! and in
choruses, she warbled forth the sound, till it seemed issuing
from her syren eyes.
My heart flew forth from out its bars, and soared in air;
but as my hand touched Hautia's, down dropped a dead bird
from the clouds.
Ha! how he sinks!but did'st ever dive in deep waters,
Taji? Did'st ever see where pearls grow?To the cave!
damsels, lead on!
Then wending through constellations of flowers, we entered
deep groves. And thus, thrice from sun-light to shade, it
seemed three brief nights and days, ere we paused before the
mouth of the cavern.
A bow-shot from the sea, it pierced the hill-side like a
vaulted way; and glancing in, we saw far gleams of
water; crossed, here and there, by long-flung distant
shadows
of domes and columns. All Venice seemed within.
From a stack of golden palm-stalks, the damsels now
made torches; then stood grouped; a sheaf of sirens in a
sheaf of flame.
Illuminated, the cavern shone like a Queen of Kandy's
casket: full of dawns and sunsets.
From rocky roof to bubbling floor, it was columned with
stalactites; and galleried all round, in spiral tiers, with
sparkling, coral ledges.
And now, their torches held aloft, into the water the
maidens softly glided; and each a lotus floated; while, from
far above, into the air Hautia flung her flambeau; then
bounding after,in the lake, two meteors were quenched.
Where she dived, the flambeaux clustered; and up
among them, Hautia rose; hands, full of pearls.
Lo! Taji; all these may be had for the diving; and
Beauty, Health, Wealth, Long Life, and the Last Lost
Hope of man. But through me alone, may these be had.
Dive thou, and bring up one pearl if thou canst.
Down, down! down, down, in the clear, sparkling water,
till I seemed crystalized in the flashing heart of a diamond;
but from those bottomless depths, I uprose empty handed.
Pearls, pearls! thy pearls! thou art fresh from the
mines. Ah, Taji! for thee, bootless deep diving. Yet to
Hautia, one shallow plunge reveals many Golcondas. But
come; dive with me:join handslet me show thee
strange things.
Show me that which I seek, and I will dive with thee,
straight through the world, till we come up in oceans
unknown
.
Nay, nay; but join hands, and I will take thee, where
thy Past shall be forgotten; where thou wilt soon learn to
love the living, not the dead.
Better to me, oh Hautia! all the bitterness of my
buried dead, than all the sweets of the life thou canst
bestow
;
even, were it eternal.
CHAPTER XCI.
MARDI BEHIND: AN OCEAN BEFORE.
Returned
from the cave, Hautia reclined in her clematis
bower, invisible hands flinging fennel around her. And
nearer, and nearer, stole dulcet sounds dissolving my woes, as
warm beams, snow. Strange languors made me droop;
once more within my inmost vault, side by side, the Past and
Yillah lay:two bodies tranced;while like a rounding
sun, before me Hautia magnified magnificence; and through
her fixed eyes, slowly drank up my soul.
Thus we stood:snake and victim: life ebbing out from
me, to her.
But from that spell, I burst again, as all the Past smote
all the Present in me.
Oh Hautia! thou knowest the mystery I die to fathom.
I see it crouching in thine eye:Reveal!
Weal or woe?
Life or death!
See, see! and Yillah's rose-pearl danced before me.
I snatched it from her hand:Yillah! Yillah!
Rave on: she lies too deep to answer; stranger voices
than thine she hears:bubbles are bursting round her.
Drowned! drowned then, even as she dreamed:I
come, I come!Ha, what form is this?hast mosses?
seathyme
?
pearls?Help, help! I sink!Back, shining
monster!What, Hautia,is it thou?Oh vipress, I
could slay thee!
Go, go,and slay thyself: I may not make thee mine;
go,dead to dead!There is another cavern in the hill.
Swift I fled along the valley-side; passed Hautia's cave
vol. ii.R
of pearls; and gained a twilight arch; within, a lake
transparent
shone. Conflicting currents met, and wrestled; and
one dark arch led to channels, seaward tending.
Round and round, a gleaming form slow circled in the
deepest eddies:white, and vaguely Yillah.
Straight I plunged; but the currents were as fierce
headwinds
off capes, that beat back ships.
Then, as I frenzied gazed; gaining the one dark arch,
the revolving shade darted out of sight, and the eddies
whirled as before.
Stay, stay! let me go with thee, though thou glidest
to gulfs of blackness;naught can exceed the hell of this
despair!Why beat longer in this corpse oh, my heart!
As somnambulists fast-frozen in some horrid dream,
ghost-like
glide abroad, and fright the wakeful world; so that
night, with death-glazed eyes, to and fro I flitted on the
damp and weedy beach.
Is this specter, Taji?and Mohi and the minstrel
stood before me.
Taji lives no more. So dead, he has no ghost. I am
his spirit's phantom's phantom.
Nay, then, phantom! the time has come to flee.
They dragged me to the water's brink, where a prow was
beached. SoonMohi at the helmwe shot beneath the
far-flung shadow of a cliff; when, as in a dream, I
hearkened
to a voice.
Arrived at Odo, Media had been met with yells.
Sedition
was in arms, and to his beard defied him. Vain all
concessions then. Foremost stood the three pale sons of
him, whom I had slain, to gain the maiden lost. Avengers,
from the first hour we had parted on the sea, they had
drifted on my track; survived starvation; and lived to hunt
me round all Mardi's reef; and now at Odo, that last
threshold
,
waited to destroy; or there, missing the revenge they
sought, still swore to hunt me round Eternity.
Behind the avengers, raged a stormy mob, invoking Media
to renounce his rule. But one hand waving like a pennant
above the smoke of some sea-fight, straight through that
tumult Media sailed serene: the rioters parting from before
him, as wild waves before a prow inflexible.
A haven gained, he turned to Mohi and the minstrel:
Oh, friends! after our long companionship, hard to
part! But henceforth, for many moons, Odo will prove
no home for old age, or youth. In Serenia only, will ye
find the peace ye seek; and thither ye must carry Taji,
who else must soon be slain, or lost. Go: release him
from the thrall of Hautia. Outfly the avengers, and gain
Serenia. Reck not of me. The state is tossed in storms;
and where I stand, the combing billows must break over.
But among all noble souls, in tempest-time, the headmost
man last flies the wreck. So, here in Odo will I abide,
though every plank breaks up beneath me. And then,
great Oro! let the king die clinging to the keel! Farewell!
Such Mohi's tale.
In trumpet-blasts, the hoarse night-winds now blew; the
Lagoon, black with the still shadows of the mountains, and
the driving shadows of the clouds. Of all the stars, only
red Arcturus shone. But through the gloom, and on the
circumvallating reef, the breakers dashed ghost-white.
An outlet in that outer barrier was nigh.
Ah! Yillah! Yillah!the currents sweep thee
oceanward
;
nor will I tarry behind.Mardi, farewell!Give
me the helm, old man!
Nay, madman! Serenia is our haven. Through yonder
strait, for thee, perdition lies. And from the deep beyond,
no voyager e'er puts back.
And why put back? is a life of dying worth living o'er
again?Let
me
, then, be the unreturning wanderer. The
helm! By Oro, I will steer my own fate, old man.Mardi,
farewell!
Nay, Taji: commit not the last, last crime! cried
Yoomy.
He's seized the helm! eternity is in his eye! Yoomy: for
our lives we must now swim.
And plunging, they struck out for land: Yoomy buoying
Mohi up, and the salt waves dashing the tears from his pallid
face, as through the scud, he turned it on me mournfully.
Now, I am my own soul's emperor; and my first act
is abdication! Hail! realm of shades!and turning my
prow into the racing tide, which seized me like a hand
omnipotent, I darted through.
Churned in foam, that outer ocean lashed the clouds; and
straight in my white wake, headlong dashed a shallop, three
fixed specters leaning o'er its prow: three arrows poising.
And thus, pursuers and pursued flew on, over an endless
sea.
THE END.Attend my lord:`Anno Mardis 50,000,000, o. s.
I, Bardianna, of the island of Vamba, and village of the
same name, having just risen from my yams, in high health,
high spirits, and sound mind, do hereby cheerfully make and
ordain this my last will and testament.
`Imprimis:
`All my kith and kin being well to do in Mardi, I
wholly leave them out of this my will.
`Item. Since, in divers ways, verbally and otherwise,
my good friend Pondo has evinced a strong love for me,
Bardianna, as the owner and proprietor of all that
capital
messuage with the appurtenances, in Vamba aforesaid,
called `The Lair,' wherein I now dwell; also for all my
Bread-fruit orchards, Palm-groves, Banana-plantations,
Taro-patches
,
gardens, lawns, lanes, and hereditaments
whatsoever
,
adjoining the aforesaid messuage;I do hereby give
and bequeath the same to Bomblum of the island of Adda;
the aforesaid Bomblum having never expressed any regard
for me, as a holder of real estate.
`Item. My esteemed neighbor Lakreemo having since
the last lunar eclipse called daily to inquire after the state
of my health: and having nightly made tearful inquiries of
my herb-doctor, concerning the state of my viscera;I do
hereby give and bequeath to the aforesaid Lakreemo all and
sundry those vegetable pills, potions, powders, aperients,
purgatives, expellatives, evacuatives, tonics, emetics,
cathartics
,
clysters, injections, scarifiers, cataplasms, lenitives,
lotions, decoctions, washes, gargles, and phlegmagogues;
together
with all the jars, calabashes, gourds, and galipots,
thereunto pertaining; situate, lying, and being, in the
west-by-north
corner of my east-southeast crypt, in my aforesaid
tenement known as `The Lair.'
`Item. The woman Pesti; a native of Vamba, having
oftentimes hinted that I, Bardianna, sorely needed a spouse,
and having also intimated that she bore me a conjugal
affection; I do hereby give and bequeath to the aforesaid
Pesti:my blessing; forasmuch, as by the time of the
opening of this my last will and testament, I shall have
been forever delivered from the aforesaid Pesti's
persecutions
.
`Item. Having a high opinion of the probity of my
worthy and excellent friend Bidiri, I do hereby entirely, and
wholly, give, will, grant, bestow, devise, and utterly hand
over unto the said Bidiri, all that tenement where my
servant Oram now dwelleth; with all the lawns, meadows,
uplands and lowlands, fields, groves, and gardens, thereunto
belonging:
In Trust Nevertheless
to have and to hold
the same for the sole use and benefit of Lanbranka Hohinna,
spinster, now resident of the aforesaid island of Vamba.
`Item. I give and bequeath my large carved drinking
gourd to my good comrade Topo.
`Item. My fast friend Doldrum having at sundry
times, and in sundry places, uttered the prophecy, that upon
my decease his sorrow would be great; I do hereby give
and bequeath to the aforesaid Doldrum, ten yards of my best
soft tappa, to be divided into handkerchiefs for his sole
benefit and behoof.
`Item. My sensible friend Solo having informed me,
that he intended to remain a bachelor for life; I give and
devise to the aforesaid Solo, the mat for one person, whereon
I nightly repose.
`Item. Concerning my private Arbor and Palm-groves,
adjoining, lying, and being in the isle of Vamba, I give and
devise the same, with all appurtenances whatsoever, to my
friend Minta the Cynic, to have and to hold, in trust for the
first through-and-through honest man, issue of my neighbor
Mondi; and in default of such issue, for the first
through-and-through
honest man, issue of my neighbor Pendidda; and
in default of such issue, for the first through-and-through
honest man, issue of my neighbor Wynodo: and in default
of such issue, to any through-and-through honest man, issue
of any body, to be found through the length and breadth of
Mardi.
`Item. My friend Minta the Cynic to be sole judge of
all claims to the above-mentioned devise; and to hold the
said premises for his own use, until the aforesaid person be
found.
`Item. Knowing my devoted scribe Marko to be very
sensitive touching the receipt of a favor; I willingly spare
him that pain; and hereby bequeath unto the aforesaid
scribe, three milk-teeth, not as a pecuniary legacy, but as a
very slight token of my profound regard.
`Item. I give to the poor of Vamba the total contents
of my red-labeled bags of bicuspids and canines (which I
account three-fourths of my whole estate); to my body
servant Fidi, my staff, all my robes and togas, and three
hundred molars in cash; to that discerning and sagacious
philosopher my disciple Krako, one complete set of denticles,
to buy him a vertebral bone ring; and to that pious and
promising youth Vangi, two fathoms of my best kaiar rope,
with the privilege of any bough in my groves.
`All the rest of my goods, chattels and household stuff
whatsoever; and all my loose denticles, remaining after my
debts and legacies are paid, and my body is out of sight, I
hereby direct to be distributed among the poor of Vamba.
`Ultimo. I give and bequeath to all Mardi this my
last advice and counsel:videlicet: live as long as you
can; close your own eyes when you die.
`I have no previous wills to revoke; and publish this
to be my first and last.
`In witness whereof, I have hereunto set my right
hand; and hereunto have caused a true copy of the
tattooing
on my right temple to be affixed, during the year first
above written.
`By me,
Bardianna
.'